<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88111-0029 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.1-11-88.f2.A1028</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 6 / Monday, January 11, 1988 /Proposed Rules <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Agricultural Marketing Service</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">7 CFR Parts 1136 and 1139</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket Nos. AO-309-A27 and AO-374-A11]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Milk in the Great Basin and Lake Mead Marketing Areas; Decision onProposed Amendments to Marketing Agreements and to Orders</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Agricultural Marketing Service, USDA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This decision merges the Great Basin and Lake Mead Federalmilk orders, based on industry proposals considered at a public hearingheld March 18-20, 1986, in Salt Lake City, Utah. In addition to the presentlyregulated marketing areas, the merged ``Great Basin'' marketing area wouldinclude the presently unregulated portion of the State of Utah, two countiesin Wyoming, and additional counties in Idaho. The provisions of the mergedorder are generally patterned after those of the two separate orders, andthe present Class I price differentials at Salt Lake City and Las Vegasare maintained.One feature of the merged order not now contained in either order includes,in the pool plant definition, a manufacturing plant located within themarketing area and operated by a cooperative association. The obligationof a partially regulated distributing plant operator regulated by a Stateorder would be determined by the value of the fluid milk products distributedin the Federal order marketing area at the difference between the ClassI price paid by the handler regulated under the State order and the applicableFederal order Class I price.For the first time in the Federal milk order system, the merged order includesa plan for pricing milk on the basis of its protein, as well as butterfat,components. The differential value of milk used in Class I and Class IIwould be pooled to determine producers' shares of the higher-valued uses,and the value of protein used in Classes II and III would be pooled withthe value of skim milk used in Class I to determine the value of proteinin producer milk.The merger is needed to reflect changes in market structure in that thetwo separately regulated areas have become, in effect, one common market.Cooperative associations will be polled to determine whether producersfavor the issuance of the merged order.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Constance M. Brenner, MarketingSpecialist, USDA/AMS/Dairy Division, Order Formulation Branch, Room 2968,South Building, P.O. Box 96456, Washington, DC 20090-6456, (202) 447-7183.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>This administrative action is governedby the provisions of sections 556 and 557 of Title 5 of the United StatesCode and, therefore, is excluded from the requirements of Executive Order12291.The Regulatory Flexibility Act (5 U.S.C. 601-612) requires the Agency toexamine the impact of a proposed rule on small entities. Pursuant to 5U.S.C. 605(b), the Administrator of the Agricultural Marketing Servicehas certified that this action will not have a significant economic impacton a substantial number of small entities. The amended order will promotemore orderly marketing of milk by producers and regulated handlers.Prior documents in this proceeding;Notice of Hearing: Issued February 6, 1986; published February 11, 1986(51 FR 5070).Suspension Order (Great Basin): Issued May 28, 1986; published June 3,1986 (51 FR 19821).Notice of Proposed Suspension (Great Basin): Issued July 29, 1986; publishedAugust 4, 1986 (51 FR 27866).Notice of Proposed Suspension (Lake Mead): Issued July 29, 1986; publishedAugust 1, 1986 (51 FR 27555).Termination of Proceeding on Proposed Suspension (Lake Mead): Issued August29, 1986; published September 9, 1986 (51 FR 32104).Suspension Order (Great Basin): Issued September 2, 1986; published September5, 1986 (51 FR 31759).Recommended Decision: Issued July 14, 1987; published July 21, 1987, (52FR 27372).Extension of time for filing exceptions on proposed amendments: IssuedAugust 26, 1987; published September 1, 1987 (52 FR 32933).<ITAG tagnum="84">Preliminary Statement</ITAG>A public hearing was held upon proposed amendments to the marketing agreementand the order regulating the handling of milk in the Great Basin and LakeMead marketing areas. The hearing was held, pursuant to the provisionsof the Agricultural Marketing Agreement Act of 1937, as amended (7 U.S.C.601-674), and the applicable rules of practice (7 CFR Part 900), at SaltLake City, Utah, on March 18-20, 1986. Notice of such hearing was issuedon February 6, 1986, and published February 11, 1986 (51 FR 5070).Upon the basis of the evidence introduced at the hearing and the recordthereof, the Administrator, AMS, on July 14, 1987, filed with the HearingClerk, United States Department of Agriculture, his recommended decisioncontaining notice of the opportunity to file written exceptions thereto.The material issues, findings and conclusions, rulings, and general findingsof the recommended decision are hereby approved and adopted and are setforth in full herein, subject to the following modifications:1. Under the heading ``2. Need for merger of the orders.'':a. A new paragraph is added after paragraph 3. b. Paragraphs 10, 11, and 20 are revised. c. Three new paragraphs are added after paragraph 21.2. Under the heading ``3. Merged and expanded marketing area.'', paragraph5 is revised. 3. Under the heading ``4. Milk to be priced and pooled.'':a. Paragraphs 7 and 8 are revised.b. Three new paragraphs are added after paragraph 8.c. A new paragraph is added after paragraph 14.d. Two new paragraphs are added after paragraph 37.e. Three new paragraphs are added after paragraph 53.4. Under the heading ``5. Multiple component pricing.'':a. Paragraphs 14 and 17 are revised.b. Two new paragraphs are added after paragraph 17.c. Three new paragraphs are added after paragraph 24.d. Two new paragraphs are added after paragraph 25.e. Paragraph 28 is revised.f. Two new paragraphs are added after paragraph 28.g. Two new paragraphs are added after paragraph 31.h. Paragraphs 32 and 35 are revised.i. Three new paragraphs are added after paragraph 36.j. One new paragraph is added after paragraph 38.k. Two new paragraphs are added after paragraph 41.5. Under the heading ``8. Class prices, location adjustments and componentprices.'', paragraphs 3, 16, and 17 are revised.6. Under the heading ``9. Handlers' value of milk for computing pricesto producers.'', paragraph 3 is revised. 7. Under the heading ''11. Obligations of partially regulated distributingplants.'':a. Paragraph 10 is revised.b. Three new paragraphs are added after paragraph 10.c. Paragraphs 11 through 14 are deleted. The material issues on the record of the hearing relate to: 1. Whether the handling of milk produced for sale in the proposed mergedand expanded marketing area is in the current of interstate commerce ordirectly burdens, obstructs, or affects interstate commerce in milk orits products;2. Whether the marketing areas of the Great Basin and Lake Mead ordersshould be included under one order;3. Whether the proposed merged marketing area should be expanded to includeadditional territory;If a single order is issued for the proposed merged and expanded marketingarea, what its provisions should be with respect to: 4. Milk to be priced and pooled;5. Multiple component pricing; 6. Handler reports;7. Classification of milk;8. Class prices, location adjustments and components prices;9. Handler obligations, the differential pool and the skim milk/proteinpool;10. Payments to producers; 11. Obligations of partially regulated distributing plant operators; 12. Administrative provisions.<ITAG tagnum="84">Findings and Conclusions</ITAG>The following findings and conclusions on the material issues are basedon evidence presented at the hearing and the record thereof:1. <T3>Character of commerce. </T3>The handling of milk in the proposed andexpanded marketing area is in the current of interstate commerce and directlyburdens, obstructs and affects interstate commerce in milk and milk products.The marketing area specified in the proposed order, hereinafter referredto as the ``merged Great Basin marketing area'', includes 45 contiguouscounties, of which 29 comprise the entire State of Utah. The other countiesare located in Idaho (10), Nevada (4), and Wyoming (2). The principal citiesin the marketing area are Salt Lake City, Utah, and Las Vegas, Nevada.The specific territory included in the marketing area is set forth in themarketing area discussion.Handlers located in the present Great Basin area have route sales primarilyin Utah and Idaho, with some sales in the Wyoming counties proposed tobe included in the merged Great Basin marketing area. Handlers regulatedunder the Lake Mead order distribute milk in southern Nevada and southernUtah. A number of California fluid milk plants dispose of fluid milk productsin Nevada. Similarly, milk procurement for the proposed merged area crosses stateboundaries. Handlers regulated by the present Great Basin order procuremilk in the States of Utah, Nevada, Idaho, Wyoming and Colorado. The milkneeded to supply Lake Mead distributing plants is procured from Nevada,Utah, California and, at times, Arizona and Idaho. There are numerous manufacturing plants located within the proposed marketingarea that manufacture dairy products. These products are sold in Utah,Nevada, Idaho, Wyoming and other States. Manufactured products producedin many States are offered for sale in Utah, Idaho, Nevada and Wyoming.2. <T3>Need for merger of the orders. </T3>Marketing conditions in the twoseparately regulated marketing areas under consideration justify the issuanceof a single order regulating the handling of milk in these areas. Thissingle order would be the most appropriate means of effectuating the declaredpolicy of the Act. Federal regulation of milk marketing in the Great Basin area was initiatedNovember 1, 1959, when the Great Basin order became effective. The marketingarea has since been amended several times to include Elko and White PineCounties, Nevada; portions of Cache County, Utah, and Uinta County, Wyoming;and the seven Idaho counties currently in the order. The Lake Mead orderbecame fully effective August 1, 1973. The marketing area covered by theLake Mead order has not been changed since then. The merger of the Great Basin and Lake Mead orders was proposed by IntermountainMilk Producers Association (IMPA), a federation of four cooperative associationsthat market milk in the Great Basin and Lake Mead marketing area. IMPArepresents 75-80 percent of the producers whose milk is pooled under theGreat Basin order, and nearly all of the producers included in the LakeMead pool. Note: Subsequent to the hearing, IMPA had merged with Mountain Empire Dairymen'sAssociation to form Western Dairymens Cooperative, Inc. (WDCI). Proponent'sexceptions and comments to the recommended decision were filed by WDCI.A witness testifying on behalf of IMPA stated that the Lake Mead marketingarea is an appendage of the Great Basin market, with handlers regulatedby the two orders sharing a common procurement area throughout the Stateof Utah. He said that the milk surplus to Class I and Class II needs inboth markets is absorbed by the same manufacturing plants, located primarilyin the Great Basin area. The witness also stated that handlers regulatedby the two orders compete for packaged fluid milk sales to consumers, andthat fluid milk products packaged in plants regulated by one order aredistributed by handlers regulated by the other order. The witness pointedout that most producers in the two marketing areas market their milk throughIMPA, a federation of cooperatives active in both markets. The IMPA representative explained that IMPA assures a market outlet forall of its member producers, and balances reserve and surplus suppliesfor the Lake Mead and Great Basin markets. He said that IMPA, as a handlerunder both the Lake Mead and Great Basin orders, furnishes bulk and packagedmilk to other handlers and operates the fluid milk distributing plantsand manufacturing plants formerly operated by the cooperative associationscomprising the federation. The witness stated that the proposed merger would not change the numberof fully-regulated handlers, and would cause little change in the costof milk to handlers or returns to producers. He claimed that additionalsupplies of milk would not be attracted to the market, although increasesin the production of present producers and the conversion of manufacturing-gradeproducers to Grade A would be accommodated. According to the witness, mergerof the orders would not displace present production, discourage marketentry by new producers or affect current price alignment between Las Vegasand Salt Lake City handlers or between handlers at those locations andin other marketing areas.A witness representing Rockview Dairies, Inc., testified in oppositionto the proposed merger. Rockview Dairies operates a California distributingplant and two dairy farms which are nonmember producers for Anderson Dairy,the operator of a pool distributing plant under the Lake Mead order. Thewitness stated that although there appears to be a shared production areafor the two orders, he saw little evidence of overlap of sales by handlersregulated under the Lake Mead and Great Basin orders and little movementof dairy products between the two orders. He observed that there wouldappear to be as much commonality of sales and production areas betweenthe Great Basin and Southwestern Idaho-Eastern Oregon marketing areas,but that no merger of those orders had been proposed. The witness claimedthat a merger of the Lake Mead and Great Basin areas would result in lowerblend prices paid to Lake Mead producers. He explained that milk pooledunder the Lake Mead market is primarily used in Class I, with little ClassII use and limited opportunities for disposing of surplus milk, while theGreat Basin market uses a much larger percentage of its milk in Class IIand Class III products. As a result of a merger, he said, the two nonmemberproducers shipping their milk to Anderson Dairy would have to pool theirhigher-valued Class I utilization with the much greater quantity of GreatBasin milk that is used more predominantly in the lower-valued classesof utilization.According to the Rockview Dairies representative, Anderson Dairy, the largestdistributing plant regulated under the Lake Mead order, recently contractedwith a California dairy farm (Rockview) for the farm's total milk supply,and made arrangements with a California nonpool plant to buy any of thefarm's production surplus to Anderson's fluid milk needs. The witness predictedthat as a result of Anderson's new procurement arrangements, the Lake MeadMarket would be much less dependent on manufacturing plants located inthe Great Basin marketing area for the disposal of milk production surplusto the fluid milk needs of the market.A brief filed on behalf of Rockview Dairies, Inc., described proponent'sproposal to merge the orders as an attempt by IMPA to establish a monopolyin the marketing area and to obstruct interstate commerce. The brief quotedproponent witness as testifying that the merged order proposed by IMPAwould allow the milk produced in Clark County, Nevada (Las Vegas area),to be marketed there ``rather than making way for some other producersto come into the market to be qualified.'' The Rockview Dairies' briefalso stated that the record contains no evidence suggesting that the LakeMead order fails to protect the interests of producers and consumers orto promote the orderly flow of the milk supply to the market, or causesany disruption of the orderly exchange of milk in interstate commerce.The record indicates that the Lake Mead and Great Basin marketing areashave become interrelated to such an extent that a merger is the most appropriatemeans of regulating milk marketing in the area involved. When the two orderswere promulgated, they regulated the handling of milk in areas that wereclearly distinguishable as separate markets for particular handlers andproducer groups. Changes in marketing practices and market structure sincethat time, however, have caused these separately regulated areas to becomesubstantially interrelated in both distribution and supply arrangements.With a single organization, IMPA (which has now merged with Mountain Empire'sDairymen's Association to form WDCI), marketing the milk of most of theproducers supplying milk to the present marketing areas, it is reasonableto expect that the interrelationship of the two areas will become evenmore pronounced over time.With the formation of IMPA, cooperatives that formerly marketed the milkof member producers within two separate local markets have combined tomarket milk and balance milk supplies for the two markets as a whole. Theprovisions of the present individual orders that involve pooling qualificationsdo not encourage or promote efficient handling and hauling of milk throughoutthe area encompassed by the two orders. The proposed merger would assistIMPA in marketing the milk of its members in a more effective and efficientmanner without encumbrances exerted on the federation's marketing systemby the provisions of the separate orders. At the same time, the mergerwould have little effect on other handlers, consumers and nearly all ofthe nonmember producers in the merged marketing area.Proponent cooperative federation operates a fleet of trucks to move memberproducer milk and directs milk to distributing plants regulated under bothorders at the times and in the amounts needed. Under the present provisionsof the two Federal orders, the federation must move producers' milk ina manner that will maintain the producer status of its members under eitheror both orders in order to ensure an adequate reserve supply of milk forboth orders. In determining the order under which a producer's milk shouldbe pooled, the federation must consider which plants need milk for fluidand Class II use, which producers' milk is to be included on particularfarm pick-up routes, and the need to keep enough dairy farmers qualifiedas producers on both markets to assure the availability of milk to distributingplants in both markets on short notice. The federation sometimes must shiftthe market on which a producer's milk is pooled from one Federal orderto another because of conditions such as a recent strike of workers atCalifornia milk plants. One result of the strike was increased demand forfluid milk in Las Vegas, necessitating the pooling of producers previouslyassociated with the Great Basin market on the Lake Mead market. Anothercause of instability in the relative milk supplies of the two markets isthe nature of demand in Las Vegas. The number of people in Las Vegas varieswidely, increasing significantly over weekends and holidays, and causinglarge shifts in the demand for fluid milk, both by consumers and by distributingplants.Adoption of the merger proposal will equalize marketing conditions andprices to producers between the two marketing areas and contribute to greaterefficiency by allowing distributing plants to be supplied from the mostfavorably-located producers without regard to the shipping requirementsof two different orders. The distances milk is required to be hauled toqualify for pooling would be shortened, and hauling costs thereby reduced.Accounting and reporting requirements will be reduced if handlers no longerneed to be concerned about two separate sets of provisions, two differentreporting forms, or the complexities of dealing with the provisions regulatingtransfers of milk and milk products between orders. The merger would helpto reduce unnecessary regulation and reduce costs by relieving the marketadministrator of duplicating many reports and duties involved in administeringtwo orders instead of one.It is apparent that, although route disposition from plants regulated undereach of the separate orders may not have expanded into the other orderarea to any great degree, milk supplied by Great Basin producers and bottledin the Great Basin marketing area is increasingly being distributed inthe Lake Mead area by Lake Mead handlers. At the same time, it is clearthat nearly all of the milk historically associated with the Lake Meadorder has become increasingly dependent on distant manufacturing plantsin the Great Basin marketing area as outlets for milk produced in excessof the Lake Mead market's fluid milk requirements. If, as the RockviewDairies' representative testified, the largest distributing plant operatorin the Lake Mead market develops an independent supply of milk from California,the need for access to outlets for surplus milk supplies by Lake Mead producerswill become even more acute.Dependence by producers traditionally supplying the Lake Mead market uponthe dwindling number of Lake Mead pool distributing plants \1\<NOTE/> for a pooling base is likely to generate disorderly marketingconditions as producers struggle to assure that their milk will share inthe marketwide pool. Data in the hearing record indicate that in May 1985,most of the Class I needs of the Lake Mead market could be met by milkproduced in California and Clark County, Nevada. During that month onlya small proportion, approximately 13 percent, of the milk produced in Utahand pooled on the Lake Mead order was actually needed at Lake Mead distributingplants for Class I use. Testimony by the IMPA witness indicated that underthis situation the federation intends to maintain Lake Mead pool statusfor the Grade A milk of all of its member producers traditionally associatedwith the Lake Mead market, regardless of whatever excessive hauling costsor complex accounting and reporting procedures may be involved in doingso. The federation's incentive for continuing to assure that its producersare qualified for pooling under the Lake Mead order is the historicallyhigher blend price paid to producers under the Lake Mead order than underthe Great Basin order. During the years of 1983-85, the announced blendprice paid to Lake Mead producers exceeded the Great Basin blend priceby an average of approximately 15 cents per hundredweight.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Official notice is taken of the cessation of bottlingoperations at the IMPA Cedar City, Utah, plant in August 1986.With milk supplies from the southern and central Utah production area availableto both the Great Basin and Lake Mead marketing areas and comprising anecessary reserve for the Lake Mead market, equilibrium in the prices paidto producers located in that area is necessary to avoid disorderly marketingconditions. Maintenance of the present pooling standards for a separateLake Mead order would require the federation to incur unnecessary, expensiveand inefficient marketing practices in order to maintain the pool statusof its milk on the Lake Mead market.In the absence of a merger, the federation would be able to assure an adequatesupply of milk at its Lake Mead distributing plants while maintaining theLake Mead pool status of as much of its producers milk as possible onlyby calculating each month the producer milk that would be pooled underthe Lake Mead order. Enough milk would have to be associated with the LakeMead order to be able to meet the plants' fluid milk requirements on thedays the plants receive milk without associating so much milk with theorder that the amount of milk diverted to manufacturing would exceed theorder's diversion limits. Any milk in excess of that qualified for poolingon the Lake Mead market would have to be pooled under the Great Basin order.Under such conditions, the Great Basin pool would be carrying almost theentire seasonal reserve supply of milk for the Lake Mead marketing area.In addition, the federation would be incurring unnecessary trouble andexpense for the sole purpose of marketing its members' milk to their greatestbenefit.The quotation of the IMPA witness from the hearing record used in the RockviewDairies' brief refers to the requirement of the Lake Mead order that oneday's production of a producer's milk must be received at a pool distributingplant each month in order for the producer's total production for the monthto be pooled. The IMPA witness testified that, in order for milk producedin southern Utah, more than 200 miles from Las Vegas, to be pooled underthe Lake Mead order, some of it must be shipped to Las Vegas each month,sometimes displacing milk produced in the Las Vegas area. The witness'statement was not an assertion that milk from other areas should not bemarketed in the Las Vegas area, but rather that the provisions of the ordershould not require milk to be moved into the Las Vegas area solely in orderto be pooled, necessitating the removal of locally-produced milk to makeroom for it. Provisions encouraging such uneconomic and inefficient handlingof producer milk and the testimony that such handling has been engagedin are evidence that the Lake Mead order fails to protect the interestsof consumers and handlers by failing to promote the orderly flow of themilk supply to the market. Adoption of the proposal to merge the ordersdoes not require a finding that the Lake Mead order causes a disruptionof the orderly exchange of milk in interstate commerce, but merely thatsuch exchange would be improved by a merger of the orders.The federation probably would be able to continue the Lake Mead pool statusof some of its producers without merging the orders and without undertakingunnecessary and uneconomic hauling if the present Lake Mead diversion limitswere relaxed. Relaxation of those limits would allow more producer milkto be pooled on the Lake Mead market without an increase in actual deliveriesto pool distributing plants. However, increased diversion limits wouldallow more milk to be pooled under the Lake Mead order, causing a declinein Lake Mead prices to producers that would bring them into balance withGreat Basin producer prices.\2\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ Official notice is taken of the dramatic increase in thevolume of milk pooled under the Lake Mead order while diversion limitswere suspended during early 1986, and the resulting decline in the uniformprices paid to producers.For the reasons discussed above, the inevitable result of existing marketingconditions under the two separate orders is the uneconomic and inefficienthauling practices undertaken by the federation to assure the pool statusof its members under the Lake Mead order. Any attempt to avoid such practicesby relaxing the present Lake Mead pooling standards would have the effectof reducing the uniform price to Lake Mead producers to a point at whichit will be in equilibrium with the Great Basin uniform price to producerssimilarly located. A merger of the two orders is the best means of accomplishingthe same ends by assuring that participants in the merged marketing areawill have no incentive to conduct their operations in other than the mostefficient possible manner. The efficiencies of operation that may be expectedto result from a merger of the two orders should, on the whole, benefitmilk producers, handlers and consumers in the marketing areas affected.As argued by the Rockview Dairies representative, the lower Class I utilizationpercentage in the present Great Basin area, relative to Lake Mead, canbe expected to cause some reduction in prices paid to all producers deliveringtheir milk to plants located in the present Lake Mead marketing area whenthe orders are merged. However, producers in the Lake Mead area would sharein the 30-cent higher Class I price effective at locations in most of thepresent Great Basin marketing area, which would counteract some of theeffect of the present Great Basin market's lower Class I use on returnsto producers now supplying the Lake Mead market. In 1985, the average uniformprice paid to producers whose milk was pooled under the Great Basin orderwas $12.61. The range in Great Basin uniform prices during 1985 was from$12.07 to $13.74. The average uniform price paid to Lake Mead producersduring 1985 was $12.78, with a range of $12.14 to $13.78. The differencein prices paid to producers under the two orders, therefore, representsjust over 1 percent of the uniform price under either order.Exceptions to the recommended decision filed by Rockview protested themerger of the Lake Mead and Great Basin orders and requested that the LakeMead order be suspended. Rockview argued that at the time of the hearing,only a small percentage of the Class I sales in the Lake Mead marketingarea was distributed by Great Basin handlers, and that no sales by LakeMead handlers were distributed in the Great Basin area. Lacking any overlapin sales, Rockview stated, the only common element between the two ordersis WDCI, the proponent cooperative that pools its members' milk under bothorders. Rockview argued that if the marketing of milk by a common cooperativeassociation is a legitimate basis for merging orders, then a merger ofall of the orders in which WDCI markets milk (Orders No. 134, 135, and137 as well as 136 and 139) should be considered. Rockview stated thatprices to producers would not be equalized by the merger because the 30-centlocation adjustment to be effective at Las Vegas will reduce the pricepaid to Rockview by 30 cents below the announced blend price under theproposed rule, reducing permanently the price paid to Rockview. The handlercharacterized the order merger as ``creating a monopoly on the Class Idollars that are generated in the Lake Mead marketing area for the addedbenefit to the co-op members at the sole cost to Rockview Dairies.''The decision to merge the Great Basin and Lake Mead orders does not basethe need for a merger on the sales competition. The principal reason forthe merger is to remove the incentive for proponent cooperative to haulmilk from common production areas in Utah to southern Nevada plants andback to Utah for processing simply to share in the proceeds of the LakeMead pool. As far as the record indicates, only in the two marketing areasproposed to be merged does the cooperative have producers whose milk issometimes needed at fluid plants in one order area and sometimes must behauled to surplus manufacturing plants in the other order area. Of themilk currently pooled under the present Lake Mead order, the largest proportionis that of cooperative members. The minus 30-cent location adjustment alsowill apply in southern Utah where the cooperative's manufacturing plantfor surplus Lake Mead production is located. Therefore, proponent cooperativewill not realize any higher returns on the present Lake Mead volume ofmilk than will nonmember producers. The decision continues the presentClass I price levels for Las Vegas and Salt Lake City, as proposed by proponents.Suspension or termination of the Lake Mead order would tend to result inthe Great Basin producers carrying the burden of the reserve supply forNevada fluid milk handlers without sharing fully in the Class I proceedsfrom such plants' sales. As Rockview contended, suspension of the orderwould remove the incentive for uneconomical movements of milk. However,the merger would have the same effect. The merger has the added benefitof assuring that Nevada fluid milk plant operators will pay prices thatare comparable to prices paid by the regulated handlers in California andUtah that compete with them for sales in Nevada. Without regulation, theNevada plants would be free to pit Nevada, California and Utah producersagainst each other in bidding for the Nevada sales outlets. Such potentialfor destructive competition among producers is a primary reason for theimplementation of milk orders.In view of the marketing conditions discussed above, separate orders forthe Great Basin and Lake Mead marketing areas are no longer compatiblewith the current marketing practices in these regulated areas. The adoptionof a single regulation for the combined area would insure more orderlymarketing through application of the same regulatory provisions to allhandlers and producers associated with the merged order.The cooperative federation proposed that the order for the merged marketingarea follow the format of the present Lake Mead order, as it was issuedmore recently than the Great Basin order. Proponent pointed out that theprovisions of the two orders do not differ greatly, and the proposed orderincludes most of the provisions of the individual orders except for certainmodifications considered necessary to adapt the proposed order to the marketingconditions existing in the proposed merged marketing area. The provisionscommon to both orders, with certain modifications, have been appropriatein achieving the objectives sought by the regulatory plans for both marketingareas. Accordingly, on the basis of the record evidence, it is found anddetermined that the order provisions common to both orders would be appropriatefor achieving orderly marketing conditions in the proposed merged and expandedmarketing area. Only the significant modifications or specific provisionsthat were at issue will be dealt with in the decision. Wherever possible,the section numbers containing specific provisions have been designatedto conform with the format of order provisions that was incorporated into39 other Federal milk orders in 1974. Uniform numbering between ordersshould facilitate references to specific provisions.The order adopted herein would continue the use of the part number forthe present Lake Mead order, Part 1139, as proposed by the merger proponents.The amended Part 1139, upon issuance, would supersede Part 1136. The mergedmarketing area should retain the name ``Great Basin'', proposed by IMPAas being more descriptive of the territory included in the merged marketingarea than the name ``Lake Mead.'' The name ``Intermountain'' for the marketingarea, also proposed by IMPA, would be more descriptive of a larger marketingarea extending eastward of the boundaries of the proposed merged order.Although the present two orders would no longer exist upon effectuationof the merged Great Basin order, this merger action is not intended topreclude the completion of those procedures that would otherwise have existedunder the separate orders with respect to milk handled prior to the effectivedate of the merger. Such procedures which would need to be completed afterthe effective date of the merger include the announcement of certain classprices and butterfat differentials, submission of reports, computationof uniform prices, payment of obligations, and verification procedures.The provisions of the merged order would apply only to that milk handledafter the effective date of the merger. 3. <T3>Merged and expanded marketing area.</T3> The marketing area of theproposed merged order should include all of the territory in the presentlydesignated marketing areas of the Great Basin and Lake Mead orders. Certainadditional territory between and adjacent to the two present marketingareas also should be part of the proposed merged marketing area. The additionalterritory to be included are the entire Idaho counties of Caribou, Oneidaand Power; Lincoln County, Nevada; the Utah counties of Beaver, Garfield,Kane, Piute, Rich, San Juan and Wayne; and Lincoln County, Wyoming. Previouslyunregulated portions of Cache, Iron and Washington counties, Utah; UintaCounty, Wyoming; and Clark County, Nevada, also would be included. Allterritory within the boundaries of the designated marketing area whichis occupied by government (municipal, State or Federal) reservations, installations,institutions or other establishments, likewise should be a part of themarketing area. Where such an establishment is partly within and partlywithout such territory, the entire establishment should be included inthe marketing area. The merged and expanded marketing area consists of the entire State ofUtah, ten southeastern Idaho counties, the four easternmost Nevada counties,and two counties in the southwest corner of Wyoming. The total populationof the merged and expanded marketing area, according to the 1980 census,was approximately 2,214,500 people, or about 170,700 more people than thetwo separate order areas contain. The territory proposed to be added tothe merged order, therefore, increases the population of the merged marketingarea by less than ten percent over that of the separate marketing areas. The territory to be added to the merged marketing area was proposed forinclusion by IMPA. Proponent described all of the added territory as adjacentto counties presently regulated, sparsely populated, and primarily dependentupon handlers regulated by the Great Basin and Lake Mead orders for dispositionsof fluid milk products. In response to questions, the IMPA witness statedthat there is some distribution in some of the proposed area by handlersregulated under the Southwestern Idaho-Eastern Oregon and Western Coloradoorders, but that dispositions in those portions of the area by Great Basinhandlers predominate. Proponent justified the addition of entire countiesand the presently unregulated portions of counties partially included inthe present marketing areas by explaining that the use of county boundarieswill make it easier for handlers to determine which of their sales of fluidmilk products are inside and which are outside the marketing area. Handlersmust report sales inside and outside the marketing area so that the marketadministrator will have a basis for determining whether or not the handlersmeet pooling qualification standards. The IMPA witness testified that no additional handlers would become regulatedas a result of including the proposed additional territory in the mergedmarketing area. However, in response to questioning, the witness concededthat a manufacturing plant located at Thayne, Wyoming, and operated byIMPA would be included as a pool plant under the pool plant definitionof the proposed order. In addition, he said, several producer-handlerswould be included in the marketing area because of the inclusion of additionalterritory. It is expected that these producer-handlers would be exemptfrom the pooling and pricing provisions of the proposed order. In view of the record evidence regarding marketing conditions in the proposedterritory, and in view of proponent's testimony that such territory issupplied with fluid milk products primarily by handlers currently regulatedunder the two existing orders, the marketing area of the merged ordersshould be defined as proposed. There was no opposition in the hearing recordto the addition of the proposed territory to the marketing area. 4. <T3>Milk to be priced and pooled.</T3> It is necessary to designate clearlywhat milk and which persons would be subject to the merged order. Thisis accomplished by providing definitions to describe the persons, plantsand milk to which the applicable provisions of the order relate. The following definitions included in the proposed order will serve toidentify the specific types of milk and milk products to be subject toregulation and the persons and facilities involved with the handling ofsuch milk and milk products. Definitions relating to handling and facilitiesare ``route disposition,'' ``distributing plant,'' ``supply plant,'' ``poolplant'' and ``nonpool plant''. Definitions of persons include ``producer,''``handler,'' ``producer-handler,'' ``cooperative association,'' and ``federation.''Definitions relating to milk and milk products include ``producer milk,''``other source milk,'' ``fluid milk product,'' ``fluid cream product''and ``filled milk''. Some of these definitions were of particular issueat the hearing or are substantially different than those presently containedin either the Great Basin or Lake Mead orders. Such definitions are discussedbelow. <T3>Pool plant.</T3> It is necessary to establish minimum performance requirementsto distinguish between plants that serve the fluid needs of the regulatedmarket and those that do not serve the market to a degree that warrantstheir sharing in the Class I utilization of the market by being includedin the marketwide pool. The pooling standards for distributing plants,supply plants and cooperative-operated manufacturing plants that are includedin the attached order are the most appropriate means of determining whichplants should be eligible to share in the marketwide pool under the marketingconditions present in the merged marketing area. The pool plant definition of the merged order should be based on that inthe present Great Basin order, with the addition of a plant operated bya cooperative association and located within the marketing area. Certainfeatures of the pooling standards for a distributing plant should be revisedto conform with current marketing conditions existing in the proposed combinedand expanded area. The pooling standards for distributing plants underthe proposed order should reflect the current Great Basin standards oftotal route dispositions and a percentage of receipts, as proposed by proponents.Those standards are 50 percent for the months of September through February,45 percent in March and April, and 40 percent in the months of May throughAugust. The proposed requirement that a pool distribution plant disposeof at least 15 percent of its receipts as route disposition in the marketingarea, also from the present Great Basin order, should also be adopted.However, a modification of the proposed order as published in the hearingnotice that would include milk diverted from a distributing plant as areceipt for purposes of determining pool qualification should not be adopted.Testimony on behalf of IMPA and its post-hearing brief supported the distributingplant percentage pooling standards adopted in this decision, describingthem as varying inversely with the seasonal pattern of milk production.Proponent witness stated that qualification percentages lower than the50 percent standard currently in the Lake Mead order would have no adverseeffects on distributing plants in the Lake Mead market. At the same time,he said, Lake Mead handlers would have no difficulty in meeting the GreatBasin 15 percent in-area requirement rather than the 10 percent of routedisposition required to be sold inside the marketing area by pool plantoperators under the Lake Mead order. There was no disagreement with eitherassertion from any other participants in the proceeding. Although it was not included in its initial proposal as published in thehearing notice, the merger proponent proposed at the hearing that milkdiverted from a distributing plant be included as part of such plants'total supply in determining its qualifications as a pool plant. As thepool distributing plant definitions of both the Lake Mead and Great Basinorders now include diversions to nonpool plants as receipts for determiningpool plant qualifications, the witness explained the omission from theproposal as a typing error. Proponent did not attempt to explain why suchdiversions should be included as receipts for pool qualifications.Two proprietary handlers, K.D.K, Inc. and Gossner Foods, Inc., filed post-hearingbriefs objecting to the inclusion of diverted milk as a receipt in determiningpool plant qualification under the proposed merged order. The handlerscomplained that adoption of such a provision, along with other provisionsproposed by IMPA, such as the inclusion of cooperative manufacturing plantin the pool plant definition, would severely disadvantage the operationsof proprietary handlers vis-a-vis those of cooperatives in retaining theirnonmember producer suppliers and in being able to compete for fluid milkaccounts. Specifically, the handlers asserted that adoption of the proposedcooperative manufacturing pool plant definition (discussed below), IMPAwould be able to pool much more milk than would proprietary handlers withouthaving any greater proportion of milk used in Class I products. Regardless of whether proponent's omission of diversions from the receiptsto be considered in determining the pool qualification of distributingplants was due to a typographical error or not, the record of this proceedingindicates that diversions should not be included as receipts in such determinations.The percentage requirements of the pool distributing plant definition containedin the adopted merged order will be sufficient to ensure that a plant thatqualifies as a pool distributing plant will be engaged primarily in theprocessing and disposition of fluid milk products, and that enough of thosefluid milk products are distributed within the marketing area to demonstratethe plant's involvement in supplying the market's fluid needs. Provisionsintended to limit the amount of milk a handler may associate with the poolwould be included more appropriately under diversion limits. There is noreason to require proprietary handlers to meet standards not required ofa cooperative association. Accordingly, diversions should not be includedas receipts in determining pool distributing plant qualifications.Proponent excepted to the omission from the pool plant definition of adistributing plant's diversions as receipts in determining pool plant qualifications.Proponent's exception, in addition to reiterating its earlier arguments,is based on the fact that the recommended provision would have the effectof lowering the standards to be met by pool distributing plants to lessthan half of the current requirements. Proponent speculated that omissionof diversions from the receipts from which a distributing plant's poolstatus would be computed may, in combination with more liberal limits ondiversions of pooled milk, allow substantial quantities of reserve milkfor other markets to be pooled on the Great Basin order.The pooling standards and diversion limits adopted for the merged orderarea are needed to accommodate the pooling of reserve milk supplies nowassociated with the market. The record does not indicate that there aresubstantial quantities of reserve milk associated with fluid milk distributingplants in other markets that could become regulated under the merged order.The provision of the order that requires 15 percent of a handler's receiptsto be distributed as route disposition within the marketing area for adistributing plant to qualify for pooling should assure that any handlerso qualifying will have a substantial commitment to supplying the GreatBasin market. If a handler from outside the marketing area were to qualifyfor pooling on the basis of in-area sales, however, it is more likely thatthe Great Basin market's blend price would be enhanced by the additionof Class I use rather than diluted by excessive supplies of reserve milk.A provision currently contained in the Great Basin order that allows producermilk delivered by a cooperative to the pool distributing plant of anotherhandler to be included as a receipt at the cooperative's distributing plant,and the amount of such milk assigned to Class I to be included in the cooperativeplant's pool qualification should not be retained in the merged order.Although included in IMPA's proposed order, proponent agreed that the provisionmay not be helpful to the federation under the merged order, given someof the other provisions that were proposed for inclusion. IMPA should experienceno difficulty in associating all of its historical supplies of producermilk with the merged order, and thus should have no need to use other handlers'receipts and dispositions to qualify its own plants. Adoption of the provisionwould only cause the market administrator to make many extra calculationsin determining pool plant qualifications.The definitions of a pool supply plant and a pool plant primarily engagedin the distribution of aseptically processed and packaged fluid milk productsshould be adopted as proposed by IMPA. As noted by proponent witness, thepool supply plant definition is little different from that contained inboth orders now, while the definition of a pool distributing plant disposingof aseptically processed and packaged fluid milk products is the same asthat contained in the present Great Basin order. None of the provisionsof the two definitions was opposed by any interested person.A new category of pool plant, not now defined in either the Great Basinor Lake Mead orders, should be included in the merged order. IMPA proposedthat any manufacturing plant operated by a cooperative association, whichis not covered under the other pool plant definitions and is located withinthe marketing area, be defined as a pool plant.The cooperative would have to deliver at least 45 percent of its producermilk to pool distributing plants during each month or during the 12-monthperiod ending with the current month to continue the pool status of sucha plant.Proponent witness testified that inclusion of the definition of a cooperative-operatedmanufacturing pool plant would allow IMPA to integrate its operations andbetter enable the federation to furnish other handlers with milk, providingsupplemental supplies when needed; absorb surplus milk not needed by otherhandlers; process its own reserve supplies in its members' best interests;reduce the cost of transporting milk from farm to market and maintain itsmembers as producers under the order. The witness explained that IMPA operatesa number of fluid processing plants and manufacturing plants located throughoutthe proposed marketing area to serve the fluid needs of the market andhandle the market's reserve supplies of milk. He said that several of themanufacturing plants, particularly those at Beaver, Utah; Idaho Falls,Idaho; and Thayne, Wyoming, are located near areas of high milk production.From those areas, he stated, producer milk can be shipped directly to distributingplants as needed or delivered to the nearby manufacturing plants when notneeded for fluid use. The witness testified that order provisions requiringcertain percentages of producer milk or a given number of days of productionfor each producer to be received at pool plants each month often requirethe federation to move some milk from the production areas to pool plantswhen it is not needed there. Such movements, he said, often displace other,close-in milk that must, in turn, be moved long distances to manufacturingoutlets.Because IMPA represents a large majority of the producers on the market,the witness claimed, the federation is the most likely source of supplementalmilk supplies for other handlers, and absorbs most of the market's surplusmilk. He introduced data that showed the daily variations in volumes ofmilk delivered to distributing plants and to manufacturing plants, pointingout that most distributing plants receive significant volumes of milk onfive or fewer days per week. Because milk production is relatively constanton a day-to-day basis, daily deliveries to manufacturing plants, as shownby the exhibit, vary accordingly. According to the witness, designationof the cooperative manufacturing plants as pool plants will allow IMPAto provide better service to fluid milk handlers, to handle milk surplusto distributing plant requirements more efficiently, and to reduce thecost of unnecessary shipments to distributing plants for the sole purposeof keeping its producers pooled.Proponent witness emphasized the desirability to the federation of maintainingproducer status under the order for all of its members. He stressed thatthe federation cannot decide which of its members' milk should be pooledand which should not if the federation is not able to qualify all of theirmilk for pooling. Such decision, he claimed, would pit dairy farmers againsteach other for a share of the fluid market. The witness stated that theprincipal source of difficulty in qualifying all of the federation's producermilk for pooling is the fact that Class I use is not increasing as rapidlyas milk production. He described the recent large surge in production asnot only a local but a national problem, and asserted that the cooperativeassociations cannot control production increases. Proponent witness testifiedthat adoption of the proposed pool plant definition would not result ina large volume of currently unpooled Grade A milk becoming eligible forpooling. He said that the only likely source of additional producers thatwould be added to the pool would be dairy farmers currently producing manufacturinggrade milk who may convert their operations to Grade A.In comments filed by proponent on the recommended decision, proponent statedthat making the pool status of any or all cooperative-owned manufacturingplants mandatory may impede the ability of the cooperative associationor federation to maintain the pool status of its members and the market-balancingfunctions of the association. There is no basis in the record of this proceedingto make the pool status of cooperative-owned manufacturing plants mandatory.If the cooperative association requests pool status for any such plantbefore the first day of the month for which pool status is desired, themanufacturing plant may be pooled as long as at least 45 percent of thecooperative's member milk is received at pool distributing plants duringthat month or the 12-month period ending with that month. However, if thecooperative association chooses pool status for some of its manufacturingplants but not for others, both the 45-percent delivery requirement andthe order's diversion limits will apply to all of the cooperative's activitiesin total.Addition of a cooperative manufacturing plant to the pool plant definitionwas opposed in post-hearing briefs filed by Gossner Foods, Inc., and K.D.K.,Inc., two proprietary pool handlers under the present Great Basin order,and in exceptions filed in response to the recommended decision by GossnerFoods. The handlers claimed that the proposed definition would give cooperativeassociations a large advantage over proprietary handlers in being ableto maintain the pool status of their producers. The handlers stated thatallowing member milk deliveries to manufacturing plants to be consideredas deliveries to pool plants would have the effect of liberating the cooperativesfrom the constraints of any diversion limits, particularly in view of thediversion limits proposed by IMPA for other handlers (discussed below).As pointed out in the brief filed by K.D.K., Inc., some of the reasonsbehind IMPA's desire for such a pool plant definition_assuring producersof continuing pool status, reducing the cost of transporting milk fromfarm to market, and handling reserve supplies of milk in the most efficientmanner possible_apply equally to any handler with its own producers.However, some of the reasons for IMPA's proposal for a cooperative manufacturingplant do not apply to proprietary handlers. Proponent witness repeatedseveral times the federation's commitment to supplying the fluid needsof the market, whether through its own fluid processing plants, or as supplementalor full-supply deliveries to other handlers. Proponent also expressed asense of the responsibility of a cooperative's role in absorbing the market'ssurplus milk in manufacturing products. It is apparent from the hearingrecord that adoption of a cooperative manufacturing pool plant definitionwould enable IMPA to supply milk to fluid handlers and handle much of themarket's surplus milk supply more efficiently than is possible under thepresent provisions of the separate orders, while assuring that all of themilk of its member producers remains eligible for pooling. IMPA would beable to oversee the movement of milk to where it is needed and assure thatit is moved most economically without concern about meeting the poolingstandards relating to each plant's supply of milk. At the same time, therequirements that 45 percent of the cooperative's, or federation's, milksupply be received at pool distributing plants during the current monthor the 12-month period ending with the current month would assure thatthe association does not pool large amounts of unneeded supplies of milkunder the order. In effect, the requirement that a particular percentageof a cooperative's milk be received at pool distributing plants would serveas a limit on the ability of the cooperative, or federation of cooperatives,to move milk directly to either pool or nonpool manufacturing plants.The objective desired by proponent in adopting a pool plant definitionthat includes a cooperative manufacturing plant would best be achievedby establishing a percentage requirement of deliveries to pool distributingplants of 45 percent, adjustable upward or downward by 10 percentage pointsby the Director of the Dairy Division as marketing conditions require.IMPA's proposal, as published in the hearing notice, included a requirementthat 60 percent of the cooperative's (or federation's) milk supply be receivedat pool distributing plants in order for the cooperative's manufacturingplants to be pooled. However, after studying more closely IMPA's actualdeliveries to distributing plants, proponent witness stated that 50 percentappeared to be a more realistic number. In suggested order language containedin the post-hearing brief filed on behalf of IMPA, the percentage had declinedto 45 percent, with no explanation or justification. However, examinationof data introduced at the hearing for the two separate orders combinedsupports the 45 percent requirement. Producer milk pooled under the twoseparate orders in 1985 had increased more than 30 percent, while ClassI use increased less than eight percent. As a result, the percentage ofproducer milk used in Class II and III increased more than 10 percentagepoints, to nearly 50 percent. There is no reason to believe that increasein milk production in the merged area will slow very much in the near future,or that Class I use will increase greatly enough to keep pace with productionincreases. In addition, milk production in the area could be increasedby approximately 20 percent by the conversion of IMPA's Grade B producersto Grade A. It would seem prudent, if the delivery requirement of milkto pool distributing plants for cooperative manufacturing pool plants isnot to be obsolete before it is implemented, to set a standard of 45 percent.Although not specifically included in the hearing notice, a provision allowingthe pool plant percentage requirements to be raised or lowered 10 percentagepoints by the Director of the Dairy Division should be adopted. Such atemporary revision of percentage requirements should apply also to pooldistributing plant and pool supply plant standards, and to the limits onthe amount of a handler's milk supply that may be delivered directly fromproducers' farms to nonpool plants. When questioned by the attorney forKraft, Inc., about the desirability of such a provision, the proponentwitness indicated no objection to its inclusion. In the post-hearing brieffiled on behalf of Kraft, Inc., adoption of such provision was supportedas providing ``additional flexibility during a time of changing and uncertainproduction and marketing conditions.'' In view of the difficulty of projectingmilk production and use trends in the marketing area, such a provisionwould make suspension of the percentage pooling standards and diversionlimits unnecessary if milk production increases are greater than anticipated,and would also allow the delivery requirement percentage to be increasedif milk supplies for fluid use become tighter than expected.<T3>Nonpool plant.</T3> The ``nonpool plant'' definition of the mergedorder should specify those categories of plants which are associated withthe market but not to the degree that they should be fully regulated bythe order. As used herein, a nonpool plant means any milk or filled milkreceiving, manufacturing, or processing plant other than a pool plant.A description of the specific categories of nonpool plants included inthe ``nonpool plant'' definition follows.A plant of a ``producer-handler'' would be considered a nonpool plant since,by the nature of the operation, as discussed later, the plant is specificallyexempt from pool status.An ``other order plant'' would be a plant that is fully regulated underanother Federal order. As such, it cannot be a pool plant under this order.As proposed by the merger proponent and adopted herein, an ``exempt plant''means a distributing plant with an average route disposition in the marketingarea of less than 1,000 pounds per day. Also included in the ``exempt plant''definition are a plant operated by a government agency or by a collegeor university and a plant from which all of the route disposition is forcharitable purposes without remuneration. The present Great Basin ordercontains a definition of an ``exempt plant'' as ``a governmental agency,Brigham Young University or any approved plant from which the total routedisposition is to individuals or institutions for charitable purposes andis without remuneration from such individuals or institutions.'' Althoughthe proposed merged order did not include exemptions for the latter descriptionsof plants, proponent witness testified that IMPA would support exempt plantstatus for government agency and college plants as long as such plantsare not engaged in commercial distribution in competition with regulatedhandlers, and for plants operated solely for charitable purposes.Witnesses representing Brigham Young University and the Church of JesusChrist of the Latter Day Saints (LDS Church) testified that the exemptionsfrom regulation currently afforded their milk plants are necessary to theirplants' operations, and that neither institution is involved in commercialsales of fluid milk products. The LDS Church witness stated that the DeseretMilk Plant in Salt Lake City processes its own farm production and distributesmilk products free of charge to the poor and needy, as determined by abishop. He testified that in 1985, the milk plant processed and disposedof approximately 10 million pounds of milk. In order to balance the milkneeds of the plant, he said, approximately 500,000 pounds of surplus milkwas sold to IMPA, and about 175,000 pounds of supplemental supplies werepurchased from IMPA. The witness stated that the LDS plant sells some surplusmilk to IMPA, and has no commercial sales of fluid milk products.The witness representing Brigham Young University (BYU) testified thatthe operation of a dairy herd and a dairy processing plant are essentialfor continuing the University's teaching and research programs in dairyproduction and manufacturing. He stated that the University can affordto operate the farm and plant only if they are fully functional and payingtheir own way by supplying most of the dairy products used in BYU's foodservices system. The witness testified that the BYU dairy operation hasbeen exempt from the terms of the Great Basin milk order for many years,and that such an exemption is necessary for the continued operation ofthe farm and plant. He said that in the past supplemental milk supplieshave been purchased, and that production in excess of campus demand hasbeen sold. At the present time, he stated, approximately one-third of theBYU herd's production is sold as surplus.In testimony at the hearing and in a post-hearing brief, IMPA stated thatplants distributing less than 1,000 pounds of milk per day in the marketingarea would not have a destabilizing effect on the market if such plantsare not regulated. The IMPA witness testified that exemption of plantsonly casually associated with the market would eliminate needless regulation.He stated also that IMPA would support continued exemption for the LDSplant and for the BYU dairy operation on the basis that neither entityis involved in disposing of fluid milk products through commercial channels.At any time such operations engage in competition with regulated handlersby disposing of fluid milk products in commercial channels, he said, theyshould lose their exempt status and become regulated.The ``exempt plant'' definition, as proposed and modified by proponent,should become part of the merged order. A milk handler disposing of lessthan 1,000 pounds of fluid milk per day is not likely to disrupt marketingconditions in a market which disposes of nearly two million pounds of milkper day. In addition, organizations such as the LDS and BYU milk plantsare not in competition with the fully regulated handlers who compete forroute sales in the market. The ``exempt plant'' definition should be constructedin such a way that if such entities were to enter commercial distributionchannels their exemption from regulation would cease.A ``partially regulated distributing plant'' would also be considered tobe a nonpool plant. A partially regulated distributing plant would be adistributing plant that does not qualify as a pool plant and is not another order plant, a producer-handler plant, or an exempt distributingplant. Such a plant would be one from which during the month an averageof 1,000 pounds or more of fluid milk products is disposed of daily asroute disposition in the marketing area, but is not operated by a governmentagency, a college or university, or a charitable institution from whichroute disposition is for charitable purposes and without remuneration.Also, such a plant would distribute less than 15 percent of its receiptsas route disposition within the defined marketing area of the order and/ornot meet the minimum total route disposition requirement of the order.An ``unregulated supply plant'' means a supply plant that does not qualifyas a pool supply plant, an other order plant, a producer-handler plant,or an exempt distributing plant. In essence, it is a plant that transfersmilk to a pool distributing plant, but not to an extent that would qualifyit for pool status under the order.<T3>Handler. </T3>The impact of regulation under an order is primarilyon handlers. The handler definition identifies persons who will have responsibilityfor filing reports and/or making payments for milk under the merged order.As herein provided, the following persons are defined as handlers underthe order:(1) The operator of one or more pool plants;(2) A cooperative association with respect to the milk of producers thatit causes to be picked up at the farms and delivered to a pool plant ordiverted for the cooperative's account to a nonpool plant;(3) A producer-handler;(4) The operator of an other order plant from which milk is disposed ofin the marketing area;(5) The operator of an exempt plant;(6) The operator of a partially regulated distributing plant; and(7) The operator of an unregulated supply plant.All such persons are now defined as handlers under the Lake Mead order,and most are so defined under the present Great Basin order. Each personthat may incur an obligation (reporting and/or financial) under the ordershould be designated a handler. This will assure that all information necessaryto determine their regulatory status under the order can be readily determinedby the market administrator. Proponent witness testified that the proposed definition is essentiallythe same as those contained in the separate orders and is intended to servethe same purpose. Specifically, the definition is nearly identical to theone contained in the present Lake Mead order. Adoption of the proposedhandler definition should help to assure orderly marketing in the mergedmarketing area.<T3>Producer-handler.</T3> The merged order should continue the exemptionnow contained in each of the two individual orders of a ``producer-handler''from the pooling and pricing provisions of the order. Under the mergedorder, the definition of a producer-handler should be essentially the sameas that now contained in the Great Basin order. The amount of fluid milkproducts a producer-handler would be able to purchase from pool or otherorder plants and still maintain its exemption from regulation would beincreased somewhat from 3,000 pounds to 5,000 pounds per month, or 5 percentof the producer-handler's Class I sales, whichever is greater.Proponent witness testified that a farmer who is engaged in distributingits own milk production should be exempt from regulation as long as theoperation of the farm or dairy plant does not involve other milk-producingor processing entities. The witness explained, however, that as long asa producer-handler does not share its Class I disposition with the otherproducers in the pool, the producer-handler should not be able to sharein the Class I proceeds of other producers. He said that there may be timeswhen a producer-handler cannot produce all of its Class I needs, and mayhave to purchase Class I milk from the pool, sharing some of its ClassI use with other producers. At other times, the witness observed, a producer-handlermay need to dispose of surplus milk as a Class III sale to a pool outlet,an action which would not affect other producers.Although the actual order language proposed by proponent would reduce thelimit on the amount of milk a producer-handler would be allowed to purchasefrom pool sources, proponent stated that the limit on the amount of milka producer-handler may purchase from pool sources should be increased becauseof the growth in size of producers in recent years, and an assumption thatproducer-handlers have also grown in size. According to the witness, theregulatory status of handlers currently involved in either order wouldnot change as a result of the proposed changes in the present producer-handlerdefinitions of the Lake Mead and Great Basin orders. There was no othertestimony at the hearing relating to the limits to be placed on a producer-handler'soperations.A primary basis for exempting a producer-handler from the pricing and poolingprovisions of the order is that such a person customarily has a relativelysmall operation and is operating in a self-sufficient manner. The milkthat is processed, packaged and distributed by a producer-handler is obtainedfrom its own production. Any fluctuations in a producer-handler's dailyand seasonal milk needs is met through his own farm production, and anyexcess milk supplies are disposed of at its own expense. Under this arrangement,a producer-handler seldom can be a major competitive factor in the marketfor regulated handlers, nor can such a person have a preferred market forits milk relative to producers who supply the regulated handlers and sharein the proceeds of the marketwide pool.If a producer-handler processes milk from its own farm but also relieson pool plants for substantial supplies, either in bulk or packaged form,its operations are not significantly different than the operations conductedby a pool handler. However, since its operation is not fully regulated,the pool does not receive the benefits of the producer-handler's ClassI sales. And yet, the other producers in the market are bearing the costof balancing its operation by carrying such operator's necessary reservemilk supplies. Such an operator should not have producer-handler statusunder the merged order, but should be accorded pool status similar to thatof any other handler who receives significant amounts of milk from pooledsources.In view of the marketing situation in the merged order, the proposed producer-handlerdefinition should serve to identify and exempt from regulation those entitieswho rely almost entirely on their own milk production to balance theirfluid sales. At the same time, producer-handlers who rely too heavily onpool resources to balance their fluid milk needs would become fully regulatedhandlers, sharing their Class I use with the other producers in the market.According to the market statistics introduced by the market administrator,producer-handler dispositions appear to represent a relatively small partof Class I sales in the Great Basin market and little or none of the ClassI sales in the Lake Mead marketing area. The limits proposed to be placedon producer-handler purchases should be adequate to prevent such personsfrom creating disorderly marketing conditions in the merged marketing area,and should be adopted.Proponent filed an exception to the recommended decision objecting to thelimits established on producer-handler purchases from pool sources. Proponentcited the unusually large size of producers located in the Lake Mead areaand nearby regions of California as the reason producer-handler purchasesshould be limited to the lesser of 5,000 pounds or 5 percent of the producer-handler'sClass I sales rather than the greater of such limits. According to proponent,the pool distributing plants in southern Nevada are not so large that theycould not be fully supplied by any one of a number of producers in thearea. Proponent asserted that the ability of a very large producer-handlerto rely on pool reserves to supplement the quantities of milk representedby one of the southern Nevada pool plants without losing its exemptionfrom regulation could disrupt orderly marketing in that portion of themarketing area.Although proponent's speculation about possible developments in the Nevadaportion of the merged marketing area may be accurate, order provisionsare more appropriately established on the basis of current marketing conditions.At the time of the hearing, there were twelve producer-handlers operatingin the Great Basin marketing area and none in the Lake Mead area. Underthe present terms of the Great Basin order, a producer-handler may purchasethe greater of 3,000 pounds or 5 percent of its Class I sales from poolsources. Adoption of a lower limit on purchases from pool sources of thelesser of 5,000 pounds or 5 percent of the producer-handler's Class I salescould have the effect of regulating some producer-handlers that currentlyare exempt from pooling. There is no basis in the record to make it moredifficult for producer-handlers to avoid full regulation. Accordingly,producer-handlers should be able to purchase the greater of 5,000 poundsor 5 percent of their Class I sales from pool sources.One change to be made in the producer-handler definition as proposed isthat producer-handlers should be able to receive Class I milk from poolsources by diversion directly from producers' farms as well as by transferfrom pool plants. At times, it may be more efficient for a pool handlerto deliver supplemental milk supplies directly from a farm pick-up routethan to pump milk out of a pool plant into a tank truck for delivery tothe producer-handler. Also, allowing such milk to be moved by diversionas well as by transfer will help to forestall incidents in which a producer-handleroperating within the order's limits inadvertently receives a partial loadof diverted milk rather than transferred milk and must be pooled as a result.The effect on the pool of allowing a producer-handler to receive ClassI milk by diversion would be the same as if such milk were received bytransfer, except that the handler selling the milk may be able to handlethe milk more efficiently. <T3>Producer. </T3>The producer definition proposed for the merged orderand adopted in this decision is essentially the same as those in the presentLake Mead and Great Basin orders. However, the provision of the producerdefinition in the Lake Mead order commonly referred to as the ``dairy farmerfor other markets'' provision has been modified by proponent to avoid unnecessarilyrestricting the pooling of milk under the order. The present Great Basinorder contains no such description of a nonproducer, and proponents expressedconcern that adoption of the present Lake Mead provision would make itdifficult to manage the milk supplies marketed in the regulated areas ofIdaho and Wyoming, and in northern Utah. Proponent witness described the present Lake Mead provision as requiringthat all of a producer's milk production for a month be pooled under someFederal order if any of the producer's milk is to be eligible for pooling,beginning with the first day of the month. He explained that the modificationwould allow a producer's milk to be pooled if the producer became associatedwith the market sometime after the first day of the month, but would stillrequire that all of the producer's production for the remainder of themonth be pooled. Proponent supported the change in the provision by observingthat the Grade B producers who convert to Grade A and wish to share inthe pool should not have to wait until the first day of the month followingtheir change in status to do so. In addition, he stated that IMPA sometimesbalances fluid milk needs and handles reserve supplies in cooperation withhandlers in other nearby marketing areas, and that the modification wouldassist the cooperative in the efficient management of such milk supplieswithout allowing producers' pool status to change on a daily basis. The ``dairy farmer for other markets'' exclusion from the producer definitionwould prevent dairy farmers whose milk is regularly used for fluid dispositionin other markets from pooling the surplus part of their production on themerged order and sharing the Class I value of the merged Great Basin poolwith those producers who regularly supply the fluid needs of the mergedorder. Modification of the ``dairy farmer for other markets'' provisionwould prevent it from becoming too restrictive to enable handlers to marketmilk in the most efficient manner possible. <T3>Producer milk. </T3>The order must define clearly which milk is eligibleto be included in the marketwide pool and share in the market's fluid milksales. For this reason, certain minimum standards of association with themarket are determined for individual producers and for all of a handler'sproducers as a group. The merged order should require that all producers``touch base'' by delivering at least one day's production of milk to apool plant each month. Diversion limits on the amount of milk not neededat fluid processing plants that may be delivered directly from producers'farms to nonpool manufacturing plants should be established at 60 percentfor the months of April through August and 50 percent in other months ofthe total milk delivered to pool plants and diverted to nonpool plantsby a handler.Proponent proposed, and argued at the hearing and in a brief, that an appropriatelevel of allowable diversions would be much lower than the limits adoptedin this decision. Proponent based its argument that diversions should belimited to 25 percent in the months of April through August and 15 percentin other months of the producer milk delivered to pool plants by a handleron the expected existence in the merged order of the cooperative-operatedpool manufacturing plant definition adopted in this decision. Because thecooperative would be able to count deliveries to its own manufacturingplants as deliveries to pool plants, proponent witness stated, the cooperative'sneed to divert milk to nonpool plants would be reduced substantially. Inthe post-hearing brief filed on behalf of IMPA, proponent argued that itsproposed diversion limits are nearly the same as those in the present GreatBasin order and should be adopted to serve the same purpose currently servedby those limits. In addition, proponent argued that the 15-percent limitproposed for the months of September through March should be reduced fromthe current Great Basin order's 20-percent limit for the purpose of encouragingmanufacturing plants to release milk to distributing plants during theseason of the year when milk is more likely to be needed for fluid use.Kraft, Inc., proposed that a handler be allowed to divert a quantity ofmilk equal to the volume delivered to pool plants during the months ofApril through August, and 50 percent of the volume of milk delivered topool plants during other months. In effect, a handler would be able todivert 50 percent of its total milk supply to nonpool plants in the monthsof April through August, and 33 percent in other months. In the post-hearingbrief submitted on behalf of Kraft, the diversion limits proposed to beincorporated in the merged order were relaxed to 50 percent of a handler'smilk supply on a year-round basis to better accommodate the present needsof pool handlers.In testimony presented at the hearing, the witness representing Kraft describedthe production and marketing conditions in the present Great Basin marketingarea as unable to support the highly restrictive diversion limits proposedby IMPA. We cited percentages of Class I use in the Great Basin marketfor the months of April through December 1985 that ranged from a low of41.6 percent in June 1985 to a high of 53.6 percent in November 1985. Thewitness then pointed out that the diversion limit percentages proposedby IMPA, at 25 and 15 percent of milk delivered to pool plants, would actuallyrepresent only 20 and 13 percent, respectively, of the total volume ofmilk handled by a diverting handler. The Kraft witness acknowledged thatIMPA would be able to pool all of its member milk within IMPA's proposeddiversion limits if a cooperative manufacturing plant is to be considereda pool plant. He asserted, however, that other handlers would continueto require realistic diversion limits to promote efficient handling becauseof their inability to designate their manufacturing outlets as pool plants.The Kraft witness observed that the diversion limits in both the GreatBasin and Lake Mead orders have been suspended much of the time for thelast several years because IMPA has been unable to operate within the presentlimits of the two orders. Witnesses representing KDK Dairy, Inc., and Gossner Foods, Inc., two proprietaryhandlers pooled under the Great Basin order, testified that the diversionlimits proposed by IMPA for the merged order would be entirely too restrictiveto enable either of those two handlers to maintain the pool status of allof the producers whose milk they currently handle. The witness for KDKtestified that KDK receives all of its milk supply from its own nonmemberproducers, and balances its supply by sending surplus milk to Gossner Foods'cheese plant in Logan, Utah. She stated that KDK is located about 20 milessouth of Salt Lake City and about 100 miles south of the Cache Valley areawhere most of KDK's producers are located. The witness said that when producers'milk is not needed for fluid use at KDK, it can be diverted to the Gossnercheese plant at Logan, Utah, near the producers' location. She describedsuch milk movements as being more efficient and less costly to producersthan shipping the milk to the KDK plant, unloading it, reloading it andshipping it back to Gossner Cheese. Such unnecessary and expensive milkshipments would be required, the witness said, in order to pool KDK's producermilk supply if the restrictive diversion limits proposed by IMPA were adopted.The KDK witness stated that with the recent loss of a major account, KDKhas found it necessary to divert about 50 percent of its producer milksupply to manufacturing use. She explained that it is important to KDKto have a large enough supply of milk available in order to expand salesif the opportunity to do so should arise. She also indicated that it isas important for KDK to be able to pool all of its producer milk supplyas it is for IMPA to be able to maintain the pool status of all of itsmember producers. The brief filed by KDK argued further that KDK and Gossnerboth balance their own supplies of milk and share the same problems ofoperating within the current order provisions as IMPA does. The brief statesthat IMPA would be able to operate within its own proposed diversion limitsonly if the IMPA manufacturing plants are considered pool plants, and thatimposing the proposed limits only on proprietary handlers would be inequitable.The KDK brief, while stating a preference for unlimited diversions, supportedthe Kraft proposal to establish diversion limits at 50 percent during themonths of April through August and 33 percent in other months of a handler'stotal supply of producer milk, in preference to the limits proposed byIMPA.  A representative of Gossner Foods testified that diversion limits shouldbe established at a level that would allow a handler to divert 50 percentof its milk supply on a year-round basis. The witness described Gossner'sfluid milk business as an aseptic packaging and processing pool plant.In addition, he said, Gossner operates a cheese factory through which itbalances the milk supply for its fluid milk plant. The witness said thatGossner's aseptic fluid milk sales are primarily to the military, and explainedthat Gossner needs reserve supplies of milk large enough to enable thehandler to bid on contracts which, if accepted, might double Gossner'soutput and result in a need for more producer milk receipts. Further, ina brief filed by Gossner, the handler stated that the reserve supply ofmilk which must be available to fill contracts must be of a dependablyhigh quality that will enable the milk to withstand the high sterilizingtemperatures required for aseptically packaged fluid milk products. Thehandler stated that it is important for Gossner to receive milk from itsown group of producers in order to work with the producers to ensure thathigh quality milk receipts are available to fill contracts. The post-hearing brief filed by Gossner advocated that the order containno limits on the volume of producer milk that may be diverted to nonpoolplants if, as a result of adopting the cooperative pool manufacturing plantdefinition, IMPA would be subject to no such limit on diversions. In thebrief the handler described diversion limits affecting proprietary handleroperations under such circumstances as discriminatory. Gossner stated thatall producers associated with the present Great Basin order should havetheir total production pooled and priced, asserting that the IMPA witness'testimony to the effect that the federation cannot pool the milk of somecooperative members and fail to pool others' is applicable to nonmembersas well. In fact, the handler observed, a cooperative's ability to reblendmonies received from the marketwide pool among its members makes pool statusmuch less important to individual cooperative members than to nonmembers.In lieu of continuing the present situation, in which diversion limitsare suspended, Gossner advocated adoption of a limit on diversions of 50percent of a handler's total producer milk supply. It is true that adoption of the cooperative pool manufacturing plant definitionwould, for all practical purposes, exempt IMPA from the effects of theorder's diversion limits by changing the status of the federation's manufacturingplants from nonpool plants to pool plants. However, the provision of thecooperative pool manufacturing plant definition that requires that a cooperativeassociation deliver at least 45 percent of the total supply of its memberproducer milk to pool distributing plants would, in effect, require thesame standard of performance of IMPA as the diversion limits require ofother handlers in the market. It is obvious from the testimony of the witnesses representing KDK Dairyand Gossner Foods, as well as from the market statistics, that the diversionlimit percentages proposed by IMPA are much too restrictive to allow otherhandlers to operate their milk plants or to handle their producer milksupplies efficiently or economically. The percentage of producer milk usedin Classes II and III has been increasing in recent months and, as producermilk increases continue, the rate of increase of milk surplus to the fluidneeds of the market shows no sign of abating. The diversion limits of bothof the present orders have been found too restrictive for some time now,a fact reflected by the suspension of those limits for much of the lastseveral years. Establishing diversion limits even more restrictive thanthose in the present Great Basin order would ensure that the milk of someproducers in the market would fail to be pooled, or that the limits wouldhave to be suspended as soon as the merged order is effective. The diversion limits adopted in this decision are only somewhat more liberalthan those contained in the present Lake Mead order. Relaxation of thepresent Lake Mead diversion limits for the merged order is necessary becauseof the historically greater use of milk in Class II and III in the GreatBasin marketing area than under the Lake Mead order, and the predominantlygreater share of the milk to be pooled under the merged order representedby present Great Basin production. While it is true that allowing IMPA to pool its manufacturing plants willsolve the over-diversion problems experienced by the cooperatives, theexistence of pool manufacturing plants should not be a basis for narrowlylimiting the amount of milk that may be diverted to nonpool plants by otherhandlers. Unnecessarily restrictive diversion limits would continue toencourage inefficient handling of producer milk by handlers that use nonpoolmanufacturing plant outlets to dispose of their surplus milk. The samedata that supports a requirement that a cooperative association deliveronly 45 percent of its member producer milk to pool distributing plantsin order to pool its manufacturing plants also supports diversion limitsthat would allow other handlers to qualify all of their producer milk supplyfor pooling on the basis of delivering approximately the same percentageof their milk to pool distributing plants as cooperatives are requiredto deliver.Gossner Foods, Inc., submitted an exception to the recommended decisionthat advocated the deletion of all diversion limits and ``touch-base''requirements from the merged order. Gossner contends that any dairy farmerproducing Grade A milk should be entitled to share in the marketwide pool,and that handlers should not have to determine which producers may participatewhen the entire quantity of each producer's production is available andmeets the requirements for fluid use. Although the Great Basin order'sdiversion limits have been suspended since January 1985, and its ``touch-base''requirements have been suspended since July 1985, there is no record evidencethat indicates that the continued absence of such provisions would be beneficialto the marketing area. There is no way of assuring which producer milkis available and qualified for fluid use unless it is delivered, at leastoccasionally, to a fluid milk processing plant. Furthermore, all producerswho share in the benefits of marketwide pooling should bear some responsibilityfor assuring an adequate supply of milk for the market's fluid needs.Exceptions to the recommended decision filed by proponents included anexplanation of proponents' assertion that cooperative associations, becauseof their role of carrying and marketing reserve supplies for other handlersin the market, are entitled to wider latitude under the order in the applicationof provisions pertaining to the amount of milk such associations are ableto pool. According to proponent, handlers that have only fluid milk operationsmay not need any diversion privileges at all but can rely on the cooperativefor any needed reserve milk supplies. Proponent states that giving fluidmilk handlers the same diversion limits that cooperatives operate within,in effect, gives cooperative associations much less flexibility in poolingtheir member milk than proprietary handlers have in pooling the milk oftheir nonmember producers. However, the hearing record shows clearly thatin the Great Basin market there are at least two proprietary handlers thatdo not rely on reserve supplies of milk obtained from cooperative associations,but carry their own reserve supplies. Limiting the percentage of diversionsthat these handlers would be allowed under the order to the very low leveladvocated by proponents would have the effect of requiring these handlersto obtain their reserve milk supplies from proponents. Such a provision,especially in a market in which the principal cooperative association isone of the primary competitors for fluid milk distribution, would createan unwarranted anticompetitive marketing situation.Federal milk orders customarily do not contain differing diversion allowancesfor cooperative associations and proprietary handlers. There is no basisin the record of this proceeding to provide for more liberal diversionlimits for cooperative associations than for proprietary handlers. To theextent that proponent does carry some responsibility for balancing thefluid milk needs of the market, the provision allowing a cooperative association-ownedmanufacturing plant located within the marketing area to be considereda pool plant is intended to assist proponent in maintaining the pool statusof the milk of its members.Diversion limits for the months of September through March should be 50percent of the total milk supply of a handler. For the months of Aprilthrough August, the limit on the proportion of a handler's milk supplythat may be diverted to nonpool plants should increase to 60 percent. Becausemilk production and consumption vary seasonally, there should be some recognitionof the fact that more milk will have to be diverted to manufacturing usesduring some periods of the year than during others. As proposed by IMPA,diversion limits should allow more milk to be delivered directly to nonpoolplants during the months of April through August than during Septemberthrough March. Statistics for the Great Basin and Lake Mead marketing areasfor 1984 and 1985 indicate that the percentage of milk used in Class IIand Class III is higher during the months of April through September thanin other months. As a consequence, higher percentages of milk must be divertedduring those spring and summer months than during the fall and winter.September, however, is the traditional month for schools to resume classesand therefore, for Class I consumption in schools to increase. Consequently,September should not be included with the months during which diversionlimits would be increased.In Kraft's brief it was suggested that if in the event of over-diversionsthe handler fails to designate which milk is to be excluded from the pool,the market administrator should first exclude the last milk diverted duringthe month in lots of an entire day's production until the diversion limitis reached. There is no testimony in the record to support such a procedure,which could be a sizable administrative burden for the market administrator.As proposed by IMPA, the merged order directs that if the diverting handlerfails to designate which producers' milk is not to be producer milk, noneof the handler's diverted milk shall be producer milk. Such a provisionshould ensure that an over-diverting handler will not neglect to designatewhich producer milk should not be pooled.An additional modification to the producer milk definition suggested bya Kraft representative at the hearing and included in Kraft's post-hearingbrief should be adopted. Provision should be made in the merged order forthe Director of the Dairy Division to adjust diversion limits up or downby 10 percentage points. Such a provision will provide additional flexibilityin providing for efficient disposal of surplus milk or assuring adequatesupplies of milk for fluid uses at a time when production tends and marketingconditions are changing and uncertain. No parties present at the hearingobjected to the inclusion of such a provision in the merged order.<T3>Federation. </T3>A definition of the term ``federation'' should beincluded in the merged order, as originally proposed by IMPA. A federationshould be defined in the order as a business organization incorporatedunder state law that is owned and operated by two or more cooperative associations.Most of the references to cooperative associations in the order will alsorefer to federations. At the hearing, IMPA's witness testified that sucha definition would not be necessary because the four individual cooperativeassociations of which Intermountain Milk Producers Association is composedwere planning to merge their organizations into one cooperative associationby the time the merger proceeding would be completed. However, all of thedescriptions of marketing conditions in the merged marketing area includedreferences to IMPA as a federation and were based on the organizationalstatus of the cooperatives that then existed. Until there is evidence thatthe federation has ceased to exist, the definition should be included inthe order.5. <T3>Multiple component pricing. </T3>IMPA included in its proposed mergedorder a plan to price milk according to its content of protein and butterfat,as well as the differential values of milk used in Class I and Class II.The proposed pricing plan, with some modifications, should be adopted.Under the component pricing plan adopted herein, handlers' obligationsfor producer milk used in Class I will not be affected by the protein contentof the milk.At the present time under the Lake Mead and Great Basin orders, and undernearly all of the other Federal milk orders, milk received by handlersis priced according to the pounds of producer milk allocated to each classof use multiplied by the prices per hundredweight of milk testing 3.5 percentbutterfat, as determined under the orders for each class of use. Adjustmentsfor such items as overage, reclassified inventory, location and other sourcemilk allocated to Class I are added to or subtracted from the classifieduse value of the milk. The resulting amount is divided by the total producermilk in the pool to calculate a price per hundredweight of milk testing3.5 percent butterfat to be paid to producers for the approved milk theyhave delivered to handlers. The price paid to each producer is then adjustedaccording to the specific butterfat test of the producer's milk by meansof a butterfat differential. The butterfat differential is computed bymultiplying the wholesale selling price of Grade A (92-score) bulk butterper pound at Chicago, as reported for the month by the U.S. Departmentof Agriculture, by .115.The IMPA witness advocated adoption of the proposal to price protein containedin producer milk on the basis that higher levels of protein in milk improvethe yield of manufactured products in which the milk is used, and therebyincrease returns to the handler using such milk. Therefore, the witnessstated, milk containing a higher level of protein has a greater value,and should be priced accordingly. He testified that nearly all of the milksurplus to the fluid needs of the Lake Mead and Great Basin marketing areasis processed into cheese at nonpool plants located in and around the marketingareas. He described cheese as a product whose yield is largely a functionof the protein content of the milk from which it is made, and stated thatall of the cheese plants he had surveyed in or near the marketing areapay producers on the basis of the protein content of their milk, or onthe basis of formulas which attribute cheese yield to the nonfat, or protein,and butterfat solids in producer milk.The witness argued that the value of butterfat in milk has been reflectedin payments for milk for decades, and that protein should not be treatedany differently. In fact, he asserted, demand conditions for milk and dairyproducts have changed considerably over the years, and as a result thevalue of protein in milk has become more important than the value of butterfat.The witness cited the changing relationship between the prices of cheeseand butter as an example of the shift in relative values of the two components.Prices cited for 1920 through 1980 indicate that cheese has risen in pricerelative to butter from less than half of the value of butter in 1920 tomore than the value of butter in 1980. The witness stated, however, thatup to the present time protein contained in producer milk has been pricedat the same level as the water in which it is contained, while it clearlyis of much greater value than water. He stated that under the present orderprovisions a producer is paid the same price for milk that will produce11 pounds of cheese as for milk that will produce 9 pounds of cheese. Thewitness argued that producers should be given an incentive to increasetheir production of protein relative to water in milk by being paid forprotein at a level that reflects its value in manufactured products.Proponent witness testified that the ability of unregulated handlers topay producers according to the protein content of their milk gives theman unfair advantage over pooled handlers, who must pay producers at leastthe order's minimum uniform price. Pooled handlers, therefore, are notallowed to pay producers less than the order's minimum price for milk oflow protein content, although they are allowed to pay a premium for milkof high protein content. According to the witness, nonpool handlers consequentlyenjoy an advantage in procuring higher-protein milk supplies, and pooledhandlers are left with milk of a lower protein test. The IMPA witness assertedthat the declared policy of the Agricultural Marketing Agreement Act of1937 would be effectuated by adoption of the use of protein in the pricingof milk under Federal milk orders because of the Act's requirement thatprices to handlers be uniform. The witness argued that payment of the sameprice for milk which will yield different amounts of the same product isinequitable pricing.According to the proponent witness many milk handlers, including proponentwho represents a substantial majority of the producers in the proposedmerged marketing area, currently pay producers at least partially on thebasis of protein and have encountered no difficulty in so doing. An expertwitness in the field of dairy chemistry testified that protein testingis indeed feasible and widely practiced in the dairy industry. He statedthat although testing milk for any component, including butterfat, is notan exact science, the currently accepted methods of testing for the proteincontent of producer milk can be used to provide fair and equitable resultson which payments for producer milk may be made. The expert witness testifiedthat the accepted methods of testing producer milk for protein vary greatlyin the cost of equipment and expertise required to perform the testing.He stated that one of the tests available is a better determinant of proteinin milk than the Babcock test (the primary test for butterfat) is of butterfat,and that a lab technician's ability to obtain the same results with repeatedtesting is at least as good with one of the secondary protein tests aswith the Babcock test. The expert witness described milk protein as distributeduniformly throughout the skim portion of milk. He stated that because ofthis characteristic of protein it is much easier to obtain a representativesample of milk for protein testing than for butterfat testing.The IMPA witness testified in favor of using the price per pound of proteinand butterfat to determine the value of those components in producer milk,rather than adjusting a uniform price to producers by the differentialvalue of each component as is done currently in the case of butterfat.In addition, under the proposal producers would receive their share ofthe added value in the market's Class I and Class II utilization by meansof a ``weighted average differential'' price.Proponent recognized the difficulty of pricing protein used in Class Iproducts, citing the widely-held belief in the fluid milk industry thatconsumers are not willing to pay for extra protein in fluid milk at a ratethat would equal its value in other uses. Therefore, proponent proposeda negative adjustment to be made to the pool obligation of a handler whoseaverage of protein in producer milk is higher than in the market as a whole,and who tests all of his receipts and milk used in his plant for protein.In his testimony, proponent witness stressed the importance of completetesting and accounting for both butterfat and protein in all receipts andfinished products. However, testimony in the record indicated that reliabletests of protein content are not available for some manufactured products,and that such a requirement would necessitate substantial additional expendituresfor testing and accounting on the part of regulated handlers. Accordingly,the testing and accounting requirements were revised in proponent's briefto require that all fluid milk and cream products and fluid milk, creamand nonfluid receipts used in manufactured products be tested for butterfatand protein content and accounted for accordingly.Other witnesses, who have dealt with protein pricing systems in other areasof the country, testified in favor of recognizing the value to handlersof protein in producer milk by adjusting payments to producers accordingto the protein content of their milk. The manager of a Wisconsin-basedcooperative association with wide experience over a five-year period inmarketing milk priced solely on the basis of protein and butterfat statedthat protein pricing benefits handlers, producers and consumers. The witnesstestified that consumer demand has changed the relative values of skimmilk and butterfat over time, shifting value from butterfat to skim milkand to the products such as cheese whose yield is affected by the proteincontent of skim milk. He said that handlers prefer a system which recognizesthe effect of the composition of their producer milk receipts on the amountof finished product they are able to obtain from it. In addition, he testified,producers receive a signal to respond to price incentives by selectingcows on the basis of total protein and fat production. The witness asserted that the operating efficiency of the entire dairyindustry will be improved if milk is priced on the basis of the value ofits protein or nonfat components, as well as its butterfat content. Hepredicted a reduction in the volume of milk produced combined with an increasedpercentage of protein and butterfat in the milk, with the result of enablingprocessing plants to operate more efficiently. As milk production and processingbecome more efficient, and therefore more profitable for producers andprocessors, he stated, consumers may benefit from the increased efficiencyof the industry. The Wisconsin cooperative manager testified that acceptedtesting procedures for protein yield more consistent and repeatable resultsthan the commonly-used butterfat tests. He indicated that his associationhas had no difficulty in testing, accounting or paying for milk on thebasis of protein as well as butterfat. A representative of an Iowa-based Midwest cooperative association testifiedthat his association has been paying bonuses for protein in its members'milk since 1973. He stated that cooperative members are paid a bonus forprotein tests above a 3.2 percent base, and that a deduction is made formilk testing below 2.9 percent protein. According to the witness, membersperceive protein payment as equitable, and cooperative management favorsthe incentive created by such payments for the production of milk highin solids and high in cheese yield. The witness stated that Grade B producersare paid a higher rate for high protein content than is paid to Grade Aproducers because the milk of the Grade B producers is used in manufacturedproducts where higher protein content results in increased yield, whileGrade A milk is used in fluid milk where no gain is realized for higherprotein content. A witness associated with the California dairy industry testified thatmultiple component pricing has been used under the California State orderfor approximately 20 years, and that he favors it wholeheartedly. He statedthat an adequate testing system, while expensive, is accurate and completelysatisfactory. However, the California witness asserted that full accountingfor protein as well as butterfat in all receipts and uses in a milk plantwould be a nightmare for handlers. He stated that both protein and nonfatsolids in milk can be tracked with the skim milk from which they cannoteasily be separated and within which they are uniformly distributed. Healso expressed the opinion that protein should be priced in all products,not just manufactured items, and that minimum standards of protein contentshould be established and enforced for all packaged milk. A representative of the cheese-making industry testified that there isno doubt that protein has value in milk used to make cheese because ofthe direct relationship between the protein content of the milk and theamount of cheese that may be made from that milk. He also stated that thecheese-making organizations he heads believe that Federal orders must bemodified to recognize the values of protein in milk. However, he expressedconcern that the proposed pricing plan would apply the same price to proteinin all uses when its value in different dairy products varies somewhat.He also expressed misgivings about the use of the skim milk value of theMinnesota-Wisconsin price and the market-wide average of protein to establisha value for protein. He explained that the protein content of milk producedin Minnesota and Wisconsin that is used in the computation of the ``M-W''price, which is used as a price determinant under all milk orders, is greaterthan the protein content of milk produced in Utah and Nevada. He expressedthe belief that as a result of the difference in protein content betweenthe two areas, the proposed procedure for determining a value for proteinmay result in overvaluing that component in the merged Great Basin area.The witness suggested that the order allow handlers to make deductionsfrom producer payments for milk low in protein, in the same way that handlerscurrently pay premiums for higher-than-average levels of protein in producermilk. Such a solution, he suggested, would allow handlers to pay producerson the basis of the protein content in their milk, but would avoid incorporatinga system of protein pricing within the order. One reservation about the proposed pricing plan voiced by most of the witnesseswho supported the adoption of some form of multiple component pricing isits inability to address the problem posed by the presence of somatic cellsin milk. According to testimony in the hearing record, somatic cells occurnaturally in milk. However, in the presence of infections such as mastitis,somatic cell numbers multiply greatly and produce enzymes that break downthe casein component of milk protein that contributes to cheese yields.These witnesses urged that any protein pricing system, to be effective,should incorporate some type of quality payment schedule based on the somaticcell count of a producer's milk. The notice of hearing in this proceeding included no reference to the considerationof any payment adjustments for somatic cell counts. The question of somaticcell counts and their effect, as well as other quality considerations constituteseparate issues which should more appropriately be addressed at anotherproceeding with proper notice and opportunity for both opponents and proponentsto prepare testimony.In exceptions filed to the recommended decision, Kraft, Inc., stated thatfailure to account for the presence of somatic cells in producer milk isa serious defect in the proposed protein pricing plan because of the detrimentaleffect a high number of such cells has on cheese yields, even in high-proteinmilk. The handler requested that the hearing be reopened, at least forfurther briefing and receipt of evidence, for the purpose of includingsomatic cell adjustments. Kraft argued that the issue of protein pricingclearly includes the subsidiary issue of the effect of somatic cell presenceon protein value, as many witnesses testified at the hearing. Exceptionsfiled by the Holstein-Freisian Association of America to the inclusionof protein pricing in the order included the comment that tests for proteinin producer milk are flawed by their inability to adjust for the presenceof somatic cells.As previously stated, although there was much discussion of the effectof somatic cells on the value of protein in producer milk, the possibilityof making any payment adjustments for somatic cell counts was not adequatelynoticed. As a consequence, unacceptable levels of somatic cell counts andappropriate value adjustments for differing levels of somatic cells cannotbe formulated on the basis of the record in this proceeding. In addition,the need for such adjustments in the context of the protein pricing schemecontained herein was not adequately established. This record adequatelysupports the protein payment plan contained in this rulemaking. Therefore,Kraft's request for a reopened hearing is denied. There is no reason forfurther delay in the present proceeding. Any adjustments in protein pricefor somatic cells or other quality factors which may be considered necessaryin the future may be the subject of another hearing if the pricing systempresented here proves to be in need of such adjustments.Opposition to the multiple component pricing proposal came from severalfluid milk handlers regulated under the Great Basin order, and from a nationaltrade association for dairy product processors. The witness for the tradeassociation expressed concern that a lack of readily available and efficientmethods of testing for protein may lead to non-uniform or unequal raw productcosts for handlers. He also was opposed to including any Class I productsand some Class II products in a component pricing scheme because the valueof such products is not affected by their protein content. Additionally,the witness stated that there is no readily available method for handlersto extract protein or nonfat solids from the milk they receive, and thereforeno advantage to a Class I or Class II processor in receiving high proteinmilk.Another feature of the proposed payment plan opposed by the trade associationrepresentative was the requirement that a handler report and account forthe protein contained in all incoming milk and finished products. The witnessexpressed a preference for a ``used-to-produce'' concept, under which allof the milk going into a product must be tested and all of its componentsaccounted for, but which would not require the finished product itselfto be tested. He described the available tests for protein as dangerousand expensive to perform, requiring specialized personnel and equipment.In addition, he stated that the officially recognized protein tests arenot appropriate for determining the protein content of all dairy products.The witness suggested that the percentage of protein contained in a handler'smilk receipts may be assumed to remain constant regardless of the productin which it is used. He stressed the importance of an efficient, practical,uniform and reliable testing program to assure equity between handlersand producers, and expressed doubt that present testing technologies areadequate to fulfill such conditions.A further concern voiced by the trade association representative was thatthe price alignment of milk used in the same products in different marketingareas be maintained. He expressed scepticism that competition among handlersin adjoining markets can remain fair if a handler in one market who mustpay for his milk on the basis of its protein content competes for saleswith a handler in another market who does not pay for milk based on itsprotein content.An expert witness testifying on behalf of the trade association expressedconcern that the testing procedures necessary to implement a protein pricingsystem are too expensive for most fluid milk handlers to justify on thebasis of the benefits to be enjoyed from such testing, both in terms ofcapital costs and in terms of salaries that would have to be paid to techniciansmore highly trained than a milk plant would otherwise need to employ. Inaddition, he testified, handlers' accounting and recordkeeping costs wouldincrease as a result of such a pricing plan, as would the probability ofextra costs associated with overages and excess shrinkage resulting fromtesting inaccuracies. The witness also observed that the protein contentof nonfat solids varies significantly. Therefore, he stated, a plant thatdoes not make cheese does not have any use for protein testing in controllingthe solids content of its Class I and Class II finished products, evento determine whether its products meet the minimum identity standard fornonfat solids content.Three fluid milk handlers currently pooled under the Great Basin orderwho opposed the proposed multiple component pricing plan also objectedto the extra costs of testing and accounting for the protein, as well asthe butterfat, in all of their receipts and finished products. The handlersfound it especially unfair that they be expected to assume such an addedcost burden in order to account for a component that does not enhance thevalue of the products they process and sell. Another feature of the proposalto which they objected was the deduction to be made from handlers' obligationsin the case of handlers whose Class I milk contains a higher protein percentagethan the marketwide average. Such a provision, they contended, would resultin inequitable pricing for Class I use between handlers, with handlersreceiving lower-protein milk paying less for it than handlers receivingmilk containing the marketwide average percentage of protein or more. Insuch a case, the low-protein milk would be worth as much used in fluidmilk products as milk containing more protein, although the costs to handlerswould differ. The handlers complained that such a provision would failto carry out the requirement of the Agricultural Marketing Agreement Actof 1937 that Federal milk orders establish uniform prices between handlers.The protein content of milk received and used by handlers should be considered,along with butterfat and volume, as a factor in determining the value ofproducer milk under the order. Failure to include the effect of proteinvariations on the use value of milk in a marketing area in which a substantialvolume of unregulated milk is subject to multiple component pricing canbe expected to cause, and apparently has caused, serious problems for regulatedhandlers competing for the procurement of producer milk with the operatorsof nonpool plants who have a supply of pooled milk. In addition, it iseconomically sound in such circumstances to recognize additional valuein milk with a higher-than-average protein content by paying more for suchmilk. There was no disagreement among hearing participants that, all things beingequal, milk containing a higher percentage of protein will result in greateryields of most manufactured products than milk with a lower protein test.If a handler receives milk that will result in greater volumes of finishedproducts such as cheese or cottage cheese than the same volume of milktesting lower in protein, the handler should be required to pay more forthe higher-testing milk. At the same time, the dairy farmer producing milkthat yields greater amounts of finished product deserves to be paid morefor it than a dairy farmer producing the same volume of milk that resultsin less product yield. The reason producers have been paid partly on thebasis of the butterfat content of their milk for decades is that butterfatis a component of milk which affects the amount of butter that can be manufacturedfrom a given amount of milk. Butter has value, and therefore additionalbutterfat in milk increases the value of the milk. A handler is requiredto pay for the butterfat in the milk he receives, and it is not unreasonablethat he be required to pay for the protein in his milk receipts if proteincontent is a factor in determining the value of milk as it is used. Rockview Dairy, the nonmember producer supplying milk to Anderson Dairy,filed exceptions that included an objection to receiving payment on thebasis of the protein content of its milk. According to Rockview, it isnot appropriate to price Rockview's pooled production on the basis of itsprotein content because all of its pooled production is supplied to a fluidmilk handler and all of its surplus milk is marketed outside the order.Unless the protein content of Rockview's milk varies significantly fromthe marketwide average of protein in producer milk, payments to Rockviewas a result of protein pricing should not vary markedly from present paymentlevels. All producers participating in the marketwide pool should be paidon the same basis. If producers whose milk is used only in fluid productsare not paid on the basis of the protein in their milk, as other producersare, the logical result would be a decline in the protein content of fluidmilk products as producers whose milk is higher in protein content shiftfrom fluid outlets to those which enjoy an economic benefit from the proteincontent in producer milk. An exception by the Holstein-Freisian Association of America to the useof multiple component pricing under a Federal order stated that the Departmenthas rejected component pricing in the past, and that those decisions shouldbe studied in the context of reevaluating the recommended decision. However,no prior hearing relating to the adoption of component pricing under aFederal order has ever been held. This decision, therefore, is not a departurefrom a long-established policy. The only basis on which this decision shouldbe examined is the record of the current proceeding and its compliancewith the provisions of the Agricultural Marketing Agreement Act of 1937.Those testifying at the hearing agreed that cheese is the manufacturedproduct whose yield is most affected by the protein content of the milkused to produce it. It is apparent that an overwhelming proportion of theproducer milk pooled under the Great Basin and Lake Mead orders and surplusto the fluid needs of those markets is used to produce cheese. Exhibitsin the record show that 85 percent of the Class II and Class III milk pooledon the Lake Mead and Great Basin markets was used to produce cheese in1984, and 89 percent in 1985. Given the percentages of milk used in theseclasses in the two markets, 38.2 percent of the total producer milk pooledon the Lake Mead and Great Basin markets in 1984 was used in cheese andcottage cheese, and 49.6 percent in 1985. Therefore, it is appropriatein these areas to price milk on the basis of its protein content to theextent that protein content affects the value of the milk in the end use.An exception to the recommended decision filed by the Holstein-FreisianAssociation of America stated that producers should be compensated forall of the fat and nonfat solids produced and delivered to handlers. TheAssociation stated that the nutrients and minerals in whey have economicvalue and represent marketable products beyond the casein portion for cheese.Accordingly, the Association urged that total nonfat solids replace proteinas a basis for payment of producers under the merged order. It is recognized that nonfat non-protein solids in producer milk have value.However, because the overwhelmingly predominant use of surplus milk inthe Great Basin market is in cheese, protein is the most appropriate componentof producer milk on which to base payment for nonfat solids in this market.Because the price to be paid for protein represents the total value ofthe skim portion of the Minnesota-Wisconsin price, producers will receivethe full value of the nonfat solids contained in their milk. That valuewill be distributed to producers on the basis of the protein tests of theirmilk.While protein content was seen to be critical in establishing the valueof milk used in cheese, there was no evidence that protein content hasany effect on the value of fluid milk products at all. On the contrary,there appears to be general agreement that consumers are not willing topay more for fluid milk with a higher-than-average protein content thanthey are for low-protein milk. Handlers cannot easily remove protein fromfluid milk products to add it to products in which it would have value,and it is illegal for them to add water to milk to reduce its protein content.Therefore, handlers obtain no discernable difference in economic benefitfrom the various levels of protein contained in milk used in fluid milkproducts, and there is no justification for requiring them to pay for suchmilk according to its protein content.Regardless of doubts voiced by those opposing adoption of a multiple componentpricing plan under the order, there is no reason to believe that the problemsinvolved in adopting such a plan are insurmountable. It is clear from testimonyin the hearing record that pricing milk on the basis of its protein aswell as its butterfat content is practiced in other areas of the U.S. andamong most, if not all, of the cheese processors in the proposed mergedmarketing area, as well as by the group of cooperative organizations representinga substantial majority of the producers in this area. Although opponentsof the proposed pricing plan expressed reservations about the accuracyand reliability of present methods of testing for protein, other testimonyindicates that those testing methods are at least as adequate as butterfattesting for purposes of determining handler obligations and payments toproducers.There was some difference of opinion between witnesses about whether higherprotein content results in greater yield of such Class II products as icecream, dips and yogurt. Because the protein price is derived from the valueof skim milk, the difference caused by valuing a relatively small amountof milk at the protein price rather than at the skim milk price can beexpected to be negligible. Therefore, protein pricing should apply to allproducer milk used in Class II and Class III. There is no point in creatingspecial categories of Class II and Class III use for products that wouldnot be subject to protein pricing when the protein pricing plan adoptedin this decision would cause little change in most handlers' pool obligations.Additionally, those products represent a very small percentage of the totalmilk in the pool.Kraft, Inc., a proprietary plant operator which is not a handler undereither the Great Basin or Lake Mead order, and the Milk Industry Foundation,a trade association of proprietary plant operators, filed exceptions tothe inclusion of Class II products in the component pricing provisionsof the merged order. Kraft also requested that the Secretary reopen thehearing for further briefing or for the receipt of evidence supportingthe segregation of Class II products that receive no economic benefit fromhigher protein content from inclusion in protein pricing. The exceptionsincorrectly attributed the rationale for pricing producer milk used inClass II on the basis of its protein content solely to the fact that thoseproducts represent a small percentage of the total milk in the pool. Inaddition, Kraft's comments stated that separate ice cream or yogurt plantswould have all of the milk used in the production of those products pricedunder a plan that shows no evidence of economic justification.As the paragraph dealing with the application of protein pricing to milkuse in Class II products clearly states, the value of protein in skim milkwill be equivalent to the value of the skim milk under the order's presentprovisions unless the protein content of the milk in question deviatessignificantly from the marketwide average. Therefore, there should be nomaterial changes in cost to handlers for milk of average or near-averageprotein content used in Class II. Furthermore, stand-alone ice cream oryogurt plants are not pool plants, and will not be required under the orderto pay for their milk receipts on the basis of their protein content. Thereis no purpose to be served by reopening the hearing for further briefingor evidence, other than delay. The record of this proceeding provides adequateinformation upon which to base this decision.Other objections raised by witnesses to the implementation of a multiplecomponent pricing system within the order present no great obstacles tothe adoption of such a system. The possibility that pricing milk on thebasis of its protein content in one order may create competitive problemsfor handlers if milk in neighboring marketing areas is not priced in thesame manner is overridden by the fact that different systems of pricingbetween regulated and unregulated handlers who receive pool milk withinthe proposed merged marketing area are currently causing competitive problems.Handlers in the proposed merged area and in other Federal order marketingareas have been selling their products for some time in competition withunregulated handlers in all areas who pay for their milk receipts on thebasis of protein content without encountering any difficulties in the courseof such competition serious enough to be mentioned in the hearing record.The competitive area in which different pricing bases appear to cause inequitiesis in the procurement of milk supplies from producers. Grade A producerswith high-protein milk are likely to prefer that their milk be shippedto a cheese plant from which they can obtain the benefit of its proteincontent than be pooled by a handler with obligations to supply the fluidmarket. In consequence, there is some concern that the continued inabilityof pooled handlers to adjust payments to producers for differences in proteincontent will result in a gradual decline in the protein content of fluidmilk products as producers with higher protein content recognize the economicadvantage of delivering their milk to the nonpool handlers who will paymore for it.Under the pricing plan adopted in this decision the protein price is derivedfrom the Minnesota-Wisconsin price, upon which all Federal order pricesare based. As a result, costs to handlers under Federal order regulationin neighboring areas should deviate little, if any, from costs to handlersin the merged marketing area. In nearby areas that are not under Federalregulation, of course, there is no assurance of price alignment with themerged Great Basin market for any product. That is a situation under whichhandlers have operated over the existence of the present orders, and underwhich handlers will continue to operate.It was observed at several places in the hearing record that as producersrespond to market signals by increasing the protein content of their milk,the protein price will decline. This result would occur because of themethod of computing the protein price by dividing the skim portion of theMinnesota-Wisconsin price by the marketwide average percentage of proteinin producer milk. As the marketwide average percentage of protein increasesover time in response to paying producers on the basis of the protein contentof their milk, the protein price as computed under the order will decrease.It was suggested that a more desirable method of computing an appropriatevalue for protein than that proposed, and adopted in this decision, wouldbe to use the protein content of milk for which the Minnesota-Wisconsinprice represents payment as a basis for determining the protein price tobe used under the order. Such a price probably would better represent theactual value of protein in relation to the Minnesota-Wisconsin price andthe butterfat price, both of which are determined by factors outside thelocal marketing area. Unfortunately, the protein content of the milk involvedin calculating the Minnesota-Wisconsin price is not available.An exception to the recommended decision filed by Kraft, Inc., a proprietaryplant operator which is not a handler under either the Great Basin or LakeMead order, stated that the recommended method of computing the proteinprice is unsupported by evidence that it will result in the actual marketplacevalue of protein, and requested that the proceeding be reopened for additionalbriefing or evidence. As stated in both this decision and the recommendeddecision, there is no established market value for protein per se, largelybecause protein is not easily separable from the skim milk in which itis contained. The pricing scheme in this decision is not based on the actualmarket value of protein. Therefore, no purpose would be served by reopeningthe hearing for further briefing or evidence on this point.The protein price computed under the order will represent the value ofskim milk used in manufactured products at the skim milk portion of theMinnesota-Wisconsin price. According to the testimony of proponents' expertwitness, there is a direct relationship between the protein content ofthe skim portion of milk and the cheese yield obtained from the milk. Milkpricing adjusted for protein will better reflect the value of milk deliveredby producers and used by handlers than pricing that is adjusted only forbutterfat content. Use of the marketwide average protein content in calculatingthe protein price from the skim milk value of the Minnesota-Wisconsin pricewill assure that adjustments to handlers' obligations on the basis of proteincontent will, on the whole, deviate little from the order's present pricingmethod. According to several witnesses most of the unregulated handlers in Minnesotaand Wisconsin include protein content as a basis for paying producers.These are the handlers whose payments to producers are surveyed in determiningthe Minnesota-Wisconsin price. As the producers in that area increase theprotein content of their milk in response to payments for protein, theMinnesota-Wisconsin price should reflect the added value of increased protein.In fact, as observed by one witness, the present Minnesota-Wisconsin priceapparently represents a return for milk containing more protein on theaverage than milk produced in the merged Great Basin area at the presenttime. It is possible that the protein price computed under the merged ordercould be overstated somewhat as a result. Increases in the protein contentof Great Basin milk should result in a protein price closer to the actualvalue of protein reflected in the Minnesota-Wisconsin price.The suggestion that the order allow handlers to adjust payments to producersfor variations in protein content by allowing deductions for less-than-averageprotein as well as premiums for higher-than-average protein would not resultin the uniformity necessary to assure equitable pricing of milk betweenhandlers and among producers. Such deductions and premiums would be voluntaryand their rates could vary. There is no reason to believe that such a systemwould be practiced by all handlers.The multiple component pricing plan contained in this decision modifiesthe plan supported at the hearing by proponents. Instead of full plantaccounting for protein, as well as butterfat, used by a handler, the assumptionwill be made that the percentage of protein contained in the skim milkportion of each handler's receipts of producer milk is constant for anyparticular month, regardless of the class in which it is used. Accordingto the testimony of some of those witnesses most experienced with the useof protein and nonfat solids in milk pricing, protein and other nonfatsolids are evenly distributed throughout skim milk and cannot easily beseparated from it, as butterfat is. Although proponents altered their proposalto require that protein and butterfat be accounted for in fluid form ona used-to-produce basis, such a procedure would still require fluid milkhandlers to incur extra expenditures for testing and accounting for proteinand butterfat in fluid milk, fluid cream and nonfluid ingredients in allmilk products. Such extensive testing and accounting would represent unnecessaryand burdensome requirements for handlers who currently do not have theequipment or personnel necessary to comply with such a provision. Underthe provisions adopted, handlers would be responsible for reporting theprotein and butterfat content of milk received from producers and cooperativeassociation handlers that is to be priced and pooled under the order. Thepercentage of protein contained in the skim milk portion of such receiptscould then be used to calculate the pounds of protein in skim milk in everystep of the accounting procedure at which the pounds of protein would needto be known for pricing purposes.A system under which handlers are required to report the protein contentof only their producers' milk is not unduly burdensome. It is apparentin the hearing record that protein testing of producer milk in the marketingarea is widespread. The handlers of most producer milk either have theequipment and personnel required for protein testing, and are currentlyusing protein testing as a basis for paying producers, or they have closebusiness associations with handlers who perform such testing. One proprietaryhandler who processes only fluid milk products, for instance, diverts allof the milk of its nonmember producers that is surplus to its fluid operationto the cheese plant of another handler. The cheese plant operator paysfor milk received from its own producers partially on the basis of theprotein content of the milk. Even if the pool plant operator's producers'milk is not ordinarily tested for proetin, it is regularly delivered toa plant at which such testing is available.In the case of a handler who has neither protein testing capability norany access to other handlers' facilities at a reasonable cost, the marketadministrator would be authorized to determine the protein test of producermilk for pool purposes. It is not foreseen that protein testing which mustbe undertaken by the market administrator would be of an extent great enoughto warrant any increase in the maximum marketing service deduction allowedfrom payments to nonmember producers.Proponent filed comments to the recommended decision excepting to the authorizationof the market administrator to establish, as well as verify, the proteintests of producer milk. Proponent stated that such responsibility is notprovided in the language of the recommended order or in the legislativeauthority on which Federal orders are based, and that the record does notsupport allowing some handlers' testing to be done by the market administratorat the expense of all handlers. Proponent argued further that testimonyexpressing concerns about the expense of protein testing was not well-founded,and that those persons who testified to wide experience with protein testingindicated that its cost is in line with the cost of testing for butterfat.For the most part, those handlers testifying to wide experience with proteintesting are very large handlers that are most familiar with testing byinfra-red analysis, in which many samples can be tested for several componentsin a short time. In such an operation, the variable cost of obtaining proteintests would be little, if any, different than the cost of determining butterfattests. However, for small fluid milk handlers who have little reason tobe concerned with the protein tests of their producer receipts or theirpackaged products, the costs of acquiring the necessary equipment and trainingor hiring the necessary personnel for the purpose of conducting such testingcould be excessive. Although protein testing services apparently are availablefrom commercial labs, it is not necessary to require fluid milk handlersto incur such an expense merely for the purpose of obtaining informationabout the percentage of their producers' milk represented by a componentthat is of no commercial value to the handler.The Act and many Federal milk orders authorize verification and testingwhen such activities are necessary to administer the terms of the order.At this time, the regulatory and reporting burden of requiring fluid milkhandlers to undertake the testing activities that are required by the adoptionof multiple component pricing could be unreasonably onerous on small handlers.Therefore, the market administrator is authorized under the order's marketingservices provision to establish, as well as verify, producer tests. Marketingservice activities are paid for by an assessment on nonmember producers,not on handlers. Therefore, proponents' concern that testing for some handlerswill be done by the market administrator at the expense of all handlershas no basis.Reservations about the effectiveness of such an accounting system wereexpressed by proponents, who hypothesized that handlers would be able somehowto manipulate the manner in which milk is received and used according toits protein content for their own financial benefit. It is difficult tosee how handlers could arrange to use high-protein milk in cheese and low-proteinmilk in fluid products while paying for the protein used in Classes IIand III on the basis of pro rata distribution of the protein content ofproducer milk receipts. It would seem that such a system of operation wouldcost more in terms of planning and execution than any benefit a handlermight gain as a result. However, if the testing and accounting provisionsof the merged order are not adequate for ensuring that handlers pay thefull value of their milk receipts, those provisions can always be amendedat a later time.The problem presented by pricing protein contained in Class II and ClassIII milk while not taking protein into account in pricing Class I milkcan best be solved by leaving the pricing of Class I milk much the sameas it is at present. The protein price to be applied to Class II and ClassIII milk under the merged order would represent the skim milk portion ofthe Minnesota-Wisconsin price for the month divided by the marketwide percentageof protein in milk pooled during the previous month. The skim value ofClass I milk can be determined by multiplying the skim milk portion ofthe Minnesota-Wisconsin price for the month by the hundredweight of skimmilk allocated to Class I. This skim milk value of each handler's ClassI milk (not to include the Class I differential) would then be combinedwith the value of protein in milk used in Class II and Class III to determinea total skim milk/protein value for the marketwide pool. Divided by thepounds of protein in producer milk in the pool, the value would yield aprotein price to be paid to producers.Comments filed in response to the recommended decision by proponents andby The American Jersey Cattle Club and National All-Jersey, Inc., suggestedthat the protein price paid to producers be referred to as the ``producerprotein price'' rather than the ``skim milk/protein price.'' The commentsdescribed the term ``skim milk/protein price'' as imprecise, misleading,confusing, and as giving a false marketing signal to producers. The term``producer protein price'' was described as being simpler and more easilyunderstood. The comments are persuasive. Accordingly, references to the``skim milk/protein price'' in this decision and the accompanying orderhave been changed to ``producer protein price.'' It should, however, beremembered that there is a significant difference between the phrases ``proteinprice'' (to handlers) and ``producer protein price'' (to producers).Each producer's share of the differential value of the pool should be determinedas proposed by proponents, although the mechanics should differ somewhat.The basis of the differential pool would be formed by multiplying the poundsof milk allocated to Class I by the difference between the Class I andClass III prices, and adding the amount computed by multiplying the poundsof milk allocated to Class II by the difference between the Class II andClass III prices. To the Class I and Class II differential values wouldbe added adjustments for such items as overage, reclassified inventory,location of producer milk receipts, and other source milk assigned to ClassI. The total value of the differential pool would be divided by the productpounds of producer milk in the pool to determine the rate per hundredweightby which each producer's share of the differential pool would be computed.As a result of pooling the skim milk/protein and differential values ofall producers' milk, producers would be paid on the basis of their totalvolume of production at a weighted average differential price, the proteincontained in their production at the producer protein price per pound,and the butterfat contained in their production at the butterfat priceper pound. Because the value of butterfat would not be affected by theproducts in which it is used, there is no need to pool butterfat values.The multiple component pricing plan adopted in this decision is not necessarilyintended to be a model for inclusion in other Federal milk orders. Theterms and provisions of each order must be tailored to the peculiar marketingconditions existing in each marketing area, as the provisions of this orderhave been determined by the conditions in the merged Great Basin marketingarea. As marketing conditions change, or if the provisions adopted in thisdecision are found to be inadequate, the order should be amended to assureorderly marketing.The National Milk Producers Federation (NMPF), an organization of dairyfarmer cooperatives, and the Holstein-Freisian Association of America filedcomments relating to the status of the multiple component pricing planadopted in this decision as a ``landmark'' upon which other orders wouldnecessarily be modeled. NMPF argued that protein pricing would not representthe best possible milk pricing plan for marketing areas with substantialproduction of butter and nonfat dry milk, and urged the Department notto consider it such a model. The Holstein-Freisian Association, in spiteof the immediately preceding paragraph, expressed concern that the industrywill accept this decision as a model for other orders and that it thereforeshould be drafted as one.Apparently, it must be reiterated that marketing conditions in other marketsdiffer greatly from the merged Great Basin market in such respects as thepercentage of producer milk that is surplus to the fluid needs of the marketand the product mix in which such surplus milk is used, among others. Proteinmay not be the most appropriate nonfat component upon which to base producerpayments in a market where butter and nonfat dry milk are the principalsurplus products. In addition, improved methods of determining componentprices or distributing pool proceeds among producers may be developed.6. <T3>Handler reports. </T3>Reports required to be submitted by handlersshould be similar to those required under the two separate orders, andto those proposed by proponents. However, proponents' proposed handlerreporting requirement should be modified to conform with the incorporationof multiple component pricing as adopted in this decision. With respectto protein, only the protein pounds contained in producer milk receiptsshould be required to be reported. Reporting of the product pounds, skimmilk and butterfat contained in other receipts and in utilization, disposition,and month-end inventories would give the market administrator adequateinformation for purposes of determining handlers' obligations. Handlers'reports of receipts and utilization should be due the seventh day afterthe end of each month, as is currently the case under the separate orders,and as proposed.Payroll reports, indicating the receipts for which producers have beenpaid, should be submitted on or before the twenty-first day after the endof each month, as proposed. The due date for payroll reports would givehandlers one more day for preparation of such reports than they currentlyhave under the present Great Basin order. The payroll reporting dates underthe present Lake Mead order would be inappropriate for the merged orderbecause the present Lake Mead order requires payments for all pool milkto be collected by the market administrator. The information required tobe reported would be the same as under present order provision, exceptfor the addition of the protein content of each producer's milk and theamount paid for protein contained in each producer's milk. Reports of receiptsand utilization and payroll reports submitted by partially regulated distributingplant operators who elect to have their obligations computed as if theyhad been fully regulated handlers for the month should include the sameinformation as provided by fully regulated handlers. Other partially regulateddistributing plant operators may report their receipts and utilizationin the same manner as they are currently required to report, omitting theprotein content of their receipts. The only deviation proposed from present reporting requirements was thathandlers report the protein content of all their milk receipts and of allthe uses made of those receipts. Many witnesses contended that such a requirementwould add unnecessarily to the costs of testing and accounting for milkprotein that would be imposed by adoption of a multiple component pricingscheme. As explained previously in this decision, protein in producer milkwould be followed through a handler's operation and classified pro ratawith the skim milk in which it is contained. Therefore, reporting of receiptsand use of protein aside from its presence in producer milk would be unnecessary.7. <T3>Classification of milk.</T3> The merged order should incorporate thesame uniform classification plan that is currently contained in both ofthe two individual orders, and is commonly provided in most other Federalmilk orders. The plan adopted herein provides, as is the case under theindividual orders, for the classification of milk according to use, includingrules for determining the classification of milk moved from one plant toanother and the classification of shrinkage. The plan also sets forth aprocedure for allocating the skim and butterfat pounds contained in a handler'sreceipts of milk and milk products from various sources to his utilizationin each class in order to determine the classification of producer milk.A handler's receipts of cooperative member milk delivered directly fromproducers' farms to the handler's plant by the cooperative associationshould be included with the handler's direct receipts of producer milkfor the purpose of allocating producer milk to classes of use. Under the classification plan adopted in this decision, Class I milk wouldinclude all skim milk and butterfat disposed of in the form of milk, skimmilk, lowfat milk, milk drinks, buttermilk, filled milk, and milkshakeand ice milk mixes containing less than 20 percent total solids. Skim milkand butterfat disposed of in any such product that is flavored, cultured,modified with added nonfat milk solids, concentrated (if in a consumer-typepackage), or reconstituted likewise should be classified as Class I milk.Such classification should apply whether the products are disposed of influid or frozen form. Skim milk disposed of in any product described above that is modified bythe addition of nonfat milk solids should be Class I milk only to the extentof the weight of the skim milk in an equal volume of an unmodified productof the same nature and butterfat content. The remaining volume of the product,which represents the skim milk equivalent of added nonfat milk solids,would be classified as Class III. Each product designated herein as a Class I product would be considereda ``fluid milk product'' as defined in the order. In addition to thesefluid milk products, Class I milk would include any skim milk and butterfatnot specifically accounted for in Class II or III, other than shrinkagepermitted in a Class III classification. Class III milk should include products which are made from surplus approvedmilk and which compete in a national market with similar products madefrom manufacturing grade milk. These products include cheese (other thancottage cheese, lowfat cottage cheese, and dry curd cottage cheese), butter,any milk product in dry form (such as nonfat dry milk), any concentratedmilk product in bulk, fluid form that is used to produce a Class III product,and evaporated or condensed milk (plain or sweetened) in a consumer-typepackage. Additionally, Class III milk should include any product not specifiedin Class I or Class II. An intermediate class, Class II, should apply to certain products whichcan command a higher value than Class III products but which must be competitivelypriced below Class I in order to compete with non-dairy substitute productsor manufactured dairy products that can be used in making Class II products.Class II milk should include skim milk and butterfat disposed of in theform of a ``fluid cream product,'' eggnog, yogurt, and any product containing6 percent or more nonmilk fat (or oil) that resembles one of these products.As defined in the order, ``fluid cream product'' means cream (other thanplastic cream or frozen cream), sour cream, or a mixture (including a culturedmixture) of cream and milk or skim milk containing 9 percent or more butterfat,with or without the addition of other ingredients. Class II milk would also include bulk fluid milk products and bulk creamproducts disposed of to any commercial food processing establishment orin producer milk diverted to a commercial food processing establishmentat which food products (other than milk products and filled milk) are processedand from which there is no disposition of fluid milk products or fluidcream products other than those received in consumer-type packages. Inaddition, it would include milk used to produce cottage cheese in any form,milkshake and ice milk mixes containing 20 percent or more total solids,frozen desserts, and frozen dessert mixes. Formulas especially preparedfor infant feeding or dietary use that are packaged in hermetically-sealedglass or all-metal containers, or aseptically packaged and hermeticallysealed in foil-lined paper containers, and certain other products as specifiedin the order would also be included as Class II milk. The classification plan adopted herein was proposed by the merger proponentand includes the uniform classification plan contained in many other Federalorders. This plan was developed from exhaustive hearings held on the broadissue of classification in 1971 for 39 markets. A full discussion and appropriateorder language on the uniform classification plan are contained in a finaldecision issued February 19, 1974 (39 FR 8202, 8452, 8712, 9012). A futherdecision that refined the present uniform classification plan was issuedJuly 11, 1975 (40 FR 30119). The uniform classification plan was lateradopted under both the Great Basin and Lake Mead orders in decisions issuedAugust 17, 1982 (47 FR 37203) and September 19, 1984 (49 FR 37599). Thesedecisions were duly noted on the record of this proceeding. Proponent testified that adoption of the uniform classification systemwould result in no change in classification from that currently containedin the two individual orders. He stated that inclusion of the system inthe merged order would assure uniformity among such essential aspects ofmarketing orders as accounting requirements and the movement of packagedClass I and Class II products between border areas. No testimony opposingincorporation of the uniform classification system in the merged orderwas received. Accordingly, the classification system proposed by proponentshould be adopted. <T3>Allocation of receipts to utilization.</T3> Under the merged order,a system of allocating handlers' receipts to the various classes shouldbe similar to that adopted in the Assistant Secretary's June 19, 1964 (29FR 9002), decision for 76 milk orders (including the Great Basin order).This decision dealt with the issue of integrating into each order's regulatoryplan milk which is not subject to classified pricing under any order andreceipts at a pool plant from other order plants. The decision providesa procedure for allocating over a handler's total utilization his receiptsfrom all sources and for making payment into the producer-settlement fundon unregulated milk allocated to Class I. The allocation system adoptedfor 76 milk orders in the 1964 decision was incorporated in the Lake Meadorder when it was promulgated in 1973.Since the aforementioned decision sets forth the procedures for dealingwith unregulated milk under Federal orders, it is appropriate and necessarythat the same system of allocation apply under the proposed merged order.Likewise, the appropriate treatment of other order milk received at poolplants under the merged order should conform with the plan included inthe aforesaid decision that is used for coordinating the applicable regulationson all movements of milk between and among Federal order markets.Merger proponent proposed allocation provisions that essentially wouldallocate handlers' other source receipts to their utilization as is nowprovided in the separate orders proposed to be merged. However, proponentadvocated allocating the product pounds of receipts, rather than the skimmilk and butterfat pounds, to the pounds of milk used in each class. Thepresent method of allocating pounds of skim milk and butterfat in receiptsto the skim milk and butterfat in classes of use under the two individualorders should be continued under the merged order.Proponent witness testified that under a system that prices both the butterfatand protein components of milk the two components should be treated thesame in each stage of the accounting and pricing process. Such consistenttreatment, he explained, would require that protein, butterfat and skimmilk pounds each be allocated to the classes of use, or that product poundsonly be allocated. He described the allocation of all three componentsas being cumbersome, if not unmanageable, and as serving no useful purpose.The witness stated that under the proposal no price distinctions wouldbe made for protein or butterfat based on the classes in which those componentsare used. He argued that while in the past butterfat disposed of in ClassI was priced at a higher rate than butterfat used in manufactured products,at the present time the value of the butterfat content of milk is determinedby one differential without regard to the classes in which it is used.He stated that the only purpose of allocating butterfat or protein to theclasses in which they are used is to distinguish differences in value accordingto class. With single butterfat and protein prices applicable to all butterfatand protein in producer milk as provided by the proposal, the witness said,there is no reason to allocate milk components. He concluded that milkcan be priced according to its class of use by allocating it only by productpounds without altering the obligations of handlers under the order.Under the pricing and pooling provisions adopted in this decision, thebutterfat and protein components of milk will not be treated in the samemanner. The value of protein in producer milk used in Class II and ClassIII will be pooled with the value of skim milk used in Class I to determinethe price to be paid producers for the protein in their milk. The valueof butterfat will not be pooled. Even if butterfat and protein were tobe priced in a parallel manner, these components have different physicalcharacteristics, and cannot be considered to be handled in the same way.Butterfat is easily separable from the producer milk in which it is contained,and the butterfat content of nearly all fluid milk products is standardizedto some extent. The butterfat, or cream, that is separated from producermilk is then further standardized for various cream products, added toice cream mixes, or churned into butter.Because butterfat can be separated from the skim milk in which it is contained,butterfat not needed in some products such as fluid milk products may beremoved and used in other products, of which it will enhance the value.Protein, however, must be used with the skim milk throughout which it isdistributed, even though extra amounts of protein may add no value to thefluid products in which the skim milk is used. Technology has not progressedto the point at which the protein component of milk can be removed fromproducer milk without use of a manufacturing process or without changingthe form of the milk. Likewise, milk protein is not an end product of anycommonly-used manufacturing process, and therefore cannot be added backto milk or milk products in its entirety or without other milk solids.The addition of nonfat milk solids to fluid milk in the fortification processinvolves adding nonprotein solids as well as protein. The use of caseinin manufactured products adds only one form of milk protein. Therefore, there is no reason for butterfat and protein to be treated inthe same manner in determining the allocation of producer milk to the classesof use. The butterfat and skim milk portions of milk are separable, maybe used separately in a milk plant, and therefore should be accounted forseparately. All evidence available indicates that protein is evenly distributedwithin the skim portion of producer milk, and should be accounted for inproportion with the skim portion. There are valid reasons for allocating milk to its classes of use by itsskim and butterfat components, especially under the pricing system adoptedin this decision. With the skim milk portion of milk classified as ClassI subject to a skim milk price rather than to a protein price, it willbe necessary to compute the pounds of protein by class in order to priceonly the pounds of protein used in Classes II and III. Allocation of skimmilk and butterfat will make available the information necessary to prorateprotein pounds to the skim milk allocated to each class, while allowingthe calculation of the pounds of producer milk to be priced in each class.The calculation necessary to determine handler obligations under the orderprovisions adopted in this decision would not be unnecessarily burdensomeor complicated for the market administrator. The necessary calculationswould be performed by computer, as are nearly all pool computations atthis time. In addition to the need for separate allocation of skim milk and butterfatunder the provisions of the merged order, proponent witness' assertionthat allocating milk to classes of use by product pounds instead of byskim milk and butterfat pounds would not alter the obligations of handlersunder the order is incorrect. The amounts of skim milk and butterfat usedin each class established separate limits on the amount of skim milk andbutterfat in the various types of receipts that can be allocated to eachclass. If the amounts of skim milk and butterfat in each class are combinedinto product pounds it is likely that for any given handler the productpounds in other source receipts allocated to the product pounds of usewill result in a greater amount of receipts being allocated than if skimmilk and butterfat receipts are allocated under separate limits. Receiptsare generally allocated first to Class III use, and only to Class II andClass I when the limits established by Class III use have been exceeded.Therefore, it can be expected that product pound allocation would, in caseswhere it differs from skim milk and butterfat allocation, always resultin pricing fewer pounds of producer milk at the Class III price, and morepounds at the higher Class I and Class II prices. Shrinkage and overage also should be computed and assigned to classes ofuse on the basis of skim milk and butterfat, rather than computing shrinkageon the basis of product pounds, protein and butterfat, and prorating itto Classes I and III solely on the basis of product pounds, as proposedby proponent. Shrinkage or overage in butterfat and skim milk often occurin opposite directions in the same dairy plant, as when skim milk shrinkageoccurs during the same period as butterfat overage. If such a situationoccurred under product pound accounting the shrinkage and overage wouldtend to cancel each other out. As a result, overage would not be allocatedto its full extent and would only be priced as a component, without considerationof any greater value it may have in Class I or Class II use. Shrinkagealso would be understated in such a case, and might be prorated quite differentlyto Class III and Class I than if the actual amount of shrinkage were prorated.With shrinkage computed and prorated by pounds of skim milk and butterfat,protein pounds in shrinkage or overage can still be computed, when necessaryfor pricing purposes, as a percentage of skim milk.<T3>Milk for which handler is accountable. </T3>According to the producermilk definition proposed by IMPA and adopted in the decision, the milkfor which a handler is accountable to the pool consists of the milk ofa handler's own producers that is received or diverted by the handler andthe milk delivered to the handler by a cooperative association directlyfrom its members' farms. The IMPA witness testified that the proposed producermilk definition is a modification of the definitions of producer milk underthe Great Basin and Lake Mead milk orders. The language of the proposedorder would not allow the receipts of cooperative member milk at the handler'splant to be reported and accounted for by any other handler, includingthe cooperative. Under the proposed definition, the handler who first receivedmilk from producers into a pool plant is the handler who is to be heldresponsible for reporting the disposition of the milk and accounting tothe pool for its use. Such a procedure will be the most reasonable mannerof determining the value of cooperative member milk received and used ata handler's plant, and the simplest to administer. Some of the language proposed by IMPA for the general accounting and allocationsections of the order would not allow cooperative member milk receivedat a handler's plant to be accounted for as required by the proposed producermilk definition. Apparently, the proposed language of the general accountingand allocation sections was intended to follow the present Lake Mead order,while the producer milk definition is a mixture of both the Great Basinand Lake Mead orders. Accordingly, the proposed general accounting andallocation sections have been modified to assure that producer milk willbe accounted for in the manner required by the producer milk definition.8. <T3>Class Prices, location adjustments and component prices. </T3>The presentClass I price levels at Salt Lake City, Utah, and Las Vegas, Nevada, shouldbe maintained. Although proponents omitted the Class III and basic formulaprices from their proposed order as unnecessary for the computation ofhandler obligations and producer payments, all of the prices normally definedin Federal milk orders, in addition to those necessary to implement multiplecomponent pricing, should be included in the merged Great Basin order.Defining all the necessary prices in the order will make computations includedin the determination of handler obligations and producer payments lesscomplex than they otherwise might have to be. The dates on which prices are to be announced should be the same as thoseproposed by proponents. The dates on which the class prices and componentprices are to be announced are the same as those on which class pricesare currently announced under the two separate orders, and are uniformamong Federal milk orders generally. Announcement of the weighted averagedifferential and the uniform price for the previous month on the 12th ofthe month also represents no change from the present orders. There wasno opposition to the dates proposed. <T3>Class I price and location adjustments. </T3>For the most part, ClassI prices at locations within the marketing area should be unchanged fromClass I prices under the separate orders. The Class I price for the mergedGreat Basin market should be the basic formula price for the second precedingmonth plus a Class I differential of $1.90. This price should apply toplants located in the Salt Lake City area and other areas listed below.For the purpose of applying location adjustments, the marketing area shouldbe divided into three pricing zones. Zone 1, which would be the base zoneand would have no price adjustment, should include northern Utah (whichincludes Salt Lake City) and northeastern Nevada. Zone 2 should comprisethe six counties in the southeastern corner of Idaho. A location adjustmentof minus 25 cents per hundredweight should apply (in effect, a Class Idifferential of $1.65). Zone 3 should include all of the area in southeasternNevada (which includes Las Vegas) and southern Utah, the Wyoming portionof the marketing area, and the four northernmost Idaho counties in themarketing area. A minus 30-cent adjustment should apply ($1.60 Class Idifferential). This would continue the price level now applicable at LasVegas. The location adjustment for each zone, the resulting Class I differential(shown parenthetically), and the territory that should be included in eachzone are as follows:<ITAG tagnum="73">Zone 1_No adjustment ($1.90)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Utah Counties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Box Elder</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Cache</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Carbon</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Daggett</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Davis</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Duchesne</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Emery</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Grand</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Juab</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Millard</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Morgan</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Rich</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Salt Lake</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Sanpete</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Sevier</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Summit</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Tooele</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Uinta</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Utah</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Wasatch</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Weber</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Nevada Counties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Elko</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">White Pine</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Zone 2_Minus 25 cents ($1.65)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Idaho Counties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Bannock</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Bear Lake</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Caribou</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Franklin</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Oneida</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Power</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Zone 3_Minus 30 cents ($1.60)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Idaho Counties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Bingham</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Bonneville</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Jefferson</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Madison</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Wyoming Counties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Lincoln</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Uinta</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Nevada Counties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Clark</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Lincoln</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Utah Counties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Beaver</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Garfield</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Iron</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Kane</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Piute</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">San Juan</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Washington</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Wayne</ITAG>At plant locations outside the marketing area, the Class I price and theweighted average differential price that are applicable at Salt Lake City,Utah, or Las Vegas, Nevada, whichever is nearer to the plant, should bereduced 1.5 cents for each 10 miles that the plant is from the nearer city.Both the Class I prices to handlers and the weighted average differentialprices to producers should be adjusted by the zone locations of the plantsat which milk is received. At the present time, the Class I differentialat Salt Lake City is $1.90. Prices under the Great Basin order are notadjusted for location at plants within 150 miles of Salt Lake City. Forplant locations 150 to 160 miles from Salt Lake City, the Class I and uniformprices are reduced by 22 cents per hundredweight. Prices at locations morethan 160 miles from Salt Lake City are reduced by 22 cents plus 1.5 centsper ten miles of distance in excess of 160 miles from Salt Lake City. Asa result, Class I and uniform prices are reduced by 29.5 cents at poolplants located in Idaho Falls, Idaho and 23.5 cents at a pool plant inPocatello, Idaho. Under the merged order the price adjustments at thoselocations would be minus 30 cents and 25 cents, respectively. Price changesof such small magnitude should create no competitive problems for the handlersaffected. Price adjustments at locations in Idaho outside of the mergedmarketing area will be changed by 2 cents, since 24 cents rather than 22cents would be provided for the first 160 miles. These adjustments alsoshould be considered too minor to affect competitive relationships consideringthe relatively large distances involved from Salt Lake City.The present Class I price differential at Las Vegas, Nevada, is $1.60,which also would be unchanged under the merged order. Currently, pricesat locations more than 40 miles from Las Vegas are adjusted at a rate of1.5 cents per 10 miles distance from Las Vegas. Location adjustments underthe present Lake Mead order reduce Class I and uniform prices by 9 centsat Logandale, Nevada; 27 cents at Cedar City, Utah; and 34.5 cents at Beaver,Utah, for milk received at plants in those locations. The pricing planincorporated in the merged order would remove the price differences atthese locations, resulting in Class I and uniform price levels the sameas those at Las Vegas. Currently, milk surplus to the Lake Mead marketthat must be moved to northern Utah for manufacturing use is subject toa 35-cent reduction in price for location. Under the pricing plan adoptedin the merged order, milk so moved will be subject to the Zone 1 priceeffective at Salt Lake City.Prices at locations outside the merged marketing area will be adjustedfrom the prices effective at Las Vegas or Salt Lake City, according todistance from the nearer of those two cities. This provision will assurethat the present price relationships under the order between Lake Mead-areahandlers and California handlers are unchanged.Proponents supported adoption of their proposed zone pricing plan on thebasis that it would facilitate the delivery of milk supplies from producersto different distributing plants and to manufacturing plants as milk isneeded so that producer milk can be utilized to the greatest advantage.Proponents expect that the proposed zone pricing system will result inimproved equity among handlers, improved service to handlers by producersand cooperatives, and more orderly marketing of producer milk. Proponentwitness testified that the zone pricing system would result in prices similarto those effective under the two separate orders, with the exceptions notedin southeastern Nevada and southwestern Utah. He stated that proponentssee no justification for lower Class I and uniform prices at Logandale,Nevada, or Beaver, Utah, than at Las Vegas. The witness explained thatBeaver is the location of the nearest manufacturing plant for the reservesupplies of milk from the Cedar City area and from southern Nevada. Heexpressed the opinion that milk which must be moved to a manufacturingplant at additional cost to producers because it is not needed at a nearbybottling plant should not be subject as well to a price adjusted downwardfor location.Proponent witness also stated that a zone pricing system removes the confusionof determining location adjustments on the basis of distance and eliminatessmall price differences between neighboring locations. He explained thatprices to producers and handlers similarly situated would be equalized,and that milk marketers would no longer have to consider the location valuesat each individual distributing plant or manufacturing plant in arrangingfarm to market hauling.Proponents recognized the need for higher prices in heavily populated areato compensate for the higher cost of delivering bulk milk to plants locatedthere from outer fringes of the procurement area. The witness stated thatthe proposed zone pricing system would cover the costs of moving milk towhere it is consumed, but would also simplify accounting and computingthe costs and returns of milk supplied to handlers by the cooperative associationsand by other suppliers. Proponent witness stated that under the proposedzone pricing system Class I costs to handlers would not change significantlyfrom their present levels, and that total returns to producers would increaseslightly.The manager of a distributing plant located in Pocatello, Idaho, testifiedthat, in order for his plant to compete on an equitable basis with handlersregulated under the Southwestern Idaho-Eastern Oregon order, the locationadjustment at Pocatello should be increased by 16.5 cents per hundredweight,thereby decreasing the Class I price effective at that location. The witnessproposed that the location adjustment at Pocatello be increased from 23.5cents to 40 cents, rather than the 25-cent adjustment proposed by proponents.He testified that competition for fluid sales in the Pocatello areas comesprimarily from distributing plants regulated under the Great Basin Federalmilk order and located in northern Utah, and from a distributing plantregulated under the Southwestern Idaho-Eastern Oregon order located atTwin Falls, Idaho. According to the hearing record, the Class I differentialat Twin Falls under the Southwestern Idaho-Eastern Oregon order is $1.50,and the Class I differential at Salt Lake City under the Great Basin orderis $1.90. The Class I differential at Pocatello under the Great Basin orderis currently $1.665, and would be $1.65 under the proposed zone pricingsystem. The witness complained that because of the present 16.5-cent differencein Class I prices between Twin Falls and Pocatello under the two orders,the Twin Falls handler enjoys a competitive advantage over the Pocatellohandler on milk sold in the Pocatello area. He had no complaint about the23.5-cent difference in prices paid for Class I milk by handlers in SaltLake City and Pocatello.Location adjustments are intended to offset the cost of moving bulk milkfrom the location at which it is produced to locations at which it maybe used. Location adjustments are not intended to cover handlers' costsof moving packaged milk from where it is processed to where it is purchasedby consumers. The present price relationships between Salt Lake City, Pocatello,and Twin Falls provide incentives for milk to move from where it is producedto where it is needed for processing. A $1.50 Class I price differentialapparently results in a high enough price to attract an adequate supplyof milk to Twin Falls, Idaho, to fill the fluid requirements of the handlerlocated there. The 16.5-cent (or proposed 15-cent) price difference betweenTwin Falls and Pocatello is not excessive considering that it is at least100 miles between the two locations. At the regular location adjustmentrate of 1.5 cents per 10 miles of distance, a 15-cent price differencewould be entirely appropriate.The 25-cent price difference between Pocatello and Salt Lake City shouldmake it possible for producer milk to move from an area of heavy milk productionin southeastern Idaho to the heavily-populated Salt Lake City area. The40-cent price difference between Pocatello and Salt Lake City that wouldresult from adopting the handler's proposal would misalign prices betweenthose two locations within the marketing area, and would eliminate thegradual reduction of prices by distance from Salt Lake City to Pocatello,and Salt Lake City to Twin Falls. Furthermore, if competition between handlersfor sales, rather than for procurement of producer milk, were the objectof location adjustments, a 40-cent price difference between Salt Lake Cityand Pocatello would put Salt Lake City handlers at an even greater disadvantagein competing for sales in the Pocatello area than they currently have witha 23.5-cent price difference.A representative of Safeway Stores, Inc., a large multiple-distributingplant handler with a Great Basin pool plant in Salt Lake City and a plantlocated in Commerce City, California, that is a partially regulated plantunder the Lake Mead order, advocated adjusting prices from Las Vegas andSalt Lake City to locations outside the marketing area by 2.2 cents perhundredweight per 10 miles of distance rather than by 1.5 cents. He statedthat the present 1.5-cent rate falls far short of covering the actual transportationexpenses incurred in moving milk from the Los Angeles area to Las Vegas.He estimated those costs at over 10 cents per hundredweight per 10 miles,but based the proposed 2.2-cent rate on proposals currently under considerationfor incorporation in other Federal orders. The witness had no data supportinga 2.2-cent cost for moving bulk milk from California to Nevada. The 10-centcost he cited pertained solely to movements of packaged milk, and wouldbe irrelevant to any determination of an appropriate location adjustmentrate. The costs of transporting bulk milk have undoubtedly increased sincethe 1.5-cent location adjustment rate was adopted. However, in the absenceof any data supporting a location adjustment rate other than the present1.5 cents, and without any evidence that the 1.5-cent rate is inadequate,there is no basis for adopting a higher rate.Other than the Pocatello handler's proposal to adopt a different pricelevel at Pocatello, Idaho, there was no opposition expressed at the hearingto adoption of proponents' zone pricing system, even though Class I priceswould be increased by 9 cents at the Logandale, Nevada, distributing plant,and by 27 cents at Cedar City, Utah. The change in location pricing atBeaver, Utah, would have no effect on Class I values because all of themilk received there is used solely in cheese, a Class III product. Pricechanges at locations in the Idaho portion of the marketing area are notsignificant enough to cause any concern about price misalignment betweenhandlers or about competitive disruptions, as discussed earlier. Proponents'arguments that establishing prices by plants' locations within zones wouldbe less complex and easier to determine than establishing prices by mileagefrom specific basing points are valid. In addition, although it may notseem wise to eliminate price differences between locations in Las Vegasand southern Utah when a substantial proportion of the reserve milk supplyassociated with the Lake Mead market is still produced in southwesternUtah, there is evidence that most of the necessary reserves for the Nevadadistributing plants can be supplied from Clark County, Nevada, production.The witness representing Rockview Dairies, which owns the two farms supplyingnonmember producer milk to Anderson Dairy, the large Las Vegas distributingplant operator, testified that the handler has contracted for a full supplyof milk from California producers, and would no longer be receiving milkfrom the cooperative associations. As a result, more milk produced in Nevadawill be moved to Beaver, Utah, as surplus to the fluid needs of the marketthan will be hauled from farms in the Beaver area to distributing plantsin Nevada. Therefore, there may no longer be any reason for price differenceswithin the southern portion of the merged order. Because the proposed zonepricing system does not materially change prices elsewhere in the marketingarea, the system of determining location adjustments by zones for locationswithin the marketing area, and by mileage from basing points for locationsoutside the marketing area, should be adopted as proposed.<T3>Class II and Class III prices. </T3>Proponent's proposal included aClass II price at the same level existing currently in the Great Basinorder, and 5 cents lower than under the Lake Mead order. There was no testimonyin support of or opposition to the proposed Class II price level. It isapparent from record evidence, however, that by far the most manufacturinguse of milk, in both Classes II and III, occurs in the present Great Basinmarketing area. The Class II price as currently determined under that order,therefore, is applicable to most of the milk used in Class II under thetwo orders and would be the more appropriate Class II price for the mergedorder.Proponent's proposed order did not include a Class III price, but usedthe definition of the present Class III price whenever necessary for poolcomputations such as determining the differences between the Class I andClass II, or Class III and Class III, prices. In the interest of simplicity,the merged order should include a definition of the Class III price thatis the same as in both of the two existing orders. Also, instead of a definitionof the ``Minnesota-Wisconsin price'', as proposed, the merged order shouldcontain a definition of the equivalent ``Basic formula price'', as do mostother orders.<T3>Component prices. </T3>The value of the butterfat and protein componentsof producer milk should be determined by prices per pound, as proposedby the merger proponent. The butterfat and protein prices should also becomputed as proposed. In addition, a ``skim milk price'' should be definedand used to determine the value of the skim portion of producer milk thatis allocated to Class I. No provision for a butterfat differential is neededin the merged order because value adjustments for variations in producerbutterfat will be made by paying producers a price per pound for the butterfatcontained in their milk, rather than by adjusting the price per hundredweightto be paid producers to reflect the butterfat content of their milk.Proponent witness justified the proposal to bill handlers and pay producersfor milk components on a per-pound basis rather than by the use of differentialsby explaining that values based on prices per pound would be easier tounderstand and compute when two components, rather than one, are used todetermine the value of milk. Using two price differentials, for proteinas well as butterfat, he testified, would be unduly complex and confusing.The witness explained that under the proposal the value of one pound ofbutterfat would be determined by adding the value of a pound of skim milkto the current butterfat differential, which represents the differencein value between a pound of butterfat and a pound of skim milk. He indicatedthat the provisions in the proposed order that describe the computationof the ``butterfat price'' would base the value of a pound of butterfaton the current market price of butter.The IMPA witness also addressed the question of determining an appropriateprice for protein and concluded that the value of protein depends on theproduct in which it is used. He indicated that under market conditionscurrent at the time of the hearing, protein would be worth about 80 centsper pound in milk used to make nonfat dry milk, and approximately twicethat amount in milk used for cheese. The witness stated that IMPA's proposalwould attribute the skim milk portion of the Minnesota-Wisconsin (M-W)price to protein by deducting the value of 3.5 pounds of butterfat fromthe M-W price, and dividing the result by the marketwide percentage ofprotein in producer milk during the previous month. Although the proteinwould thus be valued at the higher end of the possible range of proteinprices, he justified that result on the basis of the overwhelmingly largeproportion of the surplus milk used in cheese manufacture in the proposedmerged marketing area.The prices for butterfat and protein components should be determined inthe manner proposed by proponents. The butterfat price would accuratelyreflect the market value of butterfat used in butter, and would resultin no changes from the present pricing system in the value of butterfatto producers or to handlers. The butterfat price would be used only todetermine payments to producers, and would not be included in handlers'obligations to the pool.The ``milk protein price'' computation proposed by proponents also servesthe purpose for which it is intended_to derive a price-per-pound for proteinthat will reflect the value to handlers of protein contained in the skimmilk portion of producer milk. Because the protein price is to be derivedfrom the skim milk portion of the Minnesota-Wisconsin price and the averageprotein content of producer milk in the market, the total value of thepool should be unchanged. In addition, due to the minor variations to beexpected in the protein content of producer milk received by differenthandlers, handler obligations resulting from use of the component pricingsystem should be little different from their present obligations. Also,given the very large proportion of the milk produced for other than fluiduses in the merged marketing area that is used to make cheese, it is appropriatethat the protein contained in the milk reflect the value of the productin which it is used.As discussed earlier, the protein price should apply only to protein inproducer skim milk allocated to Classes II and III. The price to be paidto producers for the protein in their milk should represent a combinationof the value of protein in Class II and Class III uses and the value ofskim milk in Class I use. The computation of the ``producer protein price''to producers will be explained in the discussion of the producer proteinpool.The ``skim milk price'' was not included in proponents' proposed order,but would help to accomplish proponents' objectives of avoiding a chargeto handlers for protein used in Class I and maintaining equitable ClassI costs between handlers. The skim milk price should be computed by subtractingthe differential value of 3.5 pounds of butterfat from the Class III price.The result would represent the value of 100 pounds of skim milk. When addedto the differential value of a handler's Class I producer milk, calculatedat the difference between the Class I and Class III prices, the handler'sClass I skim milk value would determine the handler's obligation to thepool for his milk used in Class I.The prices included in the merged order that are to be paid by handlerswould result in a total pool value little different from that computedunder the present pricing system. Total payments to producers also shouldnot vary much from the present system. In fact, if the prices computedunder the proposed marged order, as adopted herein, were carried out beyondthe nearest full cent, the total pool value would be unchanged from itspresent level. However, there is no reason to carry out component pricesto the tenths of cents when producer prices resulting from the merged poolshould vary no more than 1 to 2 cents each month from the prices computedunder the present system. Therefore, the butterfat, protein and skim milkprices should be rounded to the nearest whole cent. The prices from whichthe component prices are computed, however, and intermediate steps in thecomputations should be carried out as many decimal places as necessaryto assure that the rounded component prices are as accurate as possible.9. <T3>Handlers' value of milk for computing prices to producers.</T3> Thevalue of milk to handlers under the multiple component pricing system adoptedherein should reflect the value of protein in handlers' producer milk receiptsthat are used in Class II and Class III while continuing to price ClassI milk without considering its protein content. At the same time, the presentlevel of total costs of milk to all handlers should be miantained. Theseobjectives can be met by determining handlers' obligations and rates ofpayments to producers through the operation of two marketwide pools. Onepool would determine the price to be paid to all pooled producers for theirshare of the fluid market, and the other pool would determine the rateat which producers should be paid for the protein contained in their milk.Each handler's net obligation to the pool would be determined by subtractingthe weighted average differential and producer protein values due to producersfrom the differential value and skim milk and protein values of the producermilk used by the handler. The value of butterfat to handlers should notbe pooled, but should be paid directly to the dairy farmers who producedit.The differential value of each handler's producer milk receipts used inClass I and Class II should be calculated by mulitplying the hundredwightof producer milk allocated to those classes by the difference between theappropriate class prices applicable at the location of the plant and theClass III price. In addition, the adjustments to the class values of producermilk that are currently included in determining the handler's value ofmilk should be included in the differential value. Those adjustments includethe values of overage, beginning Class III inventory allocated to ClassII or to Class I, other source and filled milk receipts allocated to ClassI, and certain receipts from unregulated supply plants that are allocatedto Class I.The value adjustments for overage allocated to Class I should be determinedby multiplying the Class I product pounds by the difference between thecurrent month's Class I and Class III prices, skim milk pounds by the currentmonth's skim milk price, and butterfat pounds by the current month's butterfatprice. The product pounds of overage allocated to Class II should be pricedat the difference between the current month's Class II and Class III prices,the Class II butterfat pounds at the butterfat price and the protein poundspro-rated to the skim milk pounds allocated to Class II at the proteinprice. The value of Class III overage would be determined by multiplyingthe protein pounds pro-rated to Class III skim milk overage according tothe protein content of the handler's producer skim milk by the proteinprice, and adding the value of butterfat overage allocated to Class IIImultiplied by the butterfat price. In the case of reclassified inventory,the value adjustment would be the difference between the current month'sClass I and Class II values of the inventory and its value at the previousmonth's protein and butterfat prices. The value of other source receiptsallocated to Class I would be determined by multiplying the Class I productpounds so allocated by the difference between the current month's ClassI and Class III prices.The price to be paid to producers for the protein in their milk shouldbe determined by combining the value of skim milk in Class I producer milkat the skim milk price with the value of protein in the skim milk in ClassII and Class III producer milk at the protein price. The total of the skimand protein values, when divided by the total pounds of protein in pooledproducer milk, will yield the price to be paid to producers for the proteinin their milk. The price so computed should be referred to as the ``producerprotein price.''Proponent witness proposed that only the differential value of producermilk used in Class I and Class II, with the adjustments for overage, reclassifiedinventory, etc., be pooled. In order to maintain the present pricing ofClass I milk, proponents advocated the use of an adjustment to be deductedfrom the differential value of a handler's producer milk if the handler'sreceipts of producer milk contained more than the average percentage ofprotein in producer milk in the market. The adjustment would assure thatthe handler would pay no more for the extra protein in his Class I milkthan he would if his producer milk receipts contained only the marketwideaverage percentage of protein. Under the proposal, producers would be paiddirectly by handlers for the protein in their milk. Protein value wouldnot be included in the pool. Proponents also proposed that payment forthe butterfat contained in producer milk be made directly from handlersto producers, and not be included in the pool.A number of persons protested, at the hearing and in post-hearing briefs,that proponent's method of adjusting the value for protein in Class I milkwould result in inequitable costs to handlers for milk used in Class I.According to those opposing such a pricing procedure handlers receivingproducer milk with a protein content lower than the marketwide averagewould pay less for it under such a system than handlers receiving milkwith an average or higher-than-average protein content. The witnesses pointedout that such a provision would violate the requirement of the AgriculturalMarketing Agreement Act of 1937 that costs of milk to handlers under theorder be uniform.Producers could be paid for the protein contained in their milk withoutthe value of the protein to handlers being pooled if it were not for thenecessity of removing the effect of protein content from the value of ClassI milk. Handlers apparently are unable to recover the costs of additionalprotein from the sale of milk containing higher-than-average protein levels,and are unable to separate unneeded protein from the skim milk in whichit is contained. Proponents' proposal to remove the effect of charginghandlers for protein used in Class I milk by reducing handlers' pool obligationswhen their producer receipts contain more than the marketwide average percentof protein would result in charging handlers different rates for theirreceipts used in Class I. Such an outcome would not be equitable, nor wouldit result in uniform costs to handlers. Therefore, because of the constraintsthat must be considered in initiating protein pricing under a Federal milkorder, handlers' pool obligations for protein and skim milk in producermilk, as adopted in this decision, would be determined on the basis ofthe skim milk used in Class I instead of the pounds of protein used inClass I. The value of protein in Class II and Class III producer milk wouldbe pooled with the value of skim milk in Class I producer milk to determinethe rate at which producers should be paid for the protein in their milk.The difference in pricing methods between Class I and Class II and IIIwould allow for the fact that consumers apparently are unwilling to payhigher prices for milk containing higher percentages of protein, and wouldassure that handlers' pool obligations or payments to producers are notaffected by the protein content of their producer milk receipts allocatedto Class I. It is not expected that the producer protein price computedto determine the price producers would be paid for the protein in theirmilk would differ by more than one cent from the price handlers would berequired to pay for the protein in their producer milk receipts allocatedto Class II and Class III. In view of the fact that the skim value of producer milk would be includedin the producer protein pool and the butterfat value would be paid foroutside of the pool, the differential values of milk used in Class I andClass II, and the adjustments normally made for overage, etc., should beshared among all of the producer milk in the pool through the operationof a differential pool. As proposed by proponent, the ``weighted averagedifferential price'' that would be computed through the operation of thedifferential pool would represent the portion of the present uniform pricethat exceeds the Class III price because the protein, butterfat and skimmilk prices will be derived from the Class III, or basic formula, price.As a result of the relationship between the component prices and the basicformula price, it will be possible to compute and announce a uniform pricefor informational and comparison purposes by simply adding the weightedaverage differential price to the basic formula price. Handlers' payments to the producer settlement fund should be determinedby subtracting the producer protein and differential values of the producermilk for which the handler is obligated to pay from the use value of thehandler's receipts of producer milk, as determined by the handler's obligationsto the two pools. As proposed by proponent, only the amount in excess ofthe producer value of the handler's receipts should be due to the producer-settlementfund. Requiring handlers to pay the full use value of their producer milkto the market administrator would necessitate the movement of excessiveamounts of money. It is sufficient that only the amounts of money necessaryto equalize payments among producers for their shares of the differentialand skim milk/protein pools move into and out of the producer-settlementfund. None of the adjustments necessary to implement protein pricing apply inthe case of butterfat. Both of the existing separate orders provide forhandler payments to producers for butterfat in their milk without the necessityof pooling butterfat values. The current method of paying producers directlyfor the butterfat in their milk rather than including it in the marketwidepool should be continued under the merged order.  Although the total value of the pool would not be changed materially becauseof adoption of the component pricing system included herein, the distributionof obligations to handlers and payments to producers can be expected tochange as they reflect the level of protein in milk as it is produced,received and used. 10. <T3>Payments to producers. </T3>Producer returns should be pooled on amarketwide basis under the merged order so that producers might share equitablyin the proceeds from the sale of their milk. Marketwide pooling is notbeing used in both of the individual markets, and its continuation wasincorporated in proponents' proposed order. There was no opposition tomarketwide pooling of producer returns. Adoption of a system of paying producers on the basis of the protein contentof their milk, as well as its butterfat content and their share of theClass I and Class II use in the market, necessitates a change in the waypayments to producers should be determined. Proponents' proposal of a weightedaverage differential price to distribute returns from fluid milk uses amongproducers should be adopted. In addition, instead of paying producers aprotein price that is the same as the price charged to handlers for theiruse of protein in Class II and Class III, as proposed by proponents, thevalue of protein used in Class II and Class III should be combined withthe value of skim milk used in Class I to determine the total value ofprotein in the pool. In most months, the combined value of Class II andClass III protein and Class I skim milk divided by the pounds of proteinin producer milk will result in a producer protein price to producers thatis the same as the protein price to handlers when rounded to the nearestwhole cent. Although there may be no difference between the protein priceto handlers and the producer protein price to producers, the Class I skimmilk and Class II and III protein should be pooled to assure that predominantlyfluid milk handlers are not required to pay for their Class I milk on thebasis of its protein content. Under the merged order, as under the present separate orders, there wouldbe no need to pool butterfat. The price per pound of butterfat would bepaid to producers by the handlers receiving it. Under the present pricingsystem, handlers are billed according to prices published on the basisof 3.5 percent butterfat. Blend prices to be paid to producers are alsoannounced on a 3.5 percent butterfat basis. Producers, however, are actuallypaid for their butterfat according to the uniform price adjusted by thebutterfat differential to the specific butterfat content of their milk.Amounts paid to producers for the butterfat in their milk should be thesame under the component pricing system as under the current system. Also,the portion of the present blend prices under the two separate orders thatis due to pooling the higher-valued fluid uses and adjustments would becompletely reflected in the weighted average differential price. Only theproducer protein price would represent any redistribution of pool proceedsto producers.<T3>Payments to producers and cooperative associations. </T3>The mergedorder should provide for a partial payment to producers on or before thelast day of the month, and for a final payment on or before the 17th dayof the following month. The partial payment would be for milk receivedduring the first 15 days of the month and should be paid at a rate of 1.2times the Class III price for the preceding month, but not to exceed theClass I price for the current month. Any proper deductions authorized bythe producer could be made from the partial payment for milk deliveredby the producer during the first 15 days of the month. The final paymentto each producer should be determined by the applicable weighted averagedifferential price adjusted for the location at which the producer's milkis received and the producer protein and butterfat prices, less any partialpayment made to such producer and any proper deductions authorized by theproducer. When payments are made to a cooperative association in lieu ofpayments to individual producers, both the partial and final payments shouldbe made prior to the date payments are due to individual producers. As adopted herein, the payment schedule is the same as now provided inthe present Great Basin order. Proponent proposed payment dates similarto those in the present Great Basin order, with some payment dates to cooperativeassociations and their members moved by 1 or 2 days. There was no oppositionto the proposed payment schedule at the hearing. However, in some casesit may be impossible for handlers to pay cooperative associations the fullvalue of their receipts of the cooperative's member milk before the handlerhas had an opportunity to receive equalization payments from the producer-settlementfund. Because of the potential difficulties in making payments accordingto the proposed schedule, and because proponents did not explain the differencesbetween their proposal and the payment dates in the present Great Basinorder, the merged order should adopt the payment dates specified in thepresent Great Basin order. Proponents included in the proposed merged order the present Great Basinrate of partial payment to producers for their milk deliveries during thefirst 15 days of the month of 1.2 times the previous month's Class IIIprice. However, the witness representing Safeway Stores, Inc., proposedthat the rate of partial payment be reduced to the level of the previousmonth's Class III price, as it is in most other Federal orders in the region,including the present Lake Mead order. In support of his proposal the witnesstestified that in 1961, when the higher partial payment rate was adopted,it resulted in prices lower than either the uniform price or the ClassI price at the time. He stated that as the Class III price has increased,the partial payment rate has exceeded the uniform price and the Class Iprice. The witness said that the partial payment price has been as muchas $1.66 over the uniform price and $.60 over the Class I price in recentyears. He asserted that a partial payment should represent only a portionof the total amount due for the first 15 days' deliveries of milk, andcertainly should not exceed the amount due for such milk. He argued thatthe proposed partial payment rate constitutes an overpayment for milk deliveredduring the first 15 days of the month, and should be reduced to the levelof the previous month's Class III price. A witness for IMPA testified that by the time producers are paid for milkdelivered during the first 15 days of the month, they have already delivered29 days' milk production without receiving any payment at all for the milkdelivered. He characterized the present payment schedule as requiring asubstantial extension of credit and credit risk which dairy farmers canill afford. The witness stated that the partial payment provides cash toproducers, enabling them to pay their bills and reducing the amount ofcredit they otherwise would be required to extend to handlers. He testifiedthat farmers today are in a tight cash position, and should not be facedwith reduced payments for the milk they have delivered. The witness admittedthat a dairy farmer who ceased milk deliveries during the second half ofthe month could be overpaid for his total production if the partial paymentfor his first 15 days' milk deliveries is determined by the rate proposedby merger proponents. Proponent witness stated that he would not be opposedto allowing authorized deductions to be made from partial payments to producers. The partial payment rate under the order applies only to milk deliveriesby producers during the first 15 days of the month. It seems clear thatpayments made for deliveries of milk during the period should not exceedthe greatest possible pool value that might accrue to such deliveries.On the other hand, producers under the order usually have delivered nearlyan entire month's production before receiving any payment for any of it.This problem could be addressed by requiring partial payments to producersto be made earlier, or by requiring partial payments to be made twice duringthe month rather than once. In any case, neither of those alternativeswas proposed or discussed in any testimony. Accordingly, the partial paymentrate determined by multiplying the previous month's Class III price by1.2 should be adopted, but should never be allowed to exceed the levelof the current month's Class I price. Partial payments at the rate adopted should not be required in the caseof producers who ship milk for only a small part of the second half ofthe month. Given the present relationship of the uniform price and thepartial payment rate, such producers would very likely be paid more fortheir first 15 days' delivery of milk than their entire production forthe month is worth. For this reason, partial payments would be requiredto be made only to producers who continue to ship milk through the 17thday of the month. In addition, overpayments to producers on a partial paymentbasis can be avoided more easily if deductions deemed proper by the marketadministrator and authorized by producers are allowed to be made from producers'partial payments. Such a provision would help to assure that producer paymentsare more evenly spaced throughout the month, and that the deductions tobe made from a producer's final payment would not exceed the total amountdue to the producer for his milk production during the second half of themonth.11. <T3>Obligations of partially regulated distributing plant operators. </T3>Twooptions for computing the obligation to the pool of the operator of a partiallyregulated distributing plant that is also regulated under a State orderthat provides for marketwide pooling of producer returns should be eliminated.Under the provisions adopted herein, such a handler may settle his obligationonly by paying the amount that the Federal order Class I value of the fluidmilk products that such plant distributes in the merged Great Basin marketingarea (less Class I receipts from pool sources) exceeds the value of themilk at the applicable State order prices. Partially regulated distributingplant operators who are not regulated under a State order that providesfor marketwide pooling would continue to have the same options under whichtheir obligations to the pool are currently computed.Under the present provisions of the Lake Mead order, every partially regulateddistributing plant operator has three options that may be used in settlementof its pool obligations:(a) The plant operator incurs no payment if the operator purchases fromany Federal milk order source an amount of milk classified and priced asClass I milk that is equivalent to such operator's fluid milk sales inthe marketing area. Such purchases, however, may not be used to offsetany obligation under another Federal order.(b) The plant operator incurs no obligation under the order, except foran administrative assessment charge on the volume of fluid milk productsdisposed of in the marketing area, if the operator's payments to dairyfarmers and to the producer-settlement fund of any Federal order are notless than the pool obligation that such operator would have incurred ifsuch plant had been fully regulated under the order. Under this option,which is commonly referred to as the ``Wichita'' option, a plant operatorwhose payments for milk are less than the order's obligations may pay thedifference either to its own dairy farmers or to the producer-settlementfund.(c) The plant operator may choose to pay to the producer-settlement fundthe difference between the Class I price and the producer blend price ofthe order (both prices adjusted for the location of the plant) on all fluidmilk products distributed in the marketing area (less any purchases ofmilk classified and priced as Class I milk under any Federal order).In addition, a partially regulated distributing plant operator regulatedunder a State order has a fourth option under which his pool obligationmay be determined:(d) The plant operator may choose to pay to the producer-settlement fundthe difference between the Class I price applicable at the location ofthe plant and the applicable price for the fluid milk products distributedin the marketing area as determined under the State program.The present Great Basin order contains only options (a), (b) and (c) fordetermining obligations of partially regulated distributing plants. Thoseoptions will be sufficient for determining the pool obligations of suchplants not regulated under a State order. For determining the obligationsof such plants that are State-regulated, options (a) and (d) will be sufficient.An IMPA witness testified that some of the options currently availableto determine the pool obligations of all partially regulated distributingplant operators are inappropriate for determining the obligations of suchhandlers that are regulated under a State order providing for marketwidepooling. According to the witness, approximately 20 percent of the fluidmilk distributed within the current Lake Mead marketing area is distributedfrom plants located in southern California. He stated that these handlersare regulated under the California State Pooling Plan. Under the StatePlan, he said, regulated handlers are required to pay for the milk theyuse, according to the class in which it is used, primarily on the basisof the butterfat and solids-not-fat contained in the milk. The value ofall the milk received by each California handler is pooled on a marketwidebasis and then redistributed to producers on the basis of the individualproducer's production quota and base. As a consequence, the payments receivedby dairy farmers supplying individual plants have no direct relationshipto the uses made of their milk by the handlers receiving it, or to theamounts paid into the pool by the receiving handlers.The witness stated that the payment option currently available only toCalifornia State-regulated handlers, which prices sales in the marketingarea at the difference between the State order and Federal order prices,is a precise method of determining the exact cost difference of the products.According to the witness, the other payment options available to partiallyregulated distributing plant operators have no validity in comparing thecost of the products under the State and Federal orders. The witness' positionwas that the costs attributed to the handler in payment options (b) and(c) above do not accurately represent the actual cost of the milk usedby a California-regulated handler in the fluid products distributed withinthe Federal marketing area. He explained that under California regulation,the price paid by handlers for milk used in fluid products is publiclyannounced and strictly enforced. He stated further that the milk poolingplan operated by the State of California differs so greatly from the provisionsof the Federal order that the values which must be computed under options(b) and (c) above are extremely difficult to determine for California-regulatedhandlers. Therefore, he concluded, only the present payment option thattakes into account the actual prices paid by California handlers for milkused in fluid products should be used to determine the payment obligationsof such handlers. Although California handlers would be the only ones affectedby the proposed provision under present marketing conditions, the witnessstated that the payment provision would apply to any partially regulateddistributing plant operators regulated under any State order that providesfor marketwide pooling.The representative of Safeway Stores, Inc., a company operating multipledistributing plants, one of which is a large distributing plant in southernCalifornia with fluid milk sales in the Lake Mead marketing area, testifedthat the company would prefer to retain in the order all of the paymentoptions currently available to the operator of a partially regulated distributingplant. The witness also proposed changing the language of the provisionsgoverning the obligation of a partially regulated distributing plant operatorregulated by a State order. The proposed modification would determine suchan obligation on the basis of the difference in value of the fluid milkproducts distributed in the marketing area under the State and Federalorder prices, rather than multiplying the pounds of such disposition bythe difference between the applicable prices. The post-hearing brief filedon behalf of the handler expressed the opinion that the importance of retainingthe present payment options of a partially regulated distributing plantoperator is not as great as the handler considered it to be at the hearing.The proponents' position with regard to partially regulated distributingplant obligations was supported by a witness representing a Great Basinpool distributing plant that had not yet begun operating at the time ofthe hearing. The witness supported the proposal in the interest of assuringthat all handlers distributing fluid milk products in the marketing areahave uniform costs for milk that is used in similar products.Federal milk orders contain provisions that establish payment obligationsof handlers who distribute fluid milk products within the marketing area,but not to an extent great enough to meet pooling standards. These obligationsare imposed for the purpose of assuring that all handlers who distributesignificant amounts of fluid milk products in the marketing area are subjectto comparable costs for such milk. Payment obligations that would resultin a cost of milk to a partially regulated distributing plant operatorgreater than that which would be imposed on a regulated handler would amountto a trade barrier. However, there is no indication that computing a partiallyregulated distributing plant operator's obligation to the pool on the basisof the difference between the values of the handler's milk under the Federaland State milk orders would be considered inequitable or a barrier to trade.Such a handler would be paying no more for milk distributed within themarketing area than the fully regulated handlers with whom the State-regulatedhandler is competing. At the same time, fully regulated handlers wouldbe assured that the partially regulated handler has not obtained a competitiveadvantage by virtue of paying less than they are required to pay for milkused in fluid products.Proponent witness' testimony in the hearing record is contradictory regardingproponents' intention as to whether the obligation of a partially regulateddistributing plant operator should be determined on the basis of the differencein price between the Federal and State orders, or the difference in thevalues of the fluid milk products concerned as determined by the Federaland State orders. Most of the language in the section of the proposed mergedorder that deals with obligations of partially regulated distributing plantoperators is identical to that in the present separate orders.Proponents' modification of the language of the present Lake Mead orderrelating to such handlers that are State-regulated seemed to indicate thatproponents wanted the State-regulated handlers' actual cost of milk tobe the amount compared to the Federal order value in computing the handlers'pool obligation. However, in exceptions to the recommended decision, proponentargued that its testimony had been misunderstood, and explained that itsintent had been to compute the obligation of partially regulated distributingplant operators at the difference between the Federal and State order ClassI prices. According to proponent, variations in the butterfat and nonfatsolids contents of the milk distributed by both Federally-regulated andState-regulated handlers are to be expected and have no bearing on theClass I differentials charged to handlers. Therefore, proponent stated,such variations should not be considered in any determination of the rateof compensatory payment charged to partially regulated plants.It is recognized that the Class I prices published by the State of Californiaare for informational and comparison purposes, and do not determine exactlywhat a California-regulated handler actually pays for milk used in fluidproducts. However, the published prices do reflect what a handler wouldpay for milk of a standard butterfat and nonfat solids content, as Federalorder prices reflect the value of milk at a standard butterfat content.The content of both butterfat and nonfat solids in milk distributed byboth State-regulated and Federally-regulated handlers can be expected tovary between handlers. It would not be appropriate for the market administratorto become involved in determining the nonfat solids and butterfat contentof milk distributed in the marketing area by State-regulated handlers inorder to calculate the obligations of partially regulated distributingplants. Therefore, for the purpose of determining the amount of paymentto be made by State-regulated handlers distributing milk within the Federalorder marketing area, consideration of the State and Federal announcedClass I prices will be sufficient.The intent of the section of the merged order dealing with the obligationsof partially regulated distributing plants not regulated by a State orderwas to leave such obligations unchanged. andSection; 1139.76(a)(1)(iv), aspublished in the recommended decision, would change the computation ofobligations such a handler would have to the marketwide pool. Therefore,the language of that paragraph has been changed from the recommended decisionso that those handler obligations will remain unchanged.12. <T3>Administrative provisions_administrative assessment. </T3>The maximumrate of payments by handlers for the cost of administering the merged ordershould be 4 cents per hundredweight. Such payments are required if themarket administrator is to perform the necessary function of administeringthe merged order. The 4-cent per hundredweight rate is the same as underthe two separate orders, and was proposed at the hearing without objection.Continuation of the 4-cent rate should enable the market administratorto administer the merged order effectively. If experience indicates thatthe merged order can be administered at a lesser rate, the order providesthat the Secretary may adjust the rate downward without the necessity ofa hearing.<T3>Deduction for marketing services. </T3>The maximum rate of deductionfrom payments to nonmember producers for the cost of providing marketingservices such as butterfat and protein testing and market information shouldbe 6 cents per hundredweight. The marketing service deduction is necessaryto reimburse the market administrator for providing such services to producersfor whom the services are not provided by a cooperative association.Currently, the maximum rates under the separate orders are 6 cents underthe Great Basin order and 7 cents under the Lake Mead order. A 6-cent rate,which was proposed at the hearing without objection, should enable themarket administrator to provide adequate testing and information servicesto nonmember producers. The marketing service deduction rate, like theadministrative assessment, may be adjusted downward if the maximum rateis higher than necessary.Because operation of the merged order would require that all producers'milk be tested for protein content, the market administrator would be authorizedto establish, as well as verify, producer tests. Although not proposed,such a provision is necessary because it is apparent from the hearing recordthat not all of the handlers of producer milk in the merged order areaare equipped to test for protein content.<T3>Merger of the administrative expense, marketing service, and producer-settlementfunds. </T3>To accomplish the merger of the two orders effectively andequitably, the reserves in the administrative expense funds that have accumulatedunder the individual orders should be combined. Similar procedures shouldbe followed with respect to the marketing service and producer-settlementfund reserves of the individual orders. Any liabilities of such funds underthe individual orders should be paid from the appropriate new funds establishedunder the merged order. Similarly, obligations that are due the severalfunds under the individual orders should be paid to the appropriate combinedfund under the merged order.The money paid to the administrative expense fund is each handler's proportionateshare of the cost of administering the order. It is anticipated that allhandlers currently regulated under the two orders will continue to be regulatedunder the merged order. In view of this, it would be an unnecessary administrativeand financial burden to allocate back to handlers the reserve funds underthe individual orders and then accumulate an adequate reserve for the mergedorder. It is equally equitable and more efficient to combine the administrativemonies accumulated under the individual orders and to pay any liabilitiesagainst such funds from the consolidated fund of the merged order.The money accumulated in the marketing service funds of the individualorders is that which has been paid by producers for whom the market administratoris performing services. The producers who have contributed to the marketingservice fund of each order are expected to continue to supply milk forthe merged Great Basin market. The consolidation of the reserves in theindividual marketing service funds is therefore appropriate in view ofthe continuation of the marketing service program for these producers underthe merged order.The producer-settlement fund balances in the two orders should be combinedso that the producer-settlement fund under the merged order may be continuedwithout interruption. The producers currently supplying the individualmarkets are expected to continue to supply milk for the merged Great Basinmarket. Thus, monies now in the producer-settlement funds of the individualorders would be reflected in the uniform prices of the producers who willbenefit from the merged order. The combined fund would also serve as acontingency fund from which money would be available to meet obligations[resulting from audit adjustments and otherwise] accruing under one orthe other of the separate funds.<ITAG tagnum="84">Rulings on Proposed Findings and Conclusions</ITAG>Briefs and proposed findings and conclusions were filed on behalf of certaininterested parties. These briefs, proposed findings and conclusions andthe evidence in the record were considered in making the findings and conclusionsset forth above. To the extent that the suggested findings and conclusionsfiled by interested parties are inconsistent with the findings and conclusionsset forth herein, the requests to make such findings or reach such conclusionsare denied for the reasons previously stated in this decision.<ITAG tagnum="84">General Findings</ITAG>The findings and determinations hereinafter set forth supplement thosethat were made when the Great Basin and Lake Mead orders were first issuedand when they were amended. The previous findings and determinations arehereby ratified and confirmed, except where they may conflict with thoseset forth herein.(a) The tentative marketing agreement, the Great Basin order which amendsand merges the Great Basin and Lake Mead orders, and all of the terms andconditions thereof, will tend to effectuate the declared policy of theAct;             (b) The parity prices of milk as determined pursuant to section 2 of theAct are not reasonable in view of the price of feeds, available suppliesof feeds, and other economic conditions which affect market supply anddemand for milk in the merged marketing area, and the minimum prices specifiedin the tentative marketing agreement and the merged order, are such pricesas will reflect the aforesaid factors, insure a sufficient quantity ofpure and wholesome milk, and be in the public interest;(c) The tentative marketing agreement and the merged Great Basin order,will regulate the handling of milk in the same manner as, and will be applicableonly to persons in the respective classes of industrial and commercialactivity specified in, marketing agreements upon which a hearing has beenheld;(d) All milk and milk products handled by handlers, as defined in the tentativemarketing agreement and the merged Great Basin order are in the currentof interstate commerce or directly burden, obstruct, or affect interstatecommerce in milk or its products; and(e) It is hereby found that the necessary expense of the market administratorfor the maintenance and functioning of such agency will require the paymentby each handler, as his pro rata share of such expense, 4 cents per hundredweightor such lesser amount as the Secretary may prescribe, with respect to milkspecified in andSection; 1139.85 of the tentative marketing agreement andthe merged Great Basin order.<ITAG tagnum="84">Rulings on Exceptions</ITAG>In arriving at the findings and conclusions, and the regulatory provisionsof this decision, each of the exceptions received was carefully and fullyconsidered in conjunction with the record evidence. To the extent thatthe findings and conclusions and the regulatory provisions of this decisionare at variance with any of the exceptions, such exceptions are herebyoverruled for the reasons previously stated in this decision.<ITAG tagnum="84">Marketing Agreement and Order</ITAG>Annexed hereto and made a part hereof are two documents, a Marketing Agreementregulating the handling of milk, and an Order amending and merging theorders regulating the handling of milk in the Great Basin and Lake Meadmarketing areas, which have been decided upon as the detailed and appropriatemeans of effectuating the foregoing conclusions.It is hereby ordered that this entire decision and the two documents annexedhereto be published in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4><ITAG tagnum="84">Determination of Producer Approval and Representative Period</ITAG>July 1987 is hereby determined to be the representative period for thepurpose of ascertaining whether the issuance of the attached order, amendingand merging the orders regulating the handling of milk in the Great Basinand Lake Mead marketing area is approved or favored by producers, as definedunder the terms of the attached order who during such representative periodwere engaged in the production of milk for sale within the marketing areadefined in such attached order.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 7 CFR 1136 and 1139</ITAG>Milk marketing orders, Milk, Dairy products.<ITAG tagnum="21">Signed at Washington, DC, on December 30, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Kenneth A. Gilles,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary for Marketing and Inspection Services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="85">Order Amending and Merging the Orders Regulating the Handling of Milkin the Great Basin and Lake Mead Marketing Areas</ITAG>(This order shall not become effective unless and until the requirementsof andSection; 900.14 of the rules of practice and procedure governing proceedingsto formulate marketing agreements and marketing orders have been met.)Findings and DeterminationsThe findings and determinations hereinafter set forth supplement thosethat were made when the orders were first issued and when they were amended.The previous findings and determinations are hereby ratified and confirmed,except where they may conflict with those set forth herein.(a) <T3>Findings. </T3>A public hearing was held upon certain proposed amendmentsto the tentative marketing agreements and to the orders regulating thehandling of milk in the Great Basin and Lake Mead marketing areas. Thehearing was held pursuant to the provisions of the Agricultural MarketingAgreement Act of 1937, as amended (7 U.S.C. 601-674), and the applicablerules of practice and procedure (7 CFR Part 900).Upon the basis of the evidence introduced at such hearing and the recordthereof, it is found that:(1) The merged Great Basin order, which amends and merges the Great Basinand Lake Mead orders, and all of the terms and conditions thereof, willtend to effectuate the declared policy of the Act;(2) The parity prices of milk, as determined pursuant to section 2 of theAct, are not reasonable in view of the price of feeds, available suppliesof feeds, and other economic conditions which affect market supply anddemand for milk in the merged Great Basin marketing area; and the minimumprices specified in the merged Great Basin order are such prices as willreflect the aforesaid factors, insure a sufficient quantity of pure andwholesome milk, and be in the public interest;(3) The merged Great Basin order regulates the handling of milk in thesame manner as, and is applicable only to persons in the respective classesof industrial or commercial activity specified in, a marketing agreementupon which a hearing has been held;(4) All milk and milk products handled by handlers, as defined in the mergedGreat Basin order, are in the current of interstate commerce or directlyburden, obstruct, or affect interstate commerce in milk or its products;and(5) It is hereby found that the necessary expense of the market administratorfor the maintenance and functioning of such agency will require the paymentby each handler, as his pro rata share of such expense, 4 cents per hundredweightor such lesser amount as the Secretary may prescribe, with respect to milkspecified in andSection; 1139.85.<ITAG tagnum="85">Order Relative to Handling</ITAG>It is therefore ordered that on and after the effective date hereof, thehandling of milk in the Great Basin and Lake Mead marketing areas (Parts1136 and 1139, respectively) shall be amended and merged into one order.Part 1136 is superseded thereby, and such vacated part designation shallbe reserved for future assignment. The handling of milk in the merged marketingarea, to be designated as the ``Great Basin marketing area'' (Part 1139),shall be in conformity to and in compliance with the terms and conditionsof the orders, as amended, and as hereby amended and merged as follows:The provisions of the proposed marketing agreement and order amending andmerging the Great Basin and Lake Mead orders contained in the recommendeddecision issued by the Administrator, AMS, on July 14, 1987, and publishedin the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on July 21, 1987 (52 FR 27372), shall be andare the terms and provisions of this order, and are set forth in full herein,subject to the following modifications:1. In andSection; 1139.7, paragraph (d) is revised.2. In andSection; 1139.30, paragraph (a)(1) is revised.3. In andSection; 1139.52, paragraph (b) is revised.4. In andSection; 1139.60, paragraphs (c)(1), (d)(1), (d)(2), (e), (f), (g)and (i) are revised.5. In andSection; 1139.71, paragraphs (a)(2)(i) and (ii) are revised.6. In andSection; 1139.76, paragraphs (a)(1)(iv), (b)(2)(i), and (b)(3) arerevised.Accordingly, 7 CFR Part 1136 is proposed to be removed and Part 1139 isproposed to be revised as follows: Part 1136 [Removed]<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 1139_ MILK IN THE GREAT BASIN MARKETING AREA</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart_Order Regulating Handling</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">General Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.1 General provisions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Definitions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.2 Great Basin marketing area.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.3 Route disposition.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.4 [Reserved].</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.5 Distributing plant.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.6 Supply plant.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.7 Pool plant.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.8 Nonpool plant.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.9 Handler.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.10 Producer-handler.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.11 Approved milk.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.12 Producer.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.13 Producer milk.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.14 Other source milk.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.15 Fluid milk product.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.16 Fluid cream product.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.17 Filled milk.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.18 Cooperative association.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.19 Product prices.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.20 Federation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Handler Reports</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.30 Reports of receipts and utilization.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.31 Payroll reports.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.32 Other reports.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Classification of Milk</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.40 Classes of utilization.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.41 Shrinkage.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.42 Classification of transfers and diversions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.43 General accounting and classification rules.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.44 Classification of producer milk.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.45 Market administrator's reports and announcements concerningclassification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Class and Component Prices</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.50 Class prices and component prices.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.51 Basic formula prices.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.52 Plant location adjustments for handlers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.53 Announcement of class and component prices.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.54 Equivalent price.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Differential Pool and Handler Obligations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.60 Computation of handler's obligations to pool.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.61 Computation of weighted average differential price.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.62 Computation of producers protein price.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.63 Uniform price and handlers' obligations for producer milk.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.64 Announcement of weighted average differential price, producerprotein price, and uniform price.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Payments for Milk</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.70 Producer-settlement fund.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.71 Payments to the producer-settlement fund.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.72 Payments from the producer-settlement fund.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.73 Value of producer milk.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.74 Payments to producers and to cooperative associations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.75 Location and zone differentials for producer and nonpool milk.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.76 Payments by a handler operating a partially regulated distributingplant.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.77 Adjustment of accounts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.78 Charges on overdue accounts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="75">Administrative Assessment and Marketing Service Deduction</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.85 Assessment for order administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1139.86 Deduction for marketing services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 1-19, 48 Stat. 31, as amended (7 U.S.C. 601-674).</ITAG>Final Decision_Great Basin and Lake Mead<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart_Order Regulating Handling</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">General Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General provisions.</ITAG>The terms, definitions, and provisions in Part 1000 of this chapter arehereby incorporated by reference, and made a part of this order.<ITAG tagnum="84">Definitions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Great Basin marketing area.</ITAG>``Great Basin marketing area'' (hereinafter called the ``marketing area'')means all the territory, including all municipalities and government reservationsand installations within, or partially within, the counties listed below:<ITAG tagnum="74">Utah Counties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">All</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Nevada Counties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Clark, Elko, Lincoln and White Pine </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Wyoming Counties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Lincoln and Uinta</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Idaho Counties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Bannock, Bear Lake, Bingham, Bonneville, Caribou, Franklin, Jefferson,Madison, Oneida and Power</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Route disposition.</ITAG>``Route disposition'' means any delivery of a fluid milk product from aplant to a retail or wholsesale outlet (including any delivery to a distributionpoint by a vendor, from a plant store, or through a vending machine). Theterm ``route disposition'' does not include a delivery to a plant definedin andSection; 1139.7(a) or (b).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Reserved].</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Distributing plant.</ITAG>``Distributing plant'' means a plant in which approved fluid milk productsor filled milk are processed or packaged, and from which fluid milk productsare disposed of on routes in the marketing area during the month.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Supply plant.</ITAG>``Supply plant'' means a plant from which approved fluid milk productsor filled milk are transferred in bulk form during the month to a pooldistributing plant.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Pool plant.</ITAG>``Pool plant'' means any plant, except a plant defined in andSection; 1139.8,which meets the standards of one or more of paragraphs (a) through (e)of this section:(a) A distributing plant from which not less than:(1) 50 percent in any month of September through February, 45 percent inany month of March and April, and 40 percent in any month of May throughAugust of the approved fluid milk products, except filled milk, receivedat such plant (excluding milk received at such plant from other order plantsor dairy farms which is classified in Class II or Class III under thisorder and which is subject to the pricing and pooling provisions of anyother order issued pursuant to the Act), are disposed of as route disposition;and(2) 15 percent of such receipts are disposed of as route disposition inthe marketing area during the month.(3) If a handler operates more than one distributing plant, the combinedreceipts and fluid milk product dispositions of such plants may be usedas the basis for qualifying all of the plants pursuant to paragraph (a)(1)of this section, provided the handler so notifies the market administratorin writing before the last day of the month for which such consolidationis desired.(b) A distributing plant that meets the following conditions:(1) The plant is located in the marketing area;(2) The plant meets the requirements of paragraph (a)(1) of this section;and(3) The principal activity of such plant is the processing and distributionof aseptically processed and packaged fluid milk products.(c) A supply plant from which during the month not less than 50 percentof its approved milk receipts from dairy farmers is transferred to a pooldistributing plant pursuant to paragraphs (a) or (b) of this section asfluid milk products. Any supply plant that has qualified as a pool plantin each of the immediately preceding months of August through Februaryshall be a pool plant in each of the following months of March throughJuly unless written request for nonpool status for any of such months isfiled by the plant operator with the market administrator prior to thefirst day of the month the request is to be effective. A plant withdrawnfrom pool supply plant status may not be reinstated for any subsequentmonth of the March through July period unless it fulfills the transferringrequirement of this paragraph for such month.(d) Any manufacturing plant, or other plant not defined in paragraphs (a),(b) or (c) of this section, located within the marketing area at whichmilk is received from producers and which is owned and operated by a cooperativeassociation or federation which delivers at least 45 percent of its producermilk (including that in fluid milk products transferred from its own plantpursuant to this paragraph that is not in excess of the amount in producermilk actually received at such plant) to pool distributing plants duringthe current month or the 12-month period ending with the current month,if the cooperative association or federation requests pool plant statusfor such plant in writing before the first day of any month for which suchstatus is to be effective.(e) The pool plant performance standards in paragraphs (a)(1), (b), (c)or (d) of this section may be reduced or increased by 10 percentage pointsby the Director of the Dairy Division if that person finds such revisionis necessary to assure orderly marketing and efficient handling of milkin the marketing area. Before making such a finding, the Director shallinvestigate the need for revision either at the Director's own initiativeor at the request of interested persons. If the investigation shows thata revision might be appropriate, the Director shall issue a notice statingthat the revision is being considered and invite data, views, and arguments.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.8</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Nonpool plant.</ITAG>``Nonpool plant'' means any plant defined in this section, and any othermilk receiving, manufacturing, or processing plant, other than a pool plant:(a) ``Producer-handler plant'' means a plant operated by a producer-handleras defined in this, or any other order issued pursuant to the Act.(b) ``Other order plant'' means a plant as specified under paragraph (b)(1), (2) or (3) of this section that is fully subject to the pricing andpooling provisions of another order issued pursuant to the Act:(1) A distributing plant qualified pursuant to andSection; 1139.7(a) thatalso meets the pool plant requirements of another Federal order, and fromwhich the Secretary determines a greater quantity of Class I milk was disposedof as route disposition during the month in such other Federal order marketingarea than was disposed of as route disposition in this marketing area,except that if such plant was subject to all the provisions of this orderin the immediately preceding month, it shall continue to be subject toall the provisions of this order until the third consecutive month in whicha greater proportion of its Class I route disposition is made in such othermarketing area;(2) A supply plant qualified pursuant to andSection; 1139.7(c) that alsomeets the pool plant requirements of another Federal order and from whicha larger quantity of fluid milk products is transferred during the monthto plants regulated under such other order than is transferred to distributingplants under this order, except that transfers to other order plants forClass III dispositions during the months of March through July shall bedisregarded for purposes of this computation if the operator of the supplyplant elects to retain pool status under this order; or(3) A plant qualified pursuant to andSection; 1139.7 (a), (b), or (c) whichthe Secretary determines, despite the provisions of this order, to be fullyregulated under another Federal order.(c) ``Exempt plant'' means a distributing plant:(1) Having less than an average of one thousand pounds per day of routedispositions in the marketing area during the month;(2) Operated by a governmental agency, or a duly accredited college oruniversity, disposing of fluid milk products only through the operationof its own food service, and having no route dispositions in commercialchannels; or(3) From which the total route disposition is to individuals or institutionsfor charitable purposes without remuneration from such individuals or institutions.(d) ``Partially regulated distributing plant'' means a distributing plantthat does not qualify as a pool plant and is not an other order plant,a producer-handler plant, or an exempt distributing plant.(e) ``Unregulated supply plant'' means a supply plant that does not qualifyas a pool plant and is not an other order plant, a producer-handler plant,or an exempt distributing plant.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.9</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Handler.</ITAG>``Handler'' means:(a) Any person who operates one or more pool plants;(b) Any cooperative association with respect to producer milk divertedfor the account of such association pursuant to andSection; 1139.13;(c) Any cooperative association or federation with respect to milk thatis received at the farm for delivery to a pool plant of another handlerin a tank truck owned and operated by, or under the control of, such cooperativeassociation or federation; or(d) Any person who operates a plant defined in andSection; 1139.8 (a) through(e).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Producer-handler.</ITAG>``Producer-handler'' means any person who meets all of the following conditions:(a) Operates a dairy farm(s) from which the milk produced thereon is suppliedto a plant operated by such person in accordance with the conditions setforth in paragraph (b) of this section, and provides proof satisfactoryto the market administrator that:(1) The full maintenance of milk-producing cows on such farm(s) is suchperson's sole risk, and under such person's complete and exclusive managementand control;(2) Each such farm is owned or operated by and at the role risk of suchperson, and under such person's complete and exclusive management and control;and(3) Only such person, and no other person (except a member of such person'simmediate family, or a stockholder in the case of a corporate operator)employed on such farm(s) own, fully or partially, either the cows producingthe milk on the farm or the farm on which it is produced;(b) Operates a plant in which approved milk is processed or packaged andfrom which there is route disposition during the month in the marketingarea, and:(1) No fluid milk products are received at such plant during the monthor by such person at any other location except:(i) From the dairy farm(s) specified in (a) of this section; and(ii) From pool plants by transfer or diversion, or from other order plants,in an amount that is not in excess of the larger of 5,000 pounds or 5 percentof such person's Class I disposition during the month;(2) Such plant is operated under such person's complete and exclusive managementand control and at such person's sole risk, and is not used during themonth to process, package, receive or otherwise handle fluid milk productsfor any other person; and(3) For the purpose of this section, all fluid milk products disposed ofas route disposition or at stores operated by such person or by any person(including the operator of a plant, or vendor) who controls or is controlledby such person (e.g., as an interlocking stockholder) or in which suchperson (including, in the case of a corporation, any stockholder therein)has a financial interest, shall be considered as having been received atsuch person's plant; and the utilization for such plant shall include allsuch route and store dispositions; and(c) Disposes of no other source milk (except in the fortification of fluidmilk products) as Class I milk.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approved milk.</ITAG>``Approved milk'' means any milk or fluid milk product that is approvedfor fluid consumption by a duly constituted regulatory authority.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.12</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Producer.</ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) hereof, ``producer'' means anyperson:(1) Who produces approved milk; and(2) Whose milk is received at a pool plant or diverted to a nonpool plantwithin the limits set forth in andSection; 1139.13.(b) ``Producer'' shall not include:(1) A producer-handler as defined under any order (including this order)issued pursuant to the Act;(2) Any person with respect to milk diverted to a pool plant from anotherorder plant, if the other order designates such person as a producer underthat order, and such milk is allocated to Class II or Class III utilizationpursuant to andSection; 1139.44(a)(8)(iii) and the corresponding step ofandSection; 1139.44(b);(3) Any person with respect to milk diverted to another order plant ifany part of such milk was allocated to Class I, or the other order definessuch person as a producer; or(4) Any person whose milk is received at a nonpool plant (except anotherorder plant) other than as a diversion from a pool plant after the firstdelivery of milk from such dairy farmer in any month was received as approvedmilk at a pool plant, or was otherwise qualified as producer milk.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.13</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Producer milk.</ITAG>``Producer milk'' means the skim milk and butterfat in milk of a producerthat is:(a) Received or diverted by a handler defined in andSection; 1139.9(a) underone of the following conditions:(1) Received at such handler's pool plant directly from the farm of suchproducer;(2) Received at such handler's pool plant from a handler defined in andSection;1139.9(c); or(3) Diverted to a nonpool plant subject to the conditions set forth inparagraph (d) in this section;(b) Diverted by a handler defined in andSection; 1139.9(b) to a nonpool plantsubject to the conditions set forth in paragraph (d) of this section;(c) Received by a handler defined in andSection; 1139.9(c) from the producer'sfarm in excess of the producer's milk that is received at pool plants pursuantto paragraph (a)(2) of this section. Such producer milk shall be deemedto have been received by the handler at the location of the pool plantto which the milk was delivered;(d) The following conditions shall apply to producer milk diverted to anonpool plant:(1) The milk shall be priced at the location of the plant to which diverted;(2) A cooperative association or federation may divert for its accountthe milk of any of its producers from whom at least one day's milk productionis received during the month at a pool plant. The total quantity of milkso diverted may not exceed 60 percent in the months of April through Augustand 50 percent in other months of the producer milk which the associationor federation causes to be delivered to pool plants or diverted to nonpoolplants during the month. Two or more cooperative associations may havetheir allowable diversions computed on the basis of their combined deliveriesof the producer milk which the cooperative associations cause to be deliveredto pool plants or diverted pursuant to this section if each associationhas filed a request in writing with the market administrator before thefirst day of the month the agreement is effective. This request shall specifythe basis for assigning over-diverted milk to the producer deliveries ofeach cooperative association according to a method approved by the marketadministrator;(3) The operator of a pool plant (other than a cooperative associationor federation) may divert for its account the milk of any producer (otherthan milk diverted pursuant to paragraph (d)(2) of this section) from whomat least one day's milk production is received during the month at a poolplant. The total quantity of milk so diverted may not exceed 60 percentin the months of April through August, and 50 percent in other months ofthe producer milk received at or diverted from such pool plant for whichthe operator of such plant is the handler during the month. The milk forwhich the operator of such plant is the handler from the month may notduplicate milk diverted pursuant to paragraph (d)(2) of this section;(4) The diversion limits of this paragraph may be increased or decreasedby up to 10 percentage points by the Director of the Dairy Division ifthat person finds such revision is necessary to obtain needed shipmentsor to prevent uneconomic shipments. Before making such a finding, the Directorshall investigate the needs for revision either at the Director's own initiativeor at the request of interested persons. If the investigation shows thata revision might be appropriate, the Director shall issue a notice statingthat the revision is being considered and invite data, views, and arguments;(5) Diversions in excess of the percentages in paragraphs (d)(2) and (d)(3)of this section shall not be producer milk, and the diverting handler shalldesignate the milk which is not producer milk. If the handler fails tomake such designation, no milk diverted by the handler shall be producermilk. In the event some of the milk of any producer is determined not tobe producer milk pursuant to this paragraph, other milk delivered by theproducer during the month as producer milk will not be subject to andSection;1139.12(b)(4); and(6) Milk of a dairy farmer who was not a producer in the preceding monthshall not be eligible for diversion until after one day's milk productionfrom such farmer has been received at a pool plant.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.14</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other source milk.</ITAG>``Other source milk'' means all skim milk and butterfat contained in orrepresented by:(a) Receipts of fluid milk products and bulk products specified in andSection;1139.40(b)(1) from any source other than producers, handlers defined inandSection; 1139.9(c), pool plants, or inventory at the beginning of themonth;(b) Receipts in packaged form from other plants of products specified inandSection; 1139.40(b)(1);(c) Products (other than fluid milk products, products specified in andSection;1139.40(b)(1), and products produced at the plant during the same month)from any source which are reprocessed, converted into, or combined withanother product in the plant during the month; and(d) Receipts of any milk product (other than a fluid milk product or aproduct specified in andSection; 1139.40(b)(1)) for which the handler failsto establish a disposition.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fluid milk product.</ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this section, ``fluid milk product''means any of the following products in fluid or frozen form: milk, skimmilk, lowfat milk, milk drinks, buttermilk, filled milk, and milkshakeand ice milk mixes containing less than 20 percent total solids, includingany such products that are flavored, cultured, modified with added nonfatmilk solids, concentrated (if in consumer-type packages), or reconstituted.(b) The term ``fluid milk product'' shall not include:(1) Evaporated or condensed milk (plain or sweetened), evaporated or condensedskim milk (plain or sweetened), whey, formulas especially prepared forinfant feeding or dietary use that are packaged in hermetically sealedglass or all-metal containers, or aseptically packaged and hermeticallysealed in foil-lined paper containers, and any product that contains byweight less than 6.5 percent nonfat milk solids; and(2) The quantity of skim milk in any modified product specified in paragraph(a) of this section that is in excess of the quantity of skim milk in anequal volume of an unmodified product of the same nature and butterfatcontent.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.16</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fluid cream product.</ITAG>``Fluid cream product'' means cream (other than plastic cream or frozencream), sour cream, or a mixture (including a cultured mixture) of creamand milk or skim milk containing 9 percent or more butterfat, with or withoutthe addition of other ingredients.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.17</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Filled milk.</ITAG>``Filled milk'' means any combination of nonmilk fat (or oil) with skimmilk (whether fresh, cultured, reconstituted or modified by the additionof nonfat milk solids), with or without milk fat, so that the product (includingstabilizers, emulsifiers, or flavoring), resembles milk or any other fluidmilk product, and contains less than 6 percent nonmilk fat (or oil).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.18</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cooperative association.</ITAG>``Cooperative association'' means any cooperative marketing associationof dairy farmers, including producers, which the Secretary determines,after application by the cooperative association:(a) To be qualified under the provisions of the Act of Congress of February18, 1922, known as the ``Capper-Volstead Act'', and any amendments thereto;(b) To have full authority in the sale of milk of its members and to beengaged in making collective sales of or marketing milk for its members;and(c) To have its entire activities under the control of its members.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.19</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Product prices.</ITAG>The prices specified in this section as computed and published by the Directorof the Dairy Division, Agricultural Marketing Service, shall be used incalculating the basic Class II formula price pursuant to andSection; 1139.51(b)and the term ``work-day'' as used herein shall mean each Monday throughFriday that is not a national holiday.(a) ``Butter price'' means the simple average of the prices per pound ofapproved (92-score) butter on the Chicago Mercantile Exchange for the work-daysduring the first 15 days of the month, using the price reported each weekas the price for the day of the report, and for each succeeding work-dayuntil the next price is reported.(b) ``Cheddar cheese price'' means the simple average for the work-daysduring the first 15 days of the month, of the prices per pound of cheddarcheese in 40-pound blocks on the National Cheese Exchange (Green Bay, WI).The price reported for each week shall be used as the price for the dayon which reported, and for each succeeding work-day until the next priceis reported.(c) ``Nonfat dry milk price'' means the simple average of the prices perpound of nonfat dry milk for the work-days during the first 15 days ofthe month computed as follows:(1) Use the prices (using the midpoint of any price range as one price)reported each week for high heat, low heat and approved nonfat dry milk,respectively, for the Central States production area;(2) Compute a simple average of the weekly prices for the three types ofnonfat dry milk in paragraph (c)(1) of this section. Such average shallbe the daily price for the day on which the prices were reported and foreach preceding work-day until the day such prices were previously reported;and(3) Add the prices determined in paragraph (c)(2) of this section for thework-days during the first 15 days of the month and compute the simpleaverage thereof.(d) ``Edible whey price'' means the simple average of the prices per poundof edible whey powder for the Central States production area for the work-daysduring the first 15 days of the month. The prices used shall be the price(using the midpoint of any price range as one price) reported each weekas the daily price for the day on which reported, and for each precedingwork-day until the day such price was previously reported.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Federation.</ITAG>Federation means a business organization which is incorporated under statelaw that is owned and operated by two or more cooperative associationsas defined in andSection; 1139.18.<ITAG tagnum="84">Handler Reports</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reports of receipts and utilization.</ITAG>On or before the seventh day after the end of the month, each handler shallreport to the market administrator, in the detail and on forms prescribedby the market administrator, the following information for such month:(a) Each handler who operates one or more pool plants shall report foreach such plant the quantities of, and the pounds of skim milk and butterfatcontained in or represented by:(1) Receipts of producer milk, including producer milk diverted by thehandler, and the pounds of milk protein contained in such receipts;(2) Receipts of milk from handlers defined in andSection; 1139.9(c) and thepounds of milk protein contained in such receipts;(3) Receipts of fluid milk products and bulk fluid cream products fromother pool plants;(4) Receipts of other source milk;(5) Inventories at the beginning and end of the month of fluid milk productsand products specified in andSection; 1139.40(b)(1); and(6) The utilization, disposition or month-end inventories of all milk,filled milk, and milk products required to be reported pursuant to thisparagraph.(b) Each handler operating a partially regulated distributing plant shallreport with respect to such plant in the same manner as prescribed forreports required under paragraph (a) of this section. Receipts of milkthat would have been producer milk if the plant had been fully regulatedshall be reported in lieu of producer milk.(c) Each handler as defined in andSection; 1139.9 (b) and (c) shall report:(1) The quantities of, and pounds of skim milk, butterfat and milk proteincontained in receipts of milk from producers; and(2) The utilization or disposition of all skim milk, butterfat and milkprotein in such receipts.(d) Each handler not specified in paragraphs (a) through (c) of this sectionshall report with respect to all receipts and utilization of milk, filledmilk, and milk products in such manner as the market administrator mayprescribe.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.31</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Payroll reports.</ITAG>(a) On or before the 21st day after the end of each month, each handlerwho pays producers pursuant to andSection; 1139.74 shall submit a producerpayroll to the market administrator which shall include the following informationfor each producer from whom milk was received during such month:(1) The name and address of the producer;(2) The total pounds and, with respect to final payments, the average butterfatand milk protein content of the milk, and the number of days on which milkwas received from each producer;(3) The minimum payment required by the order, and the amount paid if morethan the minimum required;(4) The amount and nature of any deductions from such payment;(5) The net amount of payment to the producer; and(6) The date the payment was made.(b) On or before the 21st day after the end of the month, each handleroperating a partially regulated distributing plant who elects to make paymentspursuant to andSection; 1139.76(a)(2) shall report to the market administratorwith respect to milk received from each dairy farmer who would have beena producer if the plant had been fully regulated in the same manner asprescribed for reports required by paragraph (a) of this section.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.32</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other reports.</ITAG>In addition to the reports required pursuant to andSection;andSection; 1139.30and 1139.31, each handler shall report such other information as the marketadministrator deems necessary to verify or establish such handler's obligationsunder this order.<ITAG tagnum="84">Classification of Milk</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Classes of utilization.</ITAG>Except as provided in andSection; 1139.42, all skim milk and butterfat requiredto be reported by a handler pursuant to andSection; 1139.30 shall be classifiedas follows:(a) <T3>Class I milk. </T3>Class I milk shall be all butterfat and skim milk:(1) Disposed of in the form of a fluid milk product, except as otherwiseprovided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this section; and(2) Not specifically accounted for as Class II or Class III milk.(b) <T3>Class II milk. </T3>Class II milk shall be all butterfat and skim milk:(1) Disposed of in the form of a fluid cream product, eggnog, yogurt, andany product containing 6 percent or more nonmilk fat (or oil) that resemblesa fluid cream product, eggnog, or yogurt, except as otherwise providedin paragraph (c) of this section;(2) In packaged inventory at the end of the month of products specifiedin paragraph (b)(1) of this section;(3) In bulk fluid milk products and bulk fluid cream products disposedof to any commercial food processing establishment (other than a milk orfilled milk plant) at which food products (other than milk products andfilled milk) are processed and from which there is no disposition of fluidmilk products or fluid cream products other than those received in consumer-typepackages; and(4) Used to produce:(i) Cottage cheese (all forms);(ii) Milkshake and ice milk mixes (or bases) containing 20 percent or moretotal solids, frozen desserts, and frozen dessert mixes;(iii) Any concentrated milk product in bulk fluid form other than thatspecified in paragraph (c)(1)(iv) of this section;(iv) Plastic cream, frozen cream, and anhydrous milkfat;(v) Custards, puddings, and pancake mixes; and(vi) Formulas especially prepared for infant feeding or dietary use thatare packaged in hermetically sealed glass or all-metal containers, or asepticallypackaged and hermetically sealed in foil-lined paper containers.(c) <T3>Class III milk. </T3>Class III milk shall be all butterfat and skimmilk:(1) Used to produce:(i) Cheese, other than cottage cheese in any form;(ii) Butter;(iii) Any milk product in dry form;(iv) Any concentrated milk product in bulk fluid form that is used to producea Class III product;(v) Evaporated milk or condensed milk (plain or sweetened) in a consumer-typepackage and evaporated or condensed skim milk (plain or sweetened) in aconsumer-type package; and(vi) Any other dairy product not otherwise specified in this section.(2) In inventory at the end of the month of fluid milk products in bulkor packaged form, and products specified in paragraph (b)(1) of this sectionin bulk form;(3) In fluid milk products, and products specified in paragraph (b)(1)of this section that are disposed of by a handler for animal feed;(4) In fluid milk products and products specified in paragraph (b)(1) ofthis section that are dumped by a handler if the market administrator isnotified of such dumping in advance and is given the opportunity to verifysuch disposition;(5) In skim milk in any modified fluid milk product that is in excess ofthe quantity of skim milk in such product that was included within thefluid milk product definition pursuant to andSection; 1139.15;(6) In shrinkage assigned pursuant to andSection; 1139.41(a) to the receiptsspecified in andSection; 1139.41(a)(2) and in shrinkage specified in andSection;1139.41 (b) and (c).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.41</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Shrinkage.</ITAG>For purposes of classifying all skim milk and butterfat to be reportedby a handler pursuant to andSection; 1139.30, the market administrator shalldetermine the following:(a) The pro rata assignment of shrinkage of skim milk and butterfat, respectively,at each pool plant to the respective qualities of skim milk and butterfat:(1) In the receipts specified in paragraphs (b) (1) through (6) of thissection on which shrinkage is allowed pursuant to such paragraph; and(2) In other source milk not specified in paragraphs (b) (1) through (6)of this section which was received in the form of a bulk fluid milk productor a bulk fluid cream product.(b) The shrinkage of skim milk and butterfat, respectively, assigned pursuantto paragraph (a) of this section to the receipts specified in paragraph(a)(1) of this section that is not in excess of:(1) Two percent of the skim milk and butterfat, respectively, in producermilk (excluding milk diverted by the plant operator, or received from handlersdefined in andSection; 1139.9(c));(2) Plus 1.5 percent of the skim milk and butterfat, respectively, in milkreceived from handlers defined in andSection; 1139.9(c), except if the operatorof the plant to which the milk is delivered purchases such milk on thebasis of weights determined from its measurement at the farm and proteinand butterfat tests determined from farm bulk tank samples, the applicablepercentage shall be 2 percent;(3) Plus 0.5 percent of the skim milk and butterfat, respectively, in producermilk diverted by the plant operator to another plant, except that if theoperator of the plant to which the milk is delivered purchases such milkon the basis of weights determined from its measurement at the farm andprotein and butterfat tests determined from farm bulk tank samples, theapplicable percentage shall be zero;(4) Plus 1.5 percent of the skim milk and butterfat, respectively, in bulkfluid milk products received by transfer from other pool plants;(5) Plus 1.5 percent of the skim milk and butterfat, respectively, in bulkfluid milk products received by transfer from other order plants, excludingthe quantity for which Class II or Class III classification is requestedby the operators of both plants;(6) Plus 1.5 percent of the skim milk and butterfat, respectively, in bulkfluid milk products received from unregulated supply plants, excludingthe quantity for which Class II or Class III classification is requestedby the handler; and(7) Less 1.5 percent of the skim milk and butterfat, respectively, in bulkmilk transferred to other plants that is not in excess of the respectivequantities of skim milk and butterfat to which percentages are appliedin paragraphs (b) (1), (2), (4), (5), and (6) of this section; and (c) The quantity of skim milk and butterfat, respectively, in shrinkageof milk from producers for which a cooperative association or federationis the handler pursuant to andSection;1139.9 (b) or (c), but not in excessof 0.5 percent of skim milk and butterfat, respectively, thereof. If theoperator of the plant to which the milk is delivered purchases such milkon the basis of weights determined from its measurement at the farm andprotein and butterfat tests determined from farm bulk tank samples, theapplicable percentage for the cooperative association or federation shallbe zero.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1139.42 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Classification of transfers and diversions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Transfers to pool plants.</T3> Skim milk or butterfat transferred inthe form of a fluid milk product or a bulk fluid cream product from a poolplant to another pool plant shall be classified as Class I milk unlessboth handlers request the same classification in another class. In eithercase, the classification of such transfers shall be subject to the followingconditions:(1) The skim milk or butterfat classified in each class shall be limitedto the amount of skim milk and butterfat, respectively, remaining in suchclass at the transferee-plant after the computation pursuant to andSection;1139.44(a)(12) and the corresponding step of andSection;1139.44(b);(2) If the transferor-plant received during the month other source milkto be allocated pursuant to andSection;1139.44(a)(7) or the correspondingstep of andSection;1139.44(b), the skim milk and butterfat so transferredshall be classified so as to allocate the least possible Class I utilizationto such other source milk; and(3) If the transferor-handler received during the month other source milkto be allocated pursuant to andSection;1139.44(a) (11) or (12) or the correspondingsteps of andSection;1139.44(b), the skim milk and butterfat so transferred,up to the total of the skim milk and butterfat, respectively, in such receiptsof other source milk, shall not be classified as Class I milk to a greaterextent than would be the case if the other source milk had been receivedat the transferee-plant.(b) <T3>Transfers and diversions to other order plants.</T3> Skim milk or butterfattransferred or diverted in the form of a fluid milk product or transferredin the form of a bulk fluid cream product from a pool plant to an otherorder plant shall be classified in the following manner. Such classificationshall apply only to the skim milk or butterfat that is in excess of anyreceipts at the pool plant from the other order plant of skim milk andbutterfat, respectively, in fluid milk products and bulk fluid cream products,respectively, that are in the same category as described in paragraph (b)(1), (2), or (3) of this section:(1) If transferred as packaged fluid milk products, classification shallbe in the classes to which allocated as a fluid milk product under theother order;(2) If transferred or diverted in bulk form, classification shall be inthe classes to which allocated under the other order (including allocationunder the conditions set forth in paragraph (b)(3) of this section);(3) If the operators of both plants so request in their reports of receiptsand utilization filed with their respective market administrators, transfersor diversions in bulk form shall be classified as Class II or Class IIImilk to the extent of such utilization available for such classificationpursuant to the allocation provisions of the other order;(4) If information concerning the classes to which such transfers or diversionswere allocated under the other order is not available to the market administratorfor the purpose of establishing classification under this paragraph, classificationshall be as Class I, subject to adjustments when such information is available;(5) For purposes of this paragraph, if the other order provides for a differentnumber of classes of utilization than is provided for under this part,skim milk or butterfat allocated to a class consisting primarily of fluidmilk products shall be classified as Class I milk, and skim milk or butterfatallocated to the other classes shall be classified as Class III milk; and(6) If the form in which any fluid milk product that is transferred toan other order plant is not defined as a fluid milk product under suchother order, classification under this paragraph shall be in accordancewith the provisions of andSection;1139.40.(c) <T3>Transfers and diversions to producer-handlers and to exempt plants.</T3>Skim milk or butterfat in the following forms that is transferred or divertedto a producer-handler under this or any other Federal order or to an exemptdistributing plant shall be classified:(1) As Class I milk, if so moved in the form of a fluid milk product; and(2) In accordance with the utilization assigned to it by the market administrator,if transferred in the form of a bulk fluid cream product. For this purpose,the transferee's utilization of skim milk and butterfat in each class,in series beginning with Class III, shall be assigned to the extent possibleto its receipts of skim milk and butterfat, respectively, in bulk fluidcream products, pro rata to each source.(d) <T3>Transfers and diverisons to other nonpool plants.</T3> Skim milk orbutterfat transferred or diverted in the following forms from a pool plantto a nonpool plant that is not an other order plant, a producer-handlerplant, or an exempt distributing plant shall be classified:(1) As Class I milk, if transferred in the form of a packaged fluid milkproduct; and(2) As Class I milk, if transferred or diverted in the form of a bulk fluidmilk product or transferred in the form of a bulk fluid cream product,unless the following conditions apply:(i) If the transferor-handler or divertor-handler so requests and the conditionsdescribed in paragraphs (d)(2)(i) (<T3>a</T3>) and (<T3>b</T3>) of this section are met, transfers or diversions in bulk formshall be classified on the basis of the assignments of the nonpool plant'sutilization to its receipts as set forth in paragraphs (d)(2) (ii) through(viii) of this section:(<T3>a</T3>) The transferor-handler or divertor-handler claims such classificationin his report of receipts and utilization filed pursuant to andSection; 1139.30for the month within which such transaction occurred; and(<T3>b</T3>) The nonpool plant operator maintains books and records showingthe utilization of all skim milk and butterfat received at such plant whichare made available for verification purposes if requested by the marketadministrator;(ii) Route disposition in the marketing area of each Federal milk orderfrom the nonpool plant and transfers of packaged fluid milk products fromsuch nonpool plant to plants fully regulated thereunder shall be assignedto the extent possible in the following sequence:(<T3>a</T3>) Pro rata to receipts of packaged fluid milk products at suchnonpool plant from pool plants;(<T3>b</T3>) Pro rata to any remaining unassigned receipts of packaged fluidmilk products at such nonpool plant from other order plants; (<T3>c</T3>) Pro rata to receipts of bulk fluid milk products at such nonpoolplant from pool plants; and(<T3>d</T3>) Pro rata to any remaining unassigned receipts of bulk fluidmilk products at such nonpool plant from other order plants;(iii) Any remaining Class I disposition of packaged fluid milk productsfrom the nonpool plant shall be assigned to the extent possible pro ratato any remaining unassigned receipts of packaged fluid milk products atsuch nonpool plant from pool plants and other order plants;(iv) Transfers of bulk fluid milk products from the nonpool plant to aplant fully regulated under any Federal milk order, to the extent thatsuch transfers to the regulated plant exceed receipts of fluid milk productsfrom such plant and are allocated to Class I at the transferee-plant, shallbe assigned to the extent possible in the following sequence:(<T3>a</T3>) Pro rata to receipts of fluid milk products at such nonpoolplant from pool plants; and(<T3>b</T3>) Pro rata to any remaining unassigned receipts of fluid milkproducts at such nonpool plant from other order plants;(v) Any remaining unassigned Class I disposition from the nonpool plantshall be assigned to the extent possible in the following sequence:(<T3>a</T3>) To such nonpool plant's receipts from dairy farmers who themarket administrator determines constitute regular sources of approvedmilk for such nonpool plant; and(<T3>b</T3>) To such nonpool plant's receipts of approved milk from plantsnot fully regulated under any Federal milk order which the market administratordetermines constitute regular sources of approved milk for such nonpoolplant;(vi) Any remaining unassigned receipts of bulk fluid milk products at thenonpool plant from pool plants and other order plants shall be assigned,pro rata among such plants, to the extent possible first to any remainingClass I utilization, then to Class III utilization, and then to Class IIutilization at such nonpool plant;(vii) Receipts of bulk fluid cream products at the nonpool plant from poolplants and other order plants shall be assigned, pro rata among such plants,to the extent possible first any remaining Class III utilization, thento any remaining Class II utilization, and then to Class I utilizationat such nonpool plant; and(viii) In determining the nonpool plant's utilization for purposes of thisparagraph, any fluid milk products and bulk fluid cream products transferredfrom such nonpool plant to a plant not fully regulated under any Federalmilk order shall be classified on the basis of the second plant's utilizationusing the same assignment priorities at the second plant that are set forthin this paragraph.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.43</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General accounting and classification rules.</ITAG>(a) Each month the market administrator shall:(1) Correct for mathematical and other obvious errors all reports filedpursuant to andSection; 1139.30; and(2) Compute separately for each pool plant and for each cooperative associationwith respect to milk for which it is the handler pursuant to andSection;1139.9 (b) or (c) that was not received at a pool plant, the pounds ofskim milk and butterfat, respectively, in each class in accordance withandSection;andSection; 1139.40, 1139.41, and 1139.42. The combined pounds ofskim milk and butterfat so determined in each class for a handler describedin andSection; 1139.9 (b) or (c) shall be such handler's classification ofproducer milk.(b) If any of the water contained in the milk from which a product is madeis removed before the product is utilized or disposed of by a handler,the pounds of skim milk in such product that are to be considered underthis part as used or disposed of by the handler shall be an amount equivalentto the nonfat milk solids contained in such product plus all of the wateroriginally associated with such solids.(c) The classification of producer milk for which a cooperative associationis the handler pursuant to andSection; 1139.9 (b) or (c) shall be determinedseparately from the operations of any pool plant operated by such cooperativeassociation.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.44</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Classification of producer milk.</ITAG>For each month the market administrator shall determine for each handlerdefined in andSection; 1139.9(a) for each pool plant of the handler separatelythe classification of producer milk and milk received from a handler describedin andSection; 1139.9(c) by allocating the handler's receipts of skim milkand butterfat to the utilization of such receipts by such handler as follows:(a) Skim milk shall be allocated in the following manner:(1) Subtract from the total pounds of skim milk in Class III the poundsof skim milk in shrinkage specified in andSection; 1139.41(b);(2) Subtract from the total pounds of skim milk in Class I the pounds ofskim milk in receipts of packaged fluid milk products from an unregulatedsupply plant to the extent that an equivalent amount of skim milk disposedof to such plant by handlers fully regulated under any Federal milk orderis classified and priced as Class I milk and is not used as an offset forany other payment obligation under any order;(3) Subtract from the pounds of skim milk remaining in each class the poundsof skim milk in fluid milk products received in packaged form from anotherorder plant, except that to be subtracted pursuant to paragraph (a)(7)(vi)of this section, as follows: (i) From Class III milk, the lesser of the pounds remaining or 2 percentof such receipts; and (ii) From Class I milk, the remainder of such receipts; (4) Subtract from the pounds of skim milk in Class II the pounds of skimmilk in products specified in andSection; 1139.40(b)(1) that were receivedin packaged form from other plants, but not in excess of the pounds remainingin Class II; (5) Subtract from the remaining pounds of skim milk in Class II the poundsof skim milk in products specified in andSection; 1139.40(b)(1) that werein inventory at the beginning of the month in packaged form but not inexcess of the pounds of skim milk remaining in Class II. This paragraphshall apply only if the pool plant was subject to the provisions of thisparagraph or comparable provisions of another Federal milk order in theimmediately preceding month; (6) Subtract from the remaining pounds of skim milk in Class II the poundsof skim milk in other source milk (except that received in the form ofa fluid milk product or a fluid cream product) that is used to produce,or added to, any product specified in andSection; 1139.40(b), but not inexcess of the pounds of skim milk remaining in Class II; (7) Subtract in the order specified below from the pounds of skim milkremaining in each class, in series beginning with Class III, the poundsof skim milk in each of the following: (i) Other source milk (except that received in the form of a fluid milkproduct) and packaged inventory at the beginning of the month of productsspecified in andSection; 1139.40(b)(1) that was not subtracted pursuant toparagraphs (a) (4), (5), and (6) of this section; (ii) Receipts of fluid milk products (except filled milk) for which approvedmilk status is not established; (iii) Receipts of fluid milk products from unidentified sources; (iv) Receipts of fluid milk products from a producer-handler as definedunder this or any other Federal milk order, or from an exempt distributingplant; (v) Receipts of reconstituted skim milk in filled milk from an unregulatedsupply plant that were not subtracted pursuant to paragraph (a)(2) of thissection; (vi) Receipts of reconstituted skim milk in filled milk from another orderplant that is regulated under any Federal milk order providing for individual-handlerpooling, to the extent that reconstituted skim milk is allocated to ClassI at the transferor-plant; and (vii) Receipts of milk from a dairy farmer pursuant to andSection; 1139.12(b)(4);(8) Subtract in the order specified below from the pounds of skim milkremaining in Class II and Class III, in sequence beginning with Class III;(i) The pounds of skim milk in receipts of fluid milk products from anunregulated supply plant that were not subtracted pursuant to paragraphs(a)(2) and (7)(v) of this section for which the handler requests a classificationother than Class I, but not in excess of the pounds of skim milk remainingin Class II and Class III combined; (ii) The pounds of skim milk in receipts of fluid milk products from anunregulated supply plant that were not subtracted pursuant to paragraphs(a)(2), (7)(v), and (8)(i) of this section which are in excess of the poundsof skim milk determined pursuant to paragraphs (a)(8)(ii) (<T3>a</T3>) through (<T3>c</T3>) of this section. Should the pounds of skim milk to be subtractedfrom Class II and Class III combined exceed the pounds of skim milk remainingin such classes, the pounds of skim milk in Class II and Class III combinedshall be increased (increasing as necessary Class III and then Class IIto the extent of available utilization in such classes at the nearest otherpool plant of the handler, and then at each successively more distant poolplant of the handler) by an amount equal to such excess quantity to besubtracted, and the pounds of skim milk in Class I shall be decreased bya like amount. In such case, the pounds of skim milk remaining in eachclass at this allocation step at the handler's other pool plants shallbe adjusted in the reverse direction by a like amount: (<T3>a</T3>) Multiply by 1.25 the sum of the pounds of skim milk remainingin Class I at this allocation step at all pool plants of the handler (excludingany duplication of Class I utilization resulting from reported Class Itransfers between pool plants of the handler); (<T3>b</T3>) Subtract from the above result the sum of the pounds of skimmilk in receipts at all pool plants of the handler of producer milk, milkfrom a handler described in andSection; 1139.9(c), fluid milk products frompool plants of other handlers, and bulk fluid milk products from otherorder plants that were not subtracted pursuant to paragraph (a)(7)(vi)of this section; and (<T3>c</T3>) Multiply any plus quantity resulting above by the percentagethat the receipts of skim milk in fluid milk products from unregulatedsupply plants that remain at this pool plant is of all such receipts remainingat this allocation step at all pool plants of the handler; and (iii) The pounds of skim milk in receipts of bulk fluid milk products froman other order plant that are in excess of bulk fluid milk products transferredor diverted to such plant and that were not subtracted pursuant to paragraph(a)(7)(vi) of this section, if Class II or Class III classification isrequested by the operator of the other order plant and the handler, butnot in excess of the pounds of skim milk remaining in Class II and ClassIII combined;(9) Subtract from the pounds of skim milk remaining in each class, in seriesbeginning with Class III, the pounds of skim milk in fluid milk productsand products specified in andSection; 1139.40(b)(1) in inventory at the beginningof the month that were not subtracted pursuant to paragraphs (a)(5) and(7)(i) of this section; (10) Add to the remaining pounds of skim milk in Class III the pounds ofskim milk subtracted pursuant to paragraph (a)(1) of this section; (11) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (a)(11)(i) of this section,subtract from the pounds of skim milk remaining in each class at the plant,pro rata to the total pounds of skim milk remaining in Class I and in ClassII and Class III combined at this allocation step at all pool plants ofthe handler (excluding any duplication of utilization in each class resultingfrom transfers between pool plants of the handler), with the quantity proratedto Class II and Class III combined being subtracted first from Class IIIand then from Class II, the pounds of skim milk in receipts of fluid milkproducts from an unregulated supply plant that were not subtracted pursuantto paragraphs (a)(2), (7)(v), and (8) (i) and (ii) of this section andthat were not offset by transfers or diversions of fluid milk productsto the same regulated supply plant from which fluid milk products to beallocated at this step were received: (i) Should the pounds of skim milk to be subtracted from any class pursuantto this paragraph exceed the pounds of skim milk remaining in such class,the pounds of skim milk in such class shall be increased by an amount equalto such quantity to be subtracted and the pounds of skim milk in the otherclasses (beginning with the higher priced class) shall be decreased bya like amount. In such case, the pounds of skim milk remaining in eachclass at this allocation step at other pool plants of the handler shallbe adjusted to the extent possible in the reverse direction by a like amount.Such adjustment shall be made at the other plants in sequence beginningwith the plant having the least minus location adjustment; (12) Subtract in the manner specified below from the pounds of skim milkremaining in each class the pounds of skim milk in receipts of bulk fluidmilk products from an other order plant that are in excess of bulk fluidmilk products transferred or diverted to such plant and that were not subtractedpursuant to paragraphs (a)(7)(vi) and (8)(iii) of this section: (i) Subject to the provisions of paragraphs (a)(12) (ii) and (iii) of thissection, such subtraction shall be pro rata to the pounds of skim milkin Class I and in Class II and Class III combined, with the quantity proratedto Class II and Class III combined being subtracted first from Class IIIand then from Class II, with respect to whichever of the following quantitiesrepresents the lower proportion of Class I milk:(<T3>a</T3>) The estimated utilization of skim milk of all handlers in eachclass as announced for the month pursuant to andSection; 1139.45(a); or (<T3>b</T3>) The total pounds of skim milk remaining in each class at thisallocation step at all pool plants of the handler (excluding any duplicationof utilization in each class resulting from transfers between pool plantsof the handler);(ii) Should the proration pursuant to paragraph (a)(12)(i) of this sectionresult in the total pounds of skim milk at all pool plants of the handlerthat are to be subtracted at this allocation step from Class II and ClassIII combined exceeding the pounds of skim milk remaining in Class II andClass III at all such plants, the pounds of such excess shall be subtractedfrom the pounds of skim milk remaining in Class I after such prorationat the pool plants at which such other source milk was received; and (iii) Except as provided in paragraph (a)(12)(ii) of this section, shouldthe computations pursuant to either paragraph (a)(12) (i) or (ii) of thissection result in a quantity of skim milk to be subtracted from any classthat exceeds the pounds of skim milk remaining in such class, the poundsof skim milk in such class shall be increased by an amount equal to suchexcess quantity to be subtracted and the pounds of skim milk in other classes(beginning with the higher priced class) shall be decreased by a like amount.In such case, the pounds of skim milk remaining in each class at this allocationstep at other pool plants of the handler shall be adjusted to the extentpossible in the reverse direction by a like amount. Such adjustment shallbe made at the other plants in sequence beginning with the plant havingthe least minus location adjustment. (13) Subtract from the pounds of skim milk remaining in each class thepounds of skim milk in receipts of fluid milk products and bulk fluid creamproducts from another pool plant according to the classification of suchproducts pursuant to andSection; 1139.42(a); and (14) If the total pounds of skim milk remaining in all classes exceed thepounds of skim milk in producer milk and milk received from a handler describedin andSection; 1139.9(c), subtract such excess from the pounds of skim milkremaining in each class in series beginning with Class III. Any amountso subtracted shall be known as ``overage''; (b) Butterfat shall be allocated in accordance with the procedure outlinedfor skim milk in paragraph (a) of this section; and (c) The quantity of producer milk and milk received from a handler describedin andSection; 1139.9(c) in each class shall be the combined pounds of skimmilk and butterfat remaining in each class after the computations pursuantto (a)(14) of this section and the corresponding step of paragraph (b)of this section. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.45 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Market administrator's reports and announcements concerning classification.</ITAG>The market administrator shall make the following reports and announcementsconcerning classification: (a) Whenever required for the purpose of allocating receipts from otherorder plants pursuant to andSection; 1139.44(12) and the corresponding stepof andSection; 1139.44(b), estimate and publicly announce the utilization(to the nearest whole percentage) in each class during the month of skimmilk and butterfat, respectively, in producer milk of all handlers. Suchestimate shall be based upon the most current available data and shallbe final for such purpose. (b) Report to the market administrator of the other order, as soon as possibleafter the report of receipts and utilization for the month is receivedfrom a handler who has received fluid milk products or bulk fluid creamproducts from an other order plant, the class to which such receipts areallocated pursuant to andSection; 1139.44 on the basis of such report, andthereafter, any change in such allocation required to correct errors disclosedin the verification of such report. (c) Furnish to each handler operating a pool plant who has shipped fluidmilk products or bulk fluid cream products to an other order plant theclass to which such shipments were allocated by the market administratorof the other order on the basis of the report by the receiving handler,and, as necessary, any changes in such allocation arising from the certificationof such report. (d) Report to each cooperative association that so requests, on or beforethe 12th day after the end of each month, the amount and class utilizationof producer milk delivered by members of such cooperative association toeach handler receiving such milk. For the purpose of this report, the milkso received shall be prorated to each class in accordance with the totalutilization of producer milk by such handler. <ITAG tagnum="84">Class and Component Prices</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1139.50</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Class prices and component prices.</ITAG>Subject to the provisions of andSection;1139.51 and andSection;1139.52, theclass and component prices for the month, per hundredweight or per pound,shall be as follows:(a) <T3>Class I price.</T3> The Class I price shall be the basic formula pricefor the second preceding month plus $1.90. (b) <T3>Class II price.</T3> A tentative Class II price shall be computed bythe Director of the Dairy Division, Agricultural Marketing Service, USDA,and transmitted to the market administrator on or before the 15th day ofthe preceding month. The tentative Class II price shall be the basic ClassII formula price computed pursuant to andSection;1139.51(b) for the monthplus the amount that the value computed pursuant to paragraph (b)(1) ofthis section exceeds the value computed pursuant to paragraph (b)(2) ofthis section, except that in no event shall the final Class II price beless than the Class III price for the month. (1) Determine for the most recent 12-month period the simple average (roundedto the nearest cent) of the basic formula prices and add 10 cents; and(2) Determine for the same 12-month period as specified in paragraph (b)(1)of this section the simple average (rounded to the nearest cent) of thebasic Class II formula prices. (c) <T3>Class III price.</T3> The Class III price shall be the basic formulaprice for the month. (d) <T3>Butterfat price.</T3> The butterfat price per pound shall be a figurecomputed as follows: Subtract from the basic formula price an amount computedby multiplying the current month's butter price, based on the simple averageof the wholesale selling prices per pound (using the mid-point of any pricerange as one price) of approved (92-score) bulk butter, f.o.b. Chicago,as reported by the Department for the month, by 4.025, and divide by 100.Add to the resulting amount the current month's butter price multipliedby 1.15. The sum thereof shall be the price per pound for producer butterfatfor the month.(e) <T3>Milk protein price.</T3> The price for milk protein per pound shallbe computed by subtracting from the basic formula price the butterfat pricemultiplied by 3.5, and dividing the result by the average percentage ofprotein in all producer milk for the preceding month. (f) <T3>Skim milk price.</T3> The skim milk price per hundredweight shall bethe basic formula price for the month adjusted to remove the value of 3.5percent butterfat and rounded to the nearest cent. Such adjustment shallbe computed by multiplying the simple average of the wholesale sellingprices (using the midpoint of any price range as one price) of approved(92-score) bulk butter per pound at Chicago, as reported by the Departmentfor the month, by 4.025 and subtracting the result from the basic formulaprice. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1139.51</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Basic formula prices.</ITAG>(a) The ``basic formula price'' shall be the average price per hundredweightfor manufacturing grade milk, f.o.b. plants in Minnesota and Wisconsin,as reported by the Department for the month, adjusted to a 3.5 percentbutterfat basis and rounded to the nearest cent. For such adjustment, thebutterfat differential (rounded to the nearest one-tenth cent) per one-tenthpercent butterfat shall be 0.12 times the simple average of the wholesaleselling prices (using the midpoint of any price range as one price) ofapproved (92-score) bulk butter per pound at Chicago, as reported by theDepartment for the month.(b) The ``basic Class II formula price'' for the month shall be the basicformula price for the second preceding month plus or minus the amount computedpursuant to paragraphs (b) (1) through (4) of this section. (1) The gross values per hundredweight of milk used to manufacture cheddarcheese and butter-nonfat dry milk shall be computed, using price data determinedpursuant to andSection;1139.19 and yield factors in effect under the DairyPrice Support program authorized by the Agricultural Act of 1949, as amended,for the first 15 days of the preceding month and, separately, for the first15 days of the second preceding month as follows: (i) The gross value of milk used to manufacture cheddar cheese shall bethe sum of the following computations: (<T3>a</T3>) Multiply the cheddar cheese price by the yield factor usedunder the Price Support Program for cheddar cheese; (<T3>b</T3>) Multiply the butter price by the yield factor used under thePrice Support program for determining the butterfat component of the wheyvalue in the cheese price computation; and (<T3>c</T3>) Subtract from the edible whey price the processing cost usedunder the Price Support Program for edible whey and multiply any positivedifference by the yield factor used under the Price Support Program foredible whey. (ii) The gross value of milk used to manufacture butter-nonfat dry milkshall be the sum of the following computations: (<T3>a</T3>) Multiply the butter price by the yield factor used under thePrice Support Program for butter; and (<T3>b</T3>) Multiply the nonfat dry milk price by the yield factor usedunder the Price Support Program for nonfat dry milk. (2) Determine the amounts by which the gross value per hundredweight ofmilk used to manufacture cheddar cheese and the gross value per hundredweightof milk used to manufacture butter-nonfat dry milk for the first 15 daysof the preceding month exceed or are less than the respective gross valuesfor the first 15 days of the second preceding month.(3) Compute weighting factors to be applied to the changes in gross valuesdetermined pursuant to paragraph (b)(2) of this section by determiningthe relative proportion that the data included in each of the followingparagraphs is of the total of the data represented in paragraphs (b)(3)(i) and (ii) of this section:(i) Combine the total production of American cheese for the States of Minnesotaand Wisconsin, as reported by the Statistical Reporting Service of theDepartment for the most recent preceding period, and divide by the yieldfactor used under the Price Support Program for cheddar cheese to determinethe quantity of milk used in the production of cheddar cheese; and (ii) Combine the total nonfat dry milk production for the States of Minnesotaand Wisconsin, as reported by the Statistical Reporting Service of theDepartment for the most recent preceding period, and divide by the yieldfactor used under the Price Support Program for nonfat dry milk to determinethe quantity of milk used in the production of butter-nonfat dry milk.(4) Compute a weighted average of the changes in gross values per hundredweightof milk determined pursuant to paragraph (b)(2) of this section in accordancewith the relative proportions of milk determined pursuant to paragraph(b)(3) of this section.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1139.52</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Plant location adjustments for handlers.</ITAG>(a) The Class I price shall be adjusted for plants located in the zonesset forth below as follows:<ITAG tagnum="71">(1) </ITAG><T3>Zone 1</T3> 0 adjustments <ITAG tagnum="74">Utah Counties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Box Elder, Cache, Carbon, Daggett, Davis, Duchesne, Emery, Grand,Juab, Millard, Morgan, Rich, Salt Lake, Sanpete, Sevier, Summit, Tooele,Uinta, Utah, Wasatch and Weber.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Nevada Counties </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Elko and White Pine.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">(2) </ITAG><T3>Zone 2</T3> Minus $0.25 adjustment <ITAG tagnum="74">Idaho Counties </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Bannock, Bear Lake, Caribou, Franklin, Oneida and Power.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">(3) </ITAG><T3>Zone 3</T3> Minus $0.30 adjustment <ITAG tagnum="74">Idaho Counties </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Bingham, Bonneville, Jefferson and Madison.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Wyoming Counties </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Lincoln and Uinta.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Nevada Counties </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Clark and Lincoln.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Utah Counties </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Beaver, Garfield, Iron, Kane, Piute, San Juan, Washington and Wayne.</ITAG>(b) For milk received from producers at a plant located outside the zonesspecified in paragraph (a) of this section, the Class I price applicableat the nearer of the Clark County, Nevada, courthouse or the Salt LakeCounty, Utah, courthouse shall be reduced by 1.5 cents per hundredweightfor each ten miles or fraction thereof of distance by shortest hard-surfacedhighway, as determined by the market administrator, between the plant andthe nearer of the two courthouses. (c) For purposes of calculating location adjustments, receipts of fluidmilk products from pool plants shall be assigned any Class I utilizationat the transferee plant that is in excess of the sum of receipts at suchplant from producers and the pounds assigned as Class I to receipts fromother order plants and unregulated supply plants. Such assignment shallbe made first to receipts from plants at which no location adjustment creditis applicable and then in sequence beginning with the plant at which theleast location adjustment would apply. (d) The Class I differential applicable to other source milk shall be adjustedat the rates set forth in paragraph (a) or (b) of this section, exceptthat the differential shall not be less than zero. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.53</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Announcement of class and component prices.</ITAG>The market administrator shall announce publicly on or before:(a) The 5th day of each month, the Class I price for the following month;(b) The 15th day of each month, the tentative Class II price for the followingmonth; and (c) The 5th day after the end of each month, the Class III price, the pricesfor butterfat, milk protein and skim milk computed pursuant to andSection;1139.50 (d), (e) and (f), and the final Class II price for such month.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.54</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">equivalent price.</ITAG>If for any reason a price or pricing constituent required by this orderfor computing class prices or for other purposes is not available as prescribedin this order, the market administrator shall use a price or pricing constituentdetermined by the Secretary to be equivalent to the price or pricing constituentthat is required.<ITAG tagnum="84">Differential Pool and Handler Obligations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.60</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Computation of handlers' obligations to pool.</ITAG>The market administrator shall compute each month for each handler definedin andSection; 1139.9(a) with respect to each of such handler's pool plants,and for each handler defined in andSection; 1139.9 (b) and (c), an obligationto the pool computed by adding the following values:(a) The pounds of producer milk in Class I as determined pursuant to andSection;1139.44 multiplied by the difference between the Class I price (adjustedpursuant to andSection; 1139.52) and the Class III price;(b) The pounds of producer milk in Class II as determined pursuant to andSection;1139.44 multiplied by the difference between the Class II price and ClassIII price; (c) The value of the product pounds, skim milk, and butterfat in overageassigned to each class pursuant to andSection; 1139.44(a)(14) and the valueof the corresponding protein pounds associated with the skim milk subtractedfrom Class II and Class III pursuant to andSection; 1139.44(a)(14), by multiplyingthe skim milk pounds so assigned by the percentage of protein in the handler'sreceipts of producer skim milk during the month, as follows:(1) The hundredweight of skim milk and butterfat subtracted from ClassI pursuant to andSection; 1139.44(a)(14) and the corresponding step of andSection;1139.44(b), multiplied by the difference between the Class I price adjustedfor location and the Class III price, plus the hundredweight of skim milksubtracted from Class I pursuant to andSection; 1139.44(a)(14) multipliedby the skim milk price, plus the butterfat pounds of overage subtractedfrom Class I pursuant to andSection; 1139.44(b) multiplied by the butterfatprice;(2) The hundredweight of skim milk and butterfat subtracted from ClassII pursuant to andSection; 1139.44(a)(14) and the corresponding step of andSection;1139.44(b) multiplied by the difference between the Class II price andthe Class III price, plus the protein pounds in skim milk subtracted fromClass II pursuant to andSection; 1139.44(a)(14) multiplied by the proteinprice, plus the butterfat pounds of overage subtracted from Class II pursuantto andSection; 1139.44(b) multiplied by the butterfat price;(3) The protein pounds in skim milk overage subtracted from Class III pursuantto andSection; 1139.44(a)(14) multiplied by the protein price, plus the butterfatpounds of overage subtracted from Class III pursuant to andSection; 1139.44(b)multiplied by the butterfat price;(d) The value of the product pounds, skim milk, and butterfat subtractedfrom Class I or Class II pursuant to andSection; 1139.44(a)(9) and the correspondingstep of andSection; 1139.44(b), and the value of the protein pounds associatedwith the skim milk subtacted from Class II pursuant to andSection; 1139.44(a)(9),computed by multiplying the skim milk pounds so subtracted by the percentageof protein in the handler's receipts of producer skim milk during the previousmonth, as follows:(1) The value of the product pounds, skim milk and butterfat subtractedfrom Class I pursuant to andSection; 1139.44(a)(9) and the correspondingstep of andSection; 1139.44(b) applicable at the location of the pool plantat the current month's Class I-Class III price difference and the currentmonth's skim milk and butterfat prices, less the Class III value of themilk at the previous month's protein and butterfat prices; (2) The value of the hundredweight of skim milk and butterfat subtractedfrom Class II pursuant to andSection; 1139.44(a)(9) and the correspondingstep of andSection; 1139.44(b) at the current month's Class II-Class IIIprice difference and the current month's protein and butterfat prices,less the Class III value of the milk at the previous month's protein andbutterfat prices;(e) The value of the product pounds, skim milk and butterfat subtractedfrom Class I pursuant to andSection; 1139.44(a)(7) (i) through (iv) and (vii),and the corresponding step of andSection; 1139.44(b), excluding receiptsof bulk fluid cream products from another order plant, applicable at thelocation of the pool plant at the current month's Class I-Class III pricedifference;(f) The value of the product pounds, skim milk and butterfat subtractedfrom Class I pursuant to andSection; 1139.44(a)(7) (v) and (vi) and the correspondingstep of andSection; 1139.44(b) applicable at the location of the transferor-plantat the current month's Class I-Class III price difference; (g) The value of the product pounds, skim milk and butterfat subtractedfrom Class I pursuant to (andSection; 1139.44)(a)(11) and the correspondingstep of andSection; 1139.44(b), excluding such hundredweight in receiptsof bulk fluid milk products from an unregulated supply plant to the extentthat an equivalent quantity disposed of to such plant by handlers fullyregulated by any Federal order is classified and priced as Class I milkand is not used as an offset for any other payment obligation under anyorder, applicable at the location of the nearest unregulated supply plantsfrom which an equivalent volume was received at the current month's ClassI-Class III price difference. (h) The pounds of skim milk in Class I producer milk, as determined pursuantto andSection; 1139.44, multiplied by the skim milk price for the month computedpursuant to andSection; 1139.50(f). (i) The pounds of protein in skim milk in Class II and Class III, computedby multiplying the skim milk pounds so assigned by the percentage of proteinin the handler's receipts of producer skim milk during the month for eachreport filed, separately, multiplied by the protein price for the monthcomputed pursuant to andSection; 1139.50(e). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.61 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Computation of weighted average differential price. </ITAG>For each month the market administrator shall compute the weighted averagedifferential value for milk received from all producers as follows: (a) Combine into one total the values computed pursuant to andSection; 1139.60,paragraphs (a) through (g), for all handlers who made reports pursuantto andSection; 1139.30 and who made payments pursuant to andSection; 1139.71for the preceding month; (b) Add an amount equal to the sum of the deductions to be made for locationadjustments pursuant to andSection; 1136.75; (c) Add an amount equal to not less than one-half the unobligated balancein the producer-settlement fund; (d) Divide the resulting amount by the sum of the following for all handlersincluded in these computations: (1) The total hundredweight of producer milk; (2) The total hundredweight for which a value is computed pursuant to andSection;1139.60(g). (e) Subtract not more than 5 cents per hundredweight. The result is the``Weighted Average Differential Price''. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.62</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Computation of producer protein price. </ITAG>For each month the market administrator shall compute the producer proteinprice to be paid to all producers for the pounds of protein in their milk,as follows: (a) Combine into one total the values computed pursuant to andSection; 1139.60,paragraphs (h) and (i), for all handlers who made reports pursuant to andSection;1139.30 and who made payments pursuant to andSection; 1139.71 for the precedingmonth; (b) Divide the resulting amount by the total pounds of protein in producermilk; and (c) Round to the nearest whole cent. The result is the ``Producer proteinprice.'' <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.63 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Uniform price and handlers' obligations for producer milk. </ITAG>(a) A uniform price for producer milk containing 3.5 percent butterfatshall be computed by adding the weighted average differential price determinedpursuant to andSection; 1139.61 to the basic formula price for the month.(b) Handler obligations to producers and cooperative associations for producermilk shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of andSection;andSection;1139.73 and 1139.74. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.64 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Announcement of weighted average differential price, producer proteinprice, and uniform price. </ITAG>The market administrator shall announce publicly on or before the 12thday after the end of the month the weighted average differential pricecomputed pursuant to andSection; 1139.61, the producer protein price computedpursuant to andSection; 1139.62, and the uniform price computed pursuantto andSection; 1139.63(a). <ITAG tagnum="84">Payments for Milk </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.70 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Producer-settlement fund. </ITAG>The market administrator shall establish and maintain a separate fund knownas the ``producer-settlement fund'' into which he shall deposit paymentsmade by handlers pursuant to andSection;andSection; 1139.71, 1139.76 and 1139.77,subject to the provisions of andSection; 1139.78, and out of which he shallmake payments pursuant to andSection;andSection; 1139.72 and 1139.77. Paymentdue a handler from the fund shall be offset as appropriate against paymentsdue from such handlers. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.71 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Payments to the producer-settlement fund. </ITAG>(a) On or before the 14th day after the end of the month, each handlershall pay to the market administrator the amount, if any, by which thetotal amount specified in paragraph (a)(1) of this section exceeds theamount specified in paragraph (a)(2) of this section: (1) The total obligation of the handler for such month as determined pursuantto andSection; 1139.60. (2) The sum of: (i) The value of such handler's receipts of producer milk and milk receivedfrom a handler defined in andSection; 1139.9(c) at the weighted average differentialprice adjusted pursuant to andSection; 1139.75; and (ii) The value of the protein in such handler's receipts of producer milkand milk received from a handler defined in andSection; 1139.9(c) at theproducer protein price computed pursuant to andSection; 1139.62; and (iii) The value at the weighted average differential price applicable atthe location of the plant from which received of other source milk forwhich a value is computed pursuant to andSection; 1139.60(g). (b) On or before the 25th day after the end of the month each person whooperated an other order plant that was regulated during such month underan order providing for individual handler pooling shall pay to the marketadministrator an amount computed as follows:(1) Determine the quantity of reconstituted skim milk in filled milk inroute dispositions from such plant in the marketing area which was allocatedto Class I at such plant; and(2) Compute the value of the reconstituted skim milk assigned in paragraph(b)(1) of this section to route disposition in this marketing area by multiplyingthe quantity of such skim milk by the difference between the Class I pricef.o.b. the other order plant and the Class III price.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.72</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Payments from the producer-settlement fund.</ITAG>On or before the 15th day after the end of each month, the market administratorshall pay to each handler the amount, if any, by which the amount computedpursuant to andSection; 1139.71(a)(2) exceeds the amount computed pursuantto andSection; 1139.71(a)(1). If as such time the balance in the producer-settlementfund in insufficient to make all payments pursuant to this section, themarket administrator shall reduce uniformly such payments and shall completesuch payments as soon as funds are available.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.73</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Value of producer milk.</ITAG>(a) The partial payment for milk received from each producer during thefirst 15 days of the month shall be determined by a rate computed by multiplyingthe Class III price for the preceding month by 1.2, but not to exceed thecurrent month's Class I price.(b) The total value of milk received from producers during any month shallbe computed as follows:(1) The weighted average differential price computed pursuant to andSection;1139.61 subject to the appropriate plant location adjustment times thetotal hundredweight of milk received from the producer; plus(2) The total milk protein contained in the producer milk received fromthe producer multiplied by the producer protein price computed pursuantto andSection; 1139.62; plus(3) The total butterfat contained in the producer milk received from theproducer times the butterfat price computed pursuant to andSection; 1139.50(d).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.74</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Payments to producers and to cooperative associations.</ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (c), (d) or (e) of this section, eachhandler shall, on or before the last day of each month, make a partialpayment to each producer from whom milk was received during the first 15days of the month, and who had shipped milk to such handler through the17th day of the month, at the rate set forth in andSection; 1139.73(a), lessproper deductions authorized in writing by such producer; (b) Except as provided in paragraph (c), (d) or (e) of this section, eachhandler shall, on or before the 17th day of the following month, make afinal payment to each producer for milk received from such producer duringthe month at no less than the total amount computed in accordance withthe provisions set forth in andSection; 1139.73(b) with respect to such milk:(1) Less any deductions for marketing services pursuant to andSection; 1139.86;(2) Less payment made pursuant to paragraph (a) of this section for suchmonth;(3) Less proper deductions authorized in writing by such producer;(4) Plus or minus adjustments for errors made in previous payments to suchproducer and proper deductions authorized in writing by such producer;and(5) If by the date specified such handler has not received full paymentfrom the market administrator pursuant to andSection; 1139.72 for such month,the handler may reduce his payments to producers pro rata by not more thanthe amount of such underpayment. Payments to producers shall be completedthereafter no later than the date for making payments pursuant to thisparagraph next following after receipt of the balance due from the marketadministrator.(c) In the case of a cooperative association authorized by its membersto collect payment for their milk, and which has requested such paymentfrom any handler in writing and has so notified the market administrator,payment shall be made for milk received during the month as follows:(1) On or before the 3rd day prior the last day of the month for milk receivedfrom the members of such cooperative association at the rates set forthin andSection; 1139.73(a); and(2) On or before the 16th day of the following month such handler shallpay to such cooperative association the sum of the payments computed inaccordance with the procedures set forth in andSection; 1139.73(b) with respectto deliveries by producer-members of such cooperative association to handler(s)from whom payment has been requested, less the amounts of payments madeto such cooperative association pursuant to paragraph (c)(1) of this section,and less the amount retained by handlers as authorized deductions.(d) Each handler who received milk from producers for which payment isto be made to a cooperative association pursuant to paragraph (c) of thissection shall report to such cooperative association and to the marketadministrator on or before the 7th day of the following month as follows:(1) The total pounds of milk received during the month and, if requested,the pounds received from each member-producer;(2) The amount of payment made pursuant to paragraph (c)(1) of this sectionand the quantity of milk to which such payment applied; and(3) The amount or rate and nature of any proper deductions authorized tobe made from such payments.(e) Each handler shall pay a cooperative association for milk receivedfrom such cooperative association in its capacity as a handler definedin andSection; 1139.9(c), or from a pool plant operated by such associationas follows:(1) On or before the 2nd day prior to the last day of each month for milkreceived during the first 15 days of the month an amount per hundredweightcomputed pursuant to the provisions of andSection; 1139.73(a); and(2) On or before the 15th day of the following month for milk receivedduring the month at not less than the value computed for such milk in accordancewith the provisions under andSection; 1139.73(b), less the amounts of paymentsmade to such cooperative association pursuant to paragraph (e)(1) of thissection, and less the amount retained by handlers as authorized deductions.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.75</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Location and zone differentials for producer and nonpool milk.</ITAG>(a) In making payments computed pursuant to andSection; 1139.72, the marketadministrator shall reduce the weighted average differential price computedpursuant to andSection; 1139.61 by the location or zone differential applicableat the plant where such milk was first received from producers.(b) The weighted average differential price applicable to other sourcemilk pursuant to andSection; 1139.71(a)(2)(iii) shall be adjusted at therates set forth in andSection; 1139.52 (a) or (b) applicable at the locationof the nonpool plant from which the milk was received (but not to be lessthan zero).    <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.76</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Payments by a handler operating a partially regulated distributingplant.    </ITAG>(a) Each handler who operates a partially regulated distributing plantthat is not subject to a milk classification and pricing program that providesfor marketwide pooling of producer returns and is enforced under the authorityof a state government shall pay on or before the 25th day after the endof the month to the market administrator for the producer-settlement fundthe amount computed pursuant to paragraph (a)(1) of this section, or, ifthe handler submits pursuant to andSection;andSection; 1139.30(b) and 1139.31(b)the information necessary for making the appropriate computations, andso elects, the amount computed pursuant to paragraph (a)(2) of this section:   (1) An amount computed as follows:    (i) Determine the pounds of route disposition in the marketing area fromthe partially regulated distributing plant;    (ii) Subtract the pounds of fluid milk products received at the partiallyregulated distributing plant;    (<T3>a</T3>) As Class I milk from pool plants and other order plants, exceptthat subtracted under a similar provision of another Federal milk order;and    (<T3>b</T3>) From another nonpool plant that is not another order plantto the extent that an equivalent amount of fluid milk products disposedof to such nonpool plant by handlers fully regulated under any Federalmilk order is classified and priced as Class I milk and is not used asan offset for any other payment obligation under any order;    (iii) Subtract the pounds of reconstituted skim milk in route dispositionin the marketing area from the partially regulated distributing plant;   (iv) Multiply the remaining pounds by the amount the Class I-Class IIIprice difference exceeds the weighted average differential computed pursuantto andSection; 1139.61 as adjusted by the appropriate location or zone differential(but in no case less than 0);    (v) Add the amount obtained from multiplying the pounds of reconstitutedskim milk specified in paragraph (a)(1)(iii) of this section by the differencebetween the Class I price adjusted to the appropriate plant location andthe Class III price (but in no case less than 0).    (2) An amount computed as follows:    (i) Determine the value that would have been computed pursuant to andSection;1139.60 for the partially regulated distributing plant if the plant hadbeen a pool plant, subject to the following modifications:    (<T3>a</T3>) Fluid milk products and bulk fluid cream products receivedat the partially regulated distributing plant from a pool plant or anotherorder plant shall be allocated at the partially regulated distributingplant to the same class in which such products were classified at the fullyregulated plant;    (<T3>b</T3>) Fluid milk products and bulk fluid cream products transferredfrom the partially regulated distributing plant to a pool plant or anotherorder plant shall be classified at the partially regulated distributingplant in the class to which allocated at the fully regulated plant. Suchtransfers shall be allocated to the extent possible to those receipts atthe partially regulated distributing plant from pool plants and other orderplants that are classified in the corresponding class pursuant to paragraph(a)(2)(i)(<T3>a</T3>) of this section. Any such transfers remaining after the aboveallocation which are classified in Class I and for which a value is computedfor the handler operating the partially regulated distributing plant pursuantto andSection; 1139.60(e) shall be priced at the uniform price (or at theweighted average price if such is provided) of the respective other regulatingthe handling of milk at the transferee-plant, with such uniform price (orweighted average price) adjusted to the location of the nonpool plant (butnot to be less than the lowest class price of the respective order), exceptthat transfers of reconstituted skim milk in filled milk shall be pricedat the lowest class price of the respective order;    (<T3>c</T3>) If the operator of the partially regulated distributing plantso requests, the value of milk determined pursuant to andSection; 1139.60for such handler shall include in lieu of the value of other source milkspecified in andSection; 1139.60(g) less the value of such other source milkspecified in andSection; 1139.71(a)(2)(iii) a value of milk determined pursuantto andSection; 1139.60 for each nonpool plant that is not another order plantwhich serves as a supply plant for such partially regulated distributingplant by making shipments to the partially regulated distributing plantduring the month equivalent to the requirements of andSection; 1139.7(c)subject to the following conditions:               (<T3>1</T3>) The operator of the partially regulated distributing plantsubmits with reports filed for the month pursuant to andSection;andSection;1139.30(b) and 1139.31(b) similar reports for each nonpool supply plant;(<T3>2</T3>) The operator of such nonpool supply plant maintains books andrecords showing the utilization of all milk and milk products receivedat such plant which are made available if requested by the market administratorfor verification purposes; and(<T3>3</T3>) The value of milk determined pursuant to andSection; 1139.60for such nonpool supply plant shall be determined in the same manner prescribedfor computing the obligation of such partially regulated distributing plant;and(ii) From the partially regulated distributing plant's value of milk computedpursuant to paragraph (a)(2)(i) of this section, subtract:(<T3>a</T3>) The gross payment made by the operator of such partially regulateddistributing plant, less the value of the butterfat at the butterfat pricespecified in andSection; 1139.50(d), for milk received at the plant duringthe month that would have been producer milk if the plant had been fullyregulated;(<T3>b</T3>) If paragraph (a)(2)(i)(<T3>c</T3>) of this section applies, the gross payments by the operatorof such nonpool supply plant, less the value of butterfat at the butterfatprice specified in andSection; 1139.50(d), for milk received at the plantduring the month that would have been producer milk if the plant had beenfully regulated; and(<T3>c</T3>) The payments by the operator of the partially regulated distributingplant to the producer-settlement fund of another order under which suchplant is also a partially regulated distributing plant, and like paymentsby the operator of the nonpool supply plant if paragraph (a)(2)(i)(<T3>c</T3>) of this section applies.(b) Each handler who operates a partially regulated distributing plantwhich is subject to marketwide pooling of returns under a milk classificationand pricing program that is imposed under the authority of a state governmentshall pay on or before the 25th day after the end of the month to the marketadministrator for the producer-settlement fund an amount computed as follows:(1) Determines the pounds of route disposition in the marketing area fromthe partially regulated distributing plant;(2) Subtract the pounds of fluid milk products received at the partiallyregulated distributing plant;(i) As Class I milk from pool plants and other order plants, except thatsubtracted under a similar provision under another Federal milk order;(ii) From another nonpool plant that is not an other order plant to theextent that an equivalent amount of fluid milk products disposed of tosuch nonpool plants by handlers fully regulated under any Federal milkorder is classified and priced as Class I milk and is not used as an offsetfor any other payment obligation under any order;(3) Determine the value of the remaining pounds according to the differencebetween the appropriate Class prices applicable at the location of thepartially regulated distributing plant (but not to be less than zero) asannounced by the State order and as determined pursuant to andSection; 1139.50.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.77</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Adjustment of accounts.</ITAG>Whenever audit by the market administrator of any handler's reports, books,records, or accounts or other verification discloses errors resulting inmoney due a producer, a cooperative association, or the market administratorfrom such handler or due such handler from the market administrator, themarket administrator shall promptly notify such handler of any amount sodue, and payment thereof shall be made on or before the next date for makingpayments as set forth in the provisions under which such error occurred.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.78</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Charges on overdue accounts.</ITAG>(a) Any unpaid balance due from a handler pursuant to andSection;andSection;1139.71, 1139.76, 1139.77, 1139.85 and 1139.86, or under this section shallbe increased 1% per month on the next day following the due date of suchunpaid obligation and any balance remaining unpaid shall likewise be increasedon the first day of each month thereafter until paid. (b) For the purpose of this section, any obligation that was determinedat a date later than that prescribed by the order because of a handler'sfailure to submit a report to the market administrator when due shall beconsidered to have been payable by the date it would have been due if thereport had been filed when due.<ITAG tagnum="84">Administrative Assessment and Marketing Service Deduction</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1139.85</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Assessment for order administration.</ITAG>A pro rata share of the expense of administration of the order shall bepaid to the market administrator by each handler on or before the 14thday after the end of the month at the rate of 4 cents per hundredweight,or such lesser amount as the secretary may prescribe, with respect to:(a) Producer milk (including milk received from a handler defined in andSection;1139.9(c),but excluding in the case of a cooperative association which is a handlerpursuant to andSection;1139.9(c), milk which was received at the pool plantof another handler) and such handler's own production; (b) Other source milk allocated to Class I pursuant to andSection;1139.44(a) (7) and (11) and the corresponding steps of andSection;1139.44(b), exceptsuch other source milk that is excluded from the computations pursuantandSection;1139.60 (d) and (g); (c) Route disposition in the marketing area from a partially regulateddistributing plant during the month that exceeds the quantity subtractedpursuant to andSection;1139.76(a)(1)(ii). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1139.86 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Deduction for marketing services. </ITAG>(a) Except as set forth in paragraph (b) of this section, each handlerin making payments to producers for milk pursuant to andSection;1139.74 (otherthan milk of the handler's own production) shall deduct 6 cents per hundredweight,or such lesser amount as may be prescribed by the Secretary, and shallpay such deductions to the market administrator on or before the 14th dayafter the end of the month. (b) The monies acquired by the market administrator pursuant to paragraph(a) of this section shall be expended by the market administrator to providemarket information, and to verify or establish the weights, samples andtests of milk of any producer for whom a cooperative association is notperforming the same services on a comparable basis as determined by theSecretary. <ITAG tagnum="74">Marketing Agreement Regulating the Handling of Milk in the Great BasinMarketing Area </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The parties hereto, in order to effectuate the declared policy ofthe Act, and in accordance with the rules of practice and procedure effectivethereunder (7 CFR Part 900), desire to enter into this marketing agreementand do herby agree that the provisions referred to in paragraph I hereofas augmented by the provisions specified in paragraph II hereof, shallbe and are the provisions of this marketing agreement as if set out infull herein. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. The findings and determinations, order relative to handling, andthe provisions of andSection;andSection;1139.86 to 1139.86, all inclusive,of the order regulating the handling of milk in the Great Basin marketingarea (7 CFR Part 1139) which is annexed hereto; and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">II. The following provisions: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">andSection;1139.87 Record of milk handled and authorization to correcttypographical errors. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Record of milk handled. The undersigned certifies that he handledduring the month of July 1987, <T2>XXXXXX</T2> hundredweight of milk covered by this marketing agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Authorization to correct typographical errors. The undersignedhereby authorizes the Director, or Acting Director, Dairy Division, AgriculturalMarketing Service, to correct any typographical errors which may have beenmade in this marketing agreement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">andSection;1139.88 Effective date. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This marketing aagreement shall become effective upon the executionof a counterpart hereof by the Secretary in accordance with andSection;900.14(a)of the aforesaid rules of practice and procedure. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In Witness Whereof, The contracting handlers, acting under the provisionsof the Act, for the purposes and subject to the limitations herein containedand not otherwise, have hereunto set their respective hands and seals.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-121 Filed 1-8-88; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 3410-02-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>